Is there a way to punish him?
To prevent something like this from happening again
Or how much longer will the restaurant be ready? Can you ask for me?
Students take the lead in the Zhejiang University Academic Conference. The research results open up people’s minds - Xinhua Net
To wash your hands with air, to diagnose diseases by breathing, and to accurately search for the sources of smog. Yesterday evening, at the opening ceremony of Zhejiang University’s 2016 Academic Year, a series of innovative academic achievements were awarded.
The main researchers of these achievements are students, and the research covers major areas such as environment, machinery, energy, medicine, life sciences, and humanities education. The students started from a curious idea and created many high-end inventions with application value. Some projects have won awards at home and abroad.
Bio-sensors: Your home doctor
A team led by Zhang Diming, a doctoral student of the School of Biomedical Engineering, displayed a bio-sensor on a smart phone, which is only half the size of a smart phone.
"All you have to do is take a deep breath, and this device can do a preliminary check of your health condition from the composition of the gas you exhale. "
Zhang Diming introduced that this set of sensors is connected to a smart phone. After exhaling, the health report will be displayed on the mobile phone.
The smart wristbands that can detect health conditions on the market generally detect physical parameters such as temperature and pulse.
This set of biological sensors uses a new material, graphene, and its target is chemical elements. Its sensitive "sense of smell" allows it to more deeply and accurately reflect the health status of the body.
Intelligent surgical lamp: doctors' high-energy eyes
In addition to smart phones, smart operating lights are also used in the operating room.
This invention won a silver award at the 44th Geneva International Invention Exhibition in Switzerland this year.
Master students Zhu Linjing and Shen Junfei from the School of Optoelectronic Science and Engineering opened up a new idea in the defects of traditional operation lights, and invented an intelligent LED operation shadowless light.
“Many diseases can be detected early and removed, which is related to the lights used in the doctor's operating room. ”
Shen Junfei said that for example, if the doctor can't see all the tumor tissue in time during the early detection of cancer, the cancer cells will continue to spread.
The intelligent surgical light has four light discs, which can enhance the difference between different tissues under illumination by adjusting the spectrum.
During the operation, the doctor can adjust the size, brightness, spectrum, color uniformity, and shadow-free rate of the light spot at any time according to the needs of the operation and personal habits.
This intelligent surgical lamp has been tested in the Shao Yifu Hospital affiliated to Zhejiang University School of Medicine and the Children's Hospital affiliated to Zhejiang University School of Medicine, and has received good feedback.
Last October, the invention won the first prize of the National Challenge Cup.
Washing your hands with air: water-saving and cool
Ordinary people just wash their hands with water, at most they will rub some soap, squeeze some hand wash, while Li Qizhang and his classmates invented a set of "air hand washing device".
Just stand at the sink and our weight compresses the air out.
"It's like a pump.
The compressed air formed a fluid at the faucet, which combined with the water.
That way, we can wash our hands!"
The visible reaction and the bacterial residue test proved that the effect of hand washing by this method was the same as that of the ordinary hand washing method.
This device only needs to rely on our own gravity as a driver, which can ensure the cleaning level and save 90% of the water. The whole process is completely energy-free and energy-saving and environmentally friendly.
Last year, at the Second Global Major Challenges Summit, this invention stood out from many world-class universities and won the only gold award.
Please arrange for me to make up for it as soon as possible, thx
Please cancel the order and refund the cash, not the points, and I won't use #PRS_ORG# again!
Bone-in and spicy kimchi are not suitable for children to eat
If so, please order as soon as possible.
Not at the moment, thank you.
He asked me to tell you where he was #PRS_ORG#
I can't wait, so I'll cancel the order.
I bought #PRS_ORG#, but I wrote the wrong address
Can it be changed?
or cancel the order.
Okay, thanks.
A very meaningful certificate - first aid certificate
This is one of the important skill certificates I have apart from my driver's license!
Let me explain: First aid is actually an emergency rescue in the event of an emergency, that is, rescue before the ambulance arrives.
It is well known that there is actually a period of time between the accident and the arrival of the ambulance, and it is this period of time that is the most critical.
This is when emergency care is required.
If I really had a heart attack, a stroke, or stopped breathing, then our window of life is only four minutes, the golden four minutes!
So how important it is for those around you to know first aid!
When someone falls around us, we can use professional knowledge to rescue him, instead of standing there stupidly and doing nothing. This kind of helpless feeling is terrible.
"In China, we have about 300,000 accidental deaths a year, and the most dangerous one is cardiac arrest.
Nationwide in the United States, 15% can be saved on average.
In Las Vegas casino hotels, 70 to 80 percent can be saved, but in Shanghai and Beijing, it's less than 1 percent."
This was said by Lu Le, the founder of First Response.
If someone has a cardiac arrest and they're not breathing and their heart's not beating, it's not going to do any good to pinch them.
It is only possible to save a person by performing artificial respiration and external chest compressions.
I find that we do not have many people with such awareness to learn first aid, but when things happen, it is too late. Therefore, I still call on everyone to learn this skill, so that we can respond in time when we are faced with an emergency.
It could save a person's life!
The first aid certificate can be signed up at your local Red Cross training center. I signed up at the Red Cross training center in Zhuhai, and students get a discount.
PS: The last photo is of the goals I wanted to achieve before I turned 25, and adding the first aid certificate to the list was only a few months ago, but I did it!
Then I will go to take other certificates that I want to take. I plan to take a diving certificate. I have seen a diving first aid certificate on Xiaohongshu. It seems that I have to take a first aid certificate to take this certificate, so the first aid certificate is actually very useful!
I ordered ＃#NUMBER#
One piece of shrimp dumpling for 13 yuan?
I haven't tried
How can #NAME# not write clearly?
One that costs 13 yuan?
Yesterday, #PRS_ORG# delivered the wrong meal, and this time they just gave me one shrimp dumpling to eat?
Because I clearly saw that it was valid when I entered the code before
Let's talk about the conclusion first. I personally think that "Four Seas" is a full-range bad film, and it is in every sense.
But if you say this movie has no bright spots at all, it's not. At least the music selection is good.
There are many kinds of bad movies, and this is one that will put you to sleep in the movie theater; this is another that will make you angry after you see it. "Four Seas" is like a monkey on Emei Mountain to the audience. It can ignite your anger in countless ways.
On the point of insulting the audience, Han Han is really gifted.
What is most painful about this film is that it seems to be a creature from a C-class novel, indescribable, and full of loopholes like a windbreaker on Little Mark's body.
Even after watching it, you'll wonder if there are any hidden meanings the director is trying to get across, but when you think about it, it's just a pile of shit.
First of all, I'll talk about some plots that I don't understand.
The hero lives on a small island in the south, and lives with his grandmother.
Her grandmother had a wish to see snow, and then the plot arranged for an uncle in the neighborhood to drive a small van to take her to the northeast to see the snow.
Old people took a van from the south to the northeast to see snow?
He and his dad are very comfortable with it.
Then the old man had nothing more to say.
How did the hotel on the abandoned ship get its business license?
Why can the little hooligans of the Flying Car Party do a section of mountain road to block the road so easily?
Then the truck delivering the rebar stopped in the middle of the road, and no one could find the truck driver.
This prop is too obvious.
Why would a fly-by-night street racer with a bad credit rating and a suspicion of illegal activity become a police officer?
Why not call the police for the usury? In the movie, the police even asked if there was any trouble?
An adult who knows how to use a smartphone but doesn't know how to use a hotel room card to open the door, and then forcibly arranged to find the hotel owner and sleep outside the room?
This kind of nonsense permeates the entire movie, to the point where I wince at the very memory of it.
Worse than the plot is the film's message, or lack thereof, which is a loathsome Frankenstein's monster.
At the beginning of the film, you'll think it's a comedy, 20 minutes later, you'll guess it's an inspirational film, halfway through, you'll think it's a film that wants to reflect the difficulty of young people in small towns to survive, and after watching it, you won't know what you've watched, and you'll doubt yourself deeply. Why did you go to the cinema to enjoy the excrement during the Spring Festival.
In fact, most people are very familiar with the routines of various films. For example, if you want to make a film about a motorcycle racer, it will be inspirational + comedy and then tell the audience how a talented rookie will step by step to success.
If you want to shoot a love story, then just tell the story of the love-hate relationship between the young man in the town who likes to ride a motorcycle and the waitress girl.
If you want to reflect reality, at least your plot can't include things that don't exist in the real world.
(such as the new motorcycle played by Yin Zheng, which was just burned, and then could sing), we can't go to open some brains that even Kennedy can't stand.
As for the heroine who is obviously not a imbecile but acts like a 5-year-old in some aspects, I really don't know if it is the actress's acting or the director's request.
There is one thing that I don't quite understand. As a race car driver, why is Han Han so keen to add car crash plots to his own movies?
This kind of movie arrangement during the Spring Festival, is it just to add to the trouble of the audience?
Application: Taida value encoder uses battery box
Origin: Shenzhen, China
The battery box dimensions are as follows:
The following are the related products of the A2 series:
CN1 Connector CN1 Signal I/O Connection Line CN1 Port Terminal Block Brake Resistor
Low-power encoder cable, medium and high-power encoder cable, low-power power cable, medium and high-power power cable
The low-power drive line has a brake; the medium and high-power drive line has a brake; the encoder and power plug; and the servo battery box.
1. Our cooperative express delivery company,
1) The signature of Wangwang is used as the basis for cooperation delivery!
2) SF Express
2. If the buyer is in urgent need of the product or has a time limit, it is recommended to choose SF Express. It is recommended to pay on delivery. SF Express is relatively guaranteed, and the freight can be changed before payment.
3. The buyer has questions about the shipping fee charged by our store, and can choose to pay the shipping fee on arrival.
4. Heavy goods products are generally delivered by logistics. Please contact us separately.
1. Our shop supports 7-day return and exchange service. Due to product quality and wrong number of goods, our shop will bear the freight.
2. Non-quality problems of the product itself, due to the buyer’s wrong model selection and other factors need to return and exchange goods. In the case of not affecting the original function of the product and not affecting the secondary sales, our store supports free return and exchange of goods, except for the freight, and the buyer needs to bear the round-trip freight.
3. Our shop does not support the return request due to the delay of express delivery, and the seller needs to bear the shipping cost.
4. Customized products will not be returned or exchanged for non-quality problems.
1. Is this product genuine?
Answer: If the original factory brand is not specified, it will be replaced by a domestic substitute product.
2. Do you have any counterfeits?
Sorry, we don't sell counterfeit products. The so-called counterfeit products have the LOGO and packaging of the original factory.
3. Is the domestic XXX produced by the original factory in China?
Answer: The domestically produced ones are substitute products, not products produced in China by the original factory. It is just that everyone in China uses this term.
Professionally provide Mitsubishi, Yaskawa, Delta, Panasonic, Omron, Siemens and other domestic servo and PLC connection cables, connectors and other peripheral accessories, mainly including servo encoders, power cables, control connectors, power aviation plugs, terminal blocks and cables, lithium batteries, PLC program download lines, connecting lines, brake resistors, field buses, wires and cables, and all accessories are strictly in accordance with the Mitsubishi standard, and customized by professional engineers.
and use servo and PLC for actual testing to ensure that we provide customers with high-quality and durable products.
Welcome to inquire!
Factory direct sales, welcome to wholesale!
Other lengths can be custom made.
For details of related custom-made products, please consult the store!
What does it mean if we just give you the credit for the order?
Can I?
I got it, but I spilled all three of my drinks
Inspection of well concrete module production and processing equipment Zhengzhou well wall brick module equipment introduction:
Zhengzhou Yixin is a domestic manufacturer of concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment, inspection well block machine, and inspection well wall body module machine, from semi-automatic to fully automated production lines.
After years of practice and development, we now have the ability to produce high-quality products, mainly including hydraulic, mobile and fully automated inspection well series equipment and supporting devices.
Check the concrete module production and processing equipment. Zhengzhou well wall brick module equipment assembly site:
Inspect the concrete module production and processing equipment in Zhengzhou. The characteristics and advantages of the well-wall brick module equipment in Zhengzhou:
The Yi Xin inspection well block brick machine equipment is widely used in the new construction materials of municipal underground buildings such as coal, heat, water, electricity, and gas.
For example: various inspection wells, rainwater outlets, square channels, septic tanks and small structures, bridge wing walls, etc., for drainage and water storage facilities.
The advantage of using concrete modules to build the inspection well is that the upper, lower, left and right sides of the modules are all concave and convex groove structures, and they are combined to form a chain lock.
The shear resistance of the well wall is far greater than that of the plane friction masonry.
The module is a hollow structure. After the combination was built, the vertical holes were connected and the horizontal holes were connected. After pouring the core, a cast-in-place concrete network structure was formed, which played the role of second reinforcement and waterproofing.
Each module has a rebar groove both horizontally and vertically. The horizontal rebar and vertical rebar can increase the overall strength of the structure.
In addition, the inspection wells and drainage wells built with concrete inspection well modules are not easy to collapse, sink, and leak, and the mechanical properties of the well wall modules are stable, the operation is simple, and the formed size is standard.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment is equipped with intelligent control, data input and output device, one-key touch LCD display to monitor the whole process of mechanical operation, realize ideal man-machine dialogue, automatic analysis of materials, density operation, safety logic control and fault diagnosis system.
The wall body module of the well wall uses a single-cylinder hydraulic transmission and a double-cylinder hydraulic transmission.
The independent hydraulic integration station avoids the influence of the host vibration on the hydraulic system, so as to ensure the reliability of the hydraulic system.
The concrete inspection well module, brick machine device, cloth box, traveling mold box, demoulding and rising, material storage box door closure, automatic delivery of support plate, all of which are independently completed by the hydraulic system, so as to reduce the wear and repair of the machine.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment uses imported computers and electrical equipment, and sealing and hydraulic components, ensuring that the overall performance of the equipment is stable and reliable.
The mechanical vibration platform of the well-wall wall module is made of whole plate steel, with no welding point on the cutting line of the platform, making the filler box free to swing and guide, and fully reducing the mechanical wear.
The mold load is reduced, and the filler is encrypted by one-time and full-synchronization of the table vibration and the mold vibration, so as to ensure that the vibration effect is achieved.
The wall body module of the well wall has mechanical excitation and computer automatic control of vibration amplitude, which can adjust the amplitude according to the cost-effectiveness of the raw materials, without wear-and-tear braking, thus prolonging the service life and reducing the cost.
The wall module of the well wall has dual functions of mechanical automatic control and manual control.
Inspection well mold:
The Yixin brick machine inspection well uses cement blocks as the outer wall:
A corner of the workshop of Yixin Company:
Check the production and processing equipment of concrete modules for observation wells
The Zhengzhou well-wall brick module equipment can not only produce inspection well bricks, but also various standard bricks, hollow bricks and road flower bricks.
On-site delivery:
Chongqing’s vocational schools pilot the modern apprenticeship system, and admission is equivalent to being an employee of a company - Xinhua Net
Yesterday, a reporter learned from the municipal education commission that this year, our city will pilot the “modern apprenticeship” talent training model in 60 middle and vocational schools, and the students accepted for pilot training will simultaneously have the status of apprentices. After enrollment, they will be pre-enrolled by the pilot enterprises as unit employees.
The Municipal Education Commission has required that the enrollment and admission procedures of secondary vocational schools and the employment procedures of enterprises be standardized, and that the double identities of students of secondary vocational schools and enterprises be made clear. According to the principle of mutual choice, apprentices, schools and enterprises should sign a three-party agreement. For apprentices who have reached the age of 16 and have not reached the age of 18, a four-party agreement should be signed by apprentices, guardians, schools and enterprises to determine the rights and interests of each party and the specific positions, teaching contents and rights and interests guarantee for the on-the-job training of apprentices.
Encouraged pilot schools to adopt the modern apprenticeship form to carry out pre-job training and job transfer training in cooperation with enterprises.
The pilot schools need to reform the mode of talent training.
The school and the enterprise jointly design the talent training plan, jointly formulate the professional teaching standards, course standards, job standards, enterprise master standards, quality monitoring standards and corresponding implementation plans.
The pilot will use the training period as a pilot period, and the student's internship time in the enterprise will be determined according to the professional talent training plan, and the on-the-job internship is usually 6 months.
In the enterprise practice, the enterprise should implement the team management model. According to the characteristics of different majors, one master can lead 2 to 5 apprentices to form a learning group to ensure that the students master the skills required for each training post.
According to the arrangements, from 2016 to August 2019, our city will determine 60 city-level modern apprenticeship pilots in three batches, with about 50 people in each pilot, and a total of about 3,000 students (apprentices) will be trained.
According to the principle of first pilot and then implementation, from point to surface, we will explore the establishment of a long-term mechanism for joint enrollment, joint training, and integrated education between schools and enterprises, and effectively improve the job skills of students, increase the employment rate and employment quality of students.
My app says delivered, but I haven't received it
I just ordered take-out, and I don't know if it was left at the door.
Then call the resend
I live in Sheung Shui, but why is my order in Hoi Fung Garden?
Did you get the address wrong?
This vacuum cleaner has been considered for a long time. Finally, I bit the bullet and bought it. The vacuum effect is good. There is a lot less dust in the house, but it is a bit heavy to hold with one hand; the wet mop needs to be improved. There will be dust marks when going back and forth; overall, I am very satisfied.
The food processor is quite heavy and looks very high-end. It is suitable for a kitchen newbie like me. My child said that it tastes better than what I cook. I have made two meat and two vegetable dishes, and the sweet and sour pork is particularly delicious. The time is a bit long, but the other cooking time is very short, and the noise is very small. You don't have to worry about frying, and you don't have to worry about not knowing how to do it!
After receiving the goods, I couldn't wait to fry three dishes at noon. It's really technology that changes life. The temperature and the control of the seasoning are so accurate. The taste of the dishes is directly upgraded to the level of a chef. It's not bad. It's an artifact for those who are not good at cooking. It is recommended to buy it!
I added a new member to the kitchen.
A smart cooking machine, one that automatically controls the heat and automatically stirs.
No more fear of being scalded by hot oil, no more fear of not controlling the fire well and burning the vegetables or leaving them half-cooked.
The stir-fried food is much more delicious than mine, and the tomato and egg stir-fry is especially tasty, and the eggs have a particularly good taste.
This pot was a good buy.
The east and the west are not bad, worth buying, very good
Overall very good, very clear, as described.
It's worth having.
The customer service is also very good.
The screen is large, clear, not tiring for the eyes, and no other abnormalities have been found so far.
It is much thicker than the current mainstream display, and the frame is a little wider, and the gap between the frame and the screen is a bit large, but the screen display effect is good, and the accessories are complete.
Logistics is fast!
The shopkeeper has a good attitude!
After using it for some time, the quality is good, and the screen resolution is also very clear.
Shorting is great, 40p a share, too perfect
The logistics is fast, and the things are good. This is the second one I bought. It is indeed a good thing. The display is of high quality, and there is no distortion because of the large screen. All the interfaces are available.
Looks good, color reproduction is good, and the quality is good!
China Children's Center will hold a series of activities for children to have a "high-tech" Children's Day - China News Service
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, May 20 (Huang Xiaoxi, Zhou Shanshan) On May 20, the reporter learned from the China Children's Center that from May 28 to June 1, the China Children's Center plans to hold a series of activities such as children's maker experience, children's visual arts festival and parent-child book carnival, so that children can spend "June 1" in the charm of cutting-edge technology.
According to reports, this year's Children's Day activities held by China Children's Center include the Children's Future Learning Carnival, the First Children's Visual Art Festival, the Book Carnival activities, and the "Family Love Reading" picture book series activities.
Li Zhongming, deputy director of the China Children's Center, introduced at the 2016 Children's Day media briefing held on the 20th that the Children's Future Learning Carnival was the focus activity of the China Children's Center in celebrating Children's Day this year.
The activities focus on organically combining social innovation with family individual creativity. Through the participation of children and families in various innovative education activities, innovation practice will become the cultural gene of the general family, and "do-it-yourself" will become a new way of learning and life for the general family.
It is reported that the "Love Home Cool" Children's Future Learning Carnival includes the "Bean Fruit Makers" experience activities, the 10th anniversary of the Old Bull Children's Exploration Museum and the "Explore the Whole Family, Love the Children, and Celebrate the Children's Day" activities, the VR national experience plan, and the "Maker Tribe" interactive workshop, and dozens of other cutting-edge technology experience content.
Roast pork rice changes to kimchi roast pork rice
Will I have to buy another $100 or $200 to use it?
It's concerning how long it'll take to finish
Ok, thank you.
Was it the same rider who gave it to me?
May I ask if you can help follow up?
The restaurant said the food had been cooking for more than half an hour
But no rider came to pick up the food.
South African doctor: Omicron may be highly transmissible, but most cases are mild
Many doctors and medical experts in South Africa believe that the symptoms caused by the Omicron variant of the new coronavirus are milder than those caused by the Delta variant, although it spreads faster.
According to the Associated Press, as the Omicron variant spreads in South Africa, a group of more than 5,000 doctors in the Gauteng Province of South Africa reported that the symptoms of the current COVID-19 patients they are treating are relatively mild, such as body pain and cough and other flu-like symptoms.
Dr. Unben Pillay, director of the organization, said he sees dozens of patients every day, but none have needed to be hospitalized.
Pyle said: "They can control the disease at home, and most people will recover within 10 to 14 days of isolation. "
He said this includes elderly patients and those with underlying health conditions, who are more likely to become seriously ill from the virus.
He said that compared to the previous wave of the delta epidemic, the new coronavirus patients he treated had "difficulty breathing and low blood oxygen levels.
Many will be hospitalized within a few days."
Other doctors have also shared similar experiences in the two weeks since the omicron variant was first reported in southern Africa.
Although it will take several weeks to collect enough data, doctors' observations and early evidence provide some clues.
According to the South African National Institute of Communicable Diseases, only 30% of the newly hospitalized COVID-19 patients in recent weeks have severe symptoms, which is half of the proportion of severe cases in the previous wave of the epidemic; the average hospital stay has been shortened from 8 days to 2.8 days; and only 3% of the recent COVID-19 patients have died, compared with 20% in the early cases of COVID-19 in South Africa.
"At the moment, almost all the signs are that this is a milder disease," said Willem Hanekom, director of the African Health Research Institute, quoting data from the National Institute for Communicable Diseases and other reports.
He added: "It's still early days, we need to get some late-stage data.
Usually, hospitalizations and deaths occur later in the course of the disease, and we are only two weeks into this wave. "
At the same time, scientists around the world are monitoring the number of cases and hospitalizations while testing the effectiveness of current vaccines and treatments.
While Delta remains the predominant strain of COVID-19 globally, Omicron cases are emerging in dozens of countries, with South Africa as the epicenter of the outbreak.
Health officials say new cases discovered in the first week of December in the province increased by 400%, with more than 90% of cases testing positive for the omicron variant.
Thanks to today's supporters, all 80 boxes have been sent out!
Ingredients of beauty and health soup:
The effects of white fungus: sweet in taste, neutral in nature, and belonging to the lung, stomach, and kidney meridians; it has the effects of strengthening the essence, nourishing the kidney, lubricating the intestines, benefiting the stomach, nourishing the qi, harmonizing the blood, strengthening the heart, nourishing yin, lubricating the lungs, generating body fluids, strengthening the body, nourishing the brain, invigorating the mind, beautifying the skin, tendering the skin, and prolonging life; it is used to treat lung heat cough, dry lung cough, menstrual disorders in women, stomach inflammation, constipation, and other diseases; it is a good tonic for patients with yin deficiency and strong fire who are not suitable for warm and nourishing tonics such as ginseng.
The function of peach gum: bitter in taste, neutral in nature, enters the large intestine, and the bladder meridian.
Functions: It can promote blood circulation, relieve diuresis, relieve diarrhea, relieve pain, and can also replenish water, moisten the intestines. If you have constipation, you can eat more peach gum.
The function of wolfberry: neutral, sweet, and belongs to the liver and stomach meridians.
It nourishes the liver and brightens the eyes, nourishes the liver and kidney, whitens and nourishes the skin, replenishes deficiency and generates body fluids, and delays aging.
The function of red dates: sweet in taste, neutral in nature, and entering the spleen and stomach meridians, it can nourish the spleen and stomach, benefit qi, generate body fluids, nourish blood and calm the spirit. If the spleen and stomach are weak and the patient has insufficient qi and blood and insomnia, they can take more red dates.
Longan meat function: Sweet and warm in nature, it belongs to the heart and spleen meridians. It is suitable for people with both heart and spleen deficiency.
Longan meat can also be used for skin care, nourishing blood, calming the mind, nourishing the heart and spleen, strengthening yang and invigorating qi, and is also suitable for people with anemia and insomnia.
The role of lotus seeds: sweet and astringent in taste, neutral in nature, and belongs to the heart, spleen, and kidney meridians.
Nourish the heart and calm the mind, palpitations and insomnia, stomach deficiency, forgetfulness, irritability and thirst, nourish and replenish deficiency, and stop urinary incontinence.
Therefore, this beauty soup is not only a dessert, but also a nourishing one!
Eat more to keep your mind at ease!
Plus, it's not as expensive as bird's nest, so you can eat more of it without breaking the bank!
The food is now cold, and the food may have gone bad
Order #NUMBER#, which was originally expected to arrive at 18:40, was changed to 19:15 now!
Dinner time is limited, please deal with it as soon as possible!
I haven't received one
It has only been 5 minutes since I placed the order, how could it have been completed?
Where can I see the actual discount code details?
Education commentary: What does it take to save abducted children?
If we compare it to the famous public service advertisement “there is no killing without buying”, in a good environment where there is no demand for “kidnapping”, group prevention and group governance, and nationwide anti-kidnapping, make it unprofitable, high-risk and high-cost for the crime of kidnapping, so this kind of crime will not happen again and again.
Recently, the Ministry of Public Security's Criminal Investigation Bureau's missing children information emergency release platform went online.
It is an Internet information platform established for the purpose of building an authoritative channel for the release of information on missing children and finding abducted children in a timely manner.
When I heard the name of the app was “Reunion”, I felt very warm.
The new technological means is not only named "art" and full of feelings, but also information-based and practical and effective.
The first goal of anti-begging law enforcement is to find the kidnapped children and protect their personal safety and freedom.
Then comes the trial and punishment of the suspect.
The meaning of criminal punishment can be listed many "big words" from individual punishment, social prevention to legal education.
But before the trafficking case is cracked, the victim's personal safety should be the first priority.
Matters should be classified according to their importance and urgency. Under the urgent "rescue" purpose, controversial issues such as "whether child trafficking should be sentenced to death" can be put aside for the time being and discussed with caution; but the assistance of the abducted children must not be delayed.
According to the experience of investigating such cases, human traffickers are accustomed to leaving the crime scene as soon as possible after they succeed.
The more time it takes to find the kidnapper, the further the child will be away from their parents, and the more difficult it will be to solve the case.
In this case, it is indeed a practical move to come up with effective methods such as the "Reunion" platform to help solve cases and find missing children.
After all, "beating the stick" is a big task that requires the operation of the entire legal system to do well.
From the improvement of legislation to judicial protection, and from law enforcement to law enforcement, there is no need to implement the care of "protecting children and supporting the weak".
In addition, the prevention of child trafficking can be done better from family to society.
For example, in a common case, a family of three took a rest at the train station, and the parents fell asleep. When they woke up, they discovered that the child was gone.
A two-year-old cannot be expected to have sufficient self-protection skills, but as parents of young children, we should at least have a corresponding protective awareness.
The most basic means of preventing children from being trafficked is for parents to take turns resting, or to leave their children in a safe place.
From the other side of the police’s crackdown on human trafficking, the party that purchased the abducted children should also be paid attention to and punished.
An individual act of misconduct is often just one link in a long chain.
According to the Criminal Law of our country, the statutory punishment for the crime of kidnapping children is 5 years or more; if the circumstances are particularly serious, it can be sentenced to death with confiscation of property.
The starting point for sentencing is high, and the maximum sentence is severe. Under the trend of "lenient sentencing", the crime of trafficking children is obviously a more severe crime.
However, there are still many cases of child trafficking every year.
It can be seen that some people's ideas about raising children are outdated, and their legal awareness is weak.
Legal education for these people should follow suit.
To effectively control the crime of trafficking, it is not enough to rely solely on strict law enforcement by the government.
If the “trafficking” market exists widely, the traffickers are greedy and constantly innovate the means of trafficking, forming a “struggle” situation with the law enforcers. The anti-trafficking operation will inevitably fall into an inefficient quagmire.
Therefore, the removal of backward ideas and the popularization of legal knowledge are also helpful in eradicating the crime of buying and selling children.
Yang Haodong explained the spirit of the 6th Plenary Session of the 19th CPC Central Committee and the Provincial Party Congress
and draw inspiration from the 100-year history of the party.
According to the unified arrangement of the Provincial Party Committee, on the morning of December 10, Yang Haodong, a member of the Standing Committee of the Provincial Party Committee and Minister of the Propaganda Department of the Provincial Party Committee, made an interactive lecture in the video and cultural creative park of Malanshan, in-depth study and implementation of the spirit of the Sixth Plenary Session of the 19th CPC Central Committee, study and implement the spirit of the important speeches and important instructions of General Secretary Xi Jinping on Hunan, study and implement the spirit of the 12th Party Congress of Hunan Province.
Yang Haodong expounded the essence of the spirit of the 19th National Congress of the Communist Party of China from the three aspects of ideal, belief and original mission, self-revolution and young party, and the party's leader and the party's theory. Based on his own perception and personal experience, he expounded the essence of the spirit of the 19th National Congress of the Communist Party of China in a profound and systematic manner.
He pointed out that it is necessary to integrate the spirit of the National Congress with the spirit of General Secretary Xi Jinping’s important speech and important instructions on Hunan, the spirit of the Provincial Party Congress, and carry out the study in an all-round way, enhance the ideological self-consciousness, political self-consciousness, and action self-consciousness of defending the "two establishments" and doing the "two maintenances", and move forward along the direction pointed out by General Secretary Xi Jinping.
During the interaction and communication session, the representatives of grassroots cadres, enterprise representatives and young representatives asked questions about the relationship between the three historical resolutions, how to understand the decisive significance of the "two establishment", how cultural enterprises should grasp the orientation, and how young people in the new era should draw strength from the hundred-year history of the party. Yang Haodong answered one by one with simple language and vivid examples. He sincerely advised young party members to draw the power of progress from the hundred-year history of the party, closely unite around the CPC Central Committee, unswervingly follow the party, and use their youth to write responsibility and responsibility.
It is estimated that there will be 268,000 graduates in Beijing region in 2022-Xinhua Net
Beijing, Dec. 11 (Xinhua) - According to a reporter from Xinhua News Agency, the reporter learned from the video conference on employment and entrepreneurship of 2022 Beijing college graduates held by the Beijing Municipal Education Commission and the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau recently that the number of 2022 college graduates in the Beijing region is expected to reach 268,000, an increase of 16,000 from last year.
A relevant official from the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau said that the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau will carry out the employment work of Beijing university graduates from the aspects of strengthening supply and demand matching, strengthening policy support, expanding employment channels, ensuring difficulty assistance, supporting innovation and entrepreneurship, and improving service efficiency.
Reporters learned that the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau will set up a practice platform, increase the supply of jobs, actively contact 40 university graduate workplace experience bases, visit employing units, integrate demand information and job information; focus on "six groups", that is, expand the recruitment of public institutions, expand the recruitment of state-owned enterprises, expand the recruitment of grassroots projects, expand the recruitment of military service, expand the recruitment of internship employment, and expand the recruitment of entrepreneurship and employment; implement "one plan for a lifetime" dynamic management, recommend no less than 5 job information to each graduate, and ensure that 100% of the graduates from difficult families with employment intentions achieve assistance.
Actually, I don't know if it was the store's mistake or the rider's mistake
There was no receipt on the bag.
It can't be traced
I hope you understand
Because the delivery time was 30 minutes earlier than expected
No, thank you
Yes, it's a different rider.
He's waited a long time
The restaurant has been saying it's working on it
Waited for a couple of hours
The International Olive Oil Association divides olive oil into two major classes, virgin olive oil (Virgin Olive Oil) and refined olive oil (Lampante Olive Oil or Refined Olive Oil), and five levels.
Extra virgin olive oil, also known as natural olive oil, is obtained by mechanical cold pressing and filtration from fresh olive fruit.
According to the acidity, it can be divided into three levels:
Extra virgin olive oil (EVOO): This is the highest grade and highest quality olive oil, and is a natural product.
Its taste is excellent, with a light and pleasant plant fragrance, and the acidity is less than 1%.
Fine Virgin Olive Oil (Fine Virgin): slightly higher acidity, but not more than 2%, pure and aromatic.
Ordinary virgin olive oil (Ordinary Virgin): taste and flavor acceptable, acidity not more than 3.3%.
Refined olive oil is olive oil obtained after the refining of virgin olive oil with an acidity greater than 3.3%, or "second oil".
Extra virgin olive oil comes in two grades:
Ordinary olive oil (Olive Oil): Refined olive oil mixed with a certain proportion of virgin olive oil to balance the taste and color. Its acid value is less than 1.5%, and it is a transparent pale yellow.
Refined Olive-Pomace Oil or Olive Pomace Oil: It is obtained from olive pomace by solvent extraction and refined.
As you can see from the grading classification, the acidity of the olive oil is a very important indicator.
After all, olives are just like grapes for wine, and olives from different regions and different varieties of olives will produce different grades of olive oil.
The best place for oil olives to grow:
The Mediterranean coast has the most suitable soil, temperature, sunlight, air humidity and rainfall for the growth of olive trees.
Except for the coast of the Mediterranean Sea, it can only be planted in isolated areas in other regions.
Major production areas (the Mediterranean):
Italy, Spain, Greece, Turkey, Portugal, Morocco, Syria, Israel, Tunisia, Algeria, Egypt, Pakistan, Lebanon, etc., as well as Argentina, Peru, and South Africa, which are far away in the southern hemisphere and have similar climates.
Harvesting month for oil olives:
Each year between March and June, the olive trees bloom and bear fruit, and between July and October, the fruit begins to develop and mature, changing from green to red, purple, and finally black.
November to February is the season for picking the fruit (the freshness of olive oil is very important).
The nutritional content of olive oil:
Olive oil is rich in abundant monounsaturated fatty acids, including oleic acid and linoleic acid and linolenic acid, as well as vitamins A, B, D, E, K and antioxidants.
Olive oil is considered to be the most nutritious oil of all the oils discovered so far.
Democratic summit ends, with Biden saying the flame of freedom will never be extinguished
The online “Democracy Summit” (Summit for Democracy), convened by US President Biden and attended by government leaders and civil society and private sector leaders from 110 countries around the world, came to a close on Friday (December 10).
Biden said in his closing speech that the fire of freedom burns in the heart of every person in the world, and no dictatorship can ever extinguish it.
He also said that he plans to hold the second global "Democracy Summit" next year.
On the second day of the summit, the Taiwan government representative, Tang Fenghe, and the Hong Kong democracy and human rights activist who is currently in exile in the United Kingdom, Law Ka-chung, also spoke.
Biden said, "We know how hard the work ahead of us is.
But we also know that we can rise to the challenge, as I have said before and as this summit has shown, democracy is everywhere.
The fire of freedom can never be extinguished by a totalitarian government. It burns in the hearts of people all over the world. "
Biden also said that the defense of democracy requires the common efforts of the whole society.
He said, "As leaders of government, we have a duty to listen to our citizens, to strengthen the guardrails of democracy, to push for reform, to deliver transparent and accountable governance, to resist the forces of authoritarianism, and to stand up to those who would seek naked power at the expense of the public good. "
The themes of the second day of the "Democracy Summit" are to defend human rights, consolidate democracy and resist authoritarianism, and resist digital authoritarianism and affirm democratic values.
This day is also the International Human Rights Day.
United Nations Secretary-General Guterres also stated in his opening remarks on the same day that the cause of democracy faces challenges globally, especially the challenges brought about by emerging digital technologies.
He said: "Now is the time to reaffirm our shared values and positions as well as the resilience of democracy.
This requires deepening social dialogue, tackling inequality, fighting corruption, renewing the social contract, investing in quality education and expanding opportunities for women and girls.
We must also resolutely condemn all forms of populism, nationalism and extremism, including the use of all tools provided by the technological revolution. "
Hong Kong pro-democracy and human rights activist Law Chi-kwong gave a speech at the summit through a pre-recorded video, reminding the participants to continue to pay attention to the human rights situation of ethnic minorities in China such as Hong Kong, Uyghurs and Tibetans.
He said, "For a long time, the world has been directly affected by China's rise, but no mechanism has been established to hold it accountable.
That is why politicians and civil society leaders must work together.
We must use everything we have (resources) to ensure the revival of democracy is our top priority. "
Law Ka-chung also called on the free world to unite against the threat of the Chinese Communist Party.
He said, "Some of you may be afraid of offending President Xi Jinping, some of you may not want to lose the Chinese market, and some of you may not realize the threat (of the CCP) to our democratic values.
And that's why we failed.
That is why we must change. "
At the roundtable discussion on "combating digital authoritarianism and affirming democratic values," Tang Feng, a member of the Executive Yuan of Taiwan, released the "National Declaration" via video, emphasizing that Taiwan is at the forefront of the fight against authoritarianism and authoritarianism.
He also shared his experience in fighting against COVID-19 through information transparency and building mutual trust.
He said: "At a time when Taiwan's democracy is on the rise, we have always stood firmly at the forefront of the global fight against authoritarianism, and played a leading role in promoting global freedom, democracy and human rights.
During the epidemic, the authoritarian governments in various places have justified the infringement of human rights in the name of public health and collective interests, and the global democracy has shown signs of regression.
However, in Taiwan, we do not need to close the city to control the epidemic, nor do we need to take down the shelves to defeat false information. "
On the second day of the "Democratic Summit", the U.S. Department of the Treasury announced that it would legally impose sanctions on 15 individuals and 10 entities in China, North Korea, and other countries that have been found to have seriously violated human rights, and at the same time imposed investment restrictions on a Chinese company that has been found to have used surveillance technology to assist in human rights violations.
Already taken and uploaded for you
I know.
But the restaurant doesn't know why delivery times keep getting pushed back
Originally wanted #NUMBER#
I won't call myself that for sure
I don't want to eat it.
I will definitely complain
Why didn’t you say it earlier if you couldn’t send it?
Waiting for you for so long
No, I didn't get a call
Please ask him to deliver it to our company.
I don't want to wait another #NUMBER# minutes
One meal took an hour and a half
The #PRS_ORG# has not yet been sent
I want to cancel my order
Why not cancel it?
Hi, the chicken sent by the restaurant is raw
I want to try tennis, but I'm afraid I won't be able to stick with it, so I want to find a similar price to practice first.
They are not friendly, in fact, the price is often proportional to the degree of friendliness. If you cannot distinguish, then the expensive ones will be more friendly than the cheap ones, and this kind of "entry-level" camera is actually industrial waste.
They are very weak, the ball hit on the top of the racket, the vibration is very large, the hard ball can't stand it, and the master can't control it.
Their logic and subtext is that tennis is so hard, you know you won't learn it, and you know you won't pay for the expensive ones, so we'll give you the cheap ones, you'll play a couple of times, and then you won't play again, so this racket is cheap, and you won't care.
When you can really tell the difference between the good and the bad, it means you've improved. Then you can come back to me and buy the expensive stuff, and I'll make twice as much money.
It is recommended to buy a better second-hand racket with a similar price, choose Prince or Dunlo, these two brands are not well-known enough, so the good rackets are not sold at a high price, a new racket of 500 or 600 is good enough, and a second-hand one of 200 yuan, does it not feel good to have the enjoyment of a thousand-yuan racket?
It's pretty friendly to newcomers, but once you get past the newbie phase, it's useless, but most people, especially girls, can't get past the newbie phase.
The orders have been repeatedly delayed.
Can you help follow up on this?
postponed
Thank you
That is to say, I already have credit?
Do I need to place a new order now? Do I need to ignore the previous order?
Hello, I ordered food from this restaurant but a lot was missing and the sweet and sour chicken was also raw
#PRS_ORG# I was told to take it down for no reason. Please cancel it.
I ordered delivery, there was no option to pick up
Jiangxi will train 10,000 rural primary school music teachers within three years - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Nanchang, May 22 (Reporter Chen Yushan) A reporter recently learned from the Jiangxi Provincial Department of Education that in order to enhance the guarantee ability of the team of teachers in shortage subjects and achieve the balanced development of rural compulsory education, Jiangxi Province has planned to spend three years from 2016 to train one qualified music, art or physical education teacher for every primary school in rural areas (townships and below) in the province, with a total of 10,000 teachers.
It is understood that the trainees this time are 45-year-old rural primary school teachers in Jiangxi Province who have music, art and physical education knowledge or talents, and can serve as music, art and physical education teachers of other subjects.
Through training, they will be able to master the basic knowledge and teaching skills of aesthetic education, update teaching ideas and concepts, master modern teaching methods, improve subject teaching ability, activity design ability, campus culture ability and self-development ability, and build a team of multi-skilled aesthetic education teachers to alleviate the problem of lack of aesthetic education teachers in rural areas.
In order to ensure the quality and effect of the training, Jiangxi has also planned to train 100 elementary schools in 100 counties (cities and districts) in music, art and physical education, with a total of 300 trainees. This will comprehensively improve their teaching demonstration and leading ability, design and organization ability of research activities, training ability, and network training workshop construction ability, so as to play the role of teaching, demonstration, guidance and supervision.
Because waiting another 20 minutes would make it an hour #NUMBER# minutes
I don't want food made an hour ago
I've found the buyer of the wrong order
But my hubcap is missing
We bring you a list of the best facial cleansing cream.
How good is the cleanser cream?
1, Han Shu skin care cosmetics set of hydrating, moisturizing, whitening, freckle removal, brightening skin tone light-sensitive white gift box set of five items (cleansing milk, toner, lotion, freckle essence, eye cream)
Reason for recommendation: It has the effect of tightening and lifting. It repairs with peptides and shapes tight skin. It says goodbye to loose skin and improves the crow's feet and fine lines around the eyes. Its moisturizing effect is extremely excellent, and it can quickly penetrate the skin.
This product has a shelf life (year) of 5, product packaging has anti-counterfeiting, effect whitening, net content (mL/g) set, product packaging has gift box, suitable skin type mixed, effect fading, effect moisturizing, effect moisturizing, product packaging has outer box, effect lifting and tightening, product packaging has sealed, product place of origin Jiangsu Suzhou, whether it is special-purpose cosmetics no, effect other, currently there are more than 14,000 people to evaluate, obtained 99% of the praise rate, evaluate it is very easy to use, the package is quite good, high-end and atmospheric.
2, Han Shu skin care cosmetics set: hyaluronic acid gentle cleaning and moisturizing, giant water light moisturizing and nourishing gift box of six pieces (facial cleanser, toner, lotion, essence cream)
Reason for recommendation: It has the effects of repairing, moisturizing, whitening, and tightening skin. It can improve the problem of rough skin and large pores. It is very suitable for combination skin. It is clean and not dry.
The shelf life (year) is 5, whether it is a special-purpose cosmetic or not, the product packaging has anti-counterfeiting, suitable for mixed skin, the effect is moisturizing, suitable for skin age 25-34, net content (mL/g) 120ml+120ml+100ml+6g*3, the effect is moisturizing, the product packaging has an outer box, the product packaging has a seal, the product place of origin is Jiangsu Suzhou, there are currently more than 7,700 people who have evaluated it, received a 99% positive rating, and evaluated it as refreshing and comfortable, with a good moisturizing effect and high-end and atmospheric.
3, OSM cosmetics set. Nutritious skin care crystal and flawless moisturizing and moisturizing cleanser gift box for women (facial cleanser + toner + eye cream + lotion + face cream)
Reason for recommendation: Deeply cleans the skin, helps to wash off the dust and oil on the skin, refines pores, and can fully nourish the skin, effectively moisturizing and removing spots, which can improve the dullness and pigmentation of the skin. With continued use, it can help improve the skin's self-repair ability and help the skin restore its firmness.
This product has a shelf life (year) of 4 years, is produced in Huzhou, Zhejiang, is not a special-purpose cosmetic, has the effect of soothing and calming, has the effect of whitening, and has a net content (mL/g) of a set, has the effect of moisturizing, is suitable for any skin type, has the effect of moisturizing, has an outer box, has the effect of refining pores, has the effect of deep cleaning, and has been evaluated by more than 220,000 people. It has received a 98% praise rate, and people say that it is comfortable to use, is relatively high-end, and is packaged well.
4. Hanhoo (Hanhoo) Red Pomegranate Fresh Care Six-Piece Set (Skin Care and Cosmetics Set, Moisturizing and Hydrating, Student Girls, Cleanser, Toner, Cream, Eye Cream, Gift Box, Formal Wear)
Reason for recommendation: Deeply cleanses pore dirt, softens aged keratin, tightens and firms the skin, lightens facial fine lines, softens and plumps the face, improves the skin texture while moisturizing, prevents the occurrence of small wrinkles, and is suitable for all skin types. It is mild and non-greasy.
Hello, how long will it be before my order is delivered?
People have already finished work
Your rider's telephone number is #PHONENUMBER# and his name is #NAME#
Please give a reasonable explanation
Yes, but your rider is a problem, please deal with it properly
Can you check if it's still on the road? If so, it would be best to deliver it
OK, if there isn't, just give me my money back for the meal.
In fact, there are many things to pay attention to when dressing and matching for girls who are slightly fat in their bodies.
Girls with fat bodies should not wear skirts that are too short or too long. The length should be around the knees, just enough to cover the fat part of the thighs.
If a skirt is too short, it will reveal the fat on your legs.
If it's too long, it will make you look short and fat.
If you wear separates top, skirt and tights in different colours it will make you look taller.
In fact, many dark-colored clothes are the staple for the slightly chubby girls (the author has a deep understanding of this), dark colors are also a good way to hide your fat, and the noble and elegant black short skirt is also the first choice for the slightly chubby girls.
Wearing dark-colored clothes, especially black short skirts, will make you look thinner.
If you have large calves, don't wear socks and shoes that draw attention to them.
The more popular it is, the better, and the colour should not be too bright.
To avoid people noticing your legs and feet and making you feel fat.
For slightly chubby girls, they must know the tricks of dressing.
Micro-fat girls must not wear tight short skirts, and the top must not be too short or tucked into the skirt, which will make people feel uncomfortable. If your legs are thick, you should wear black long socks or mesh socks (the kind with fine grids), choose a soft printed trumpet skirt and match it with a collarless top, which can well cover the shortcomings of fat girls.
Of course, micro-fat girls are also particular about wearing short skirts.
If you're a chubby girl wearing a short skirt, you should choose a top with the same color as the skirt, which will make you look taller.
Miniskirts matched with high heels can make your legs look more slender. This is the most IN combination in summer!
If you are a girl with a fat upper body and slim legs, it is recommended to choose a gorgeous one-piece short skirt.
Not only can it cover your big belly, but it can also show your advantages.
An A-line skirt will make you look slimmer and is more suitable for fat girls. You should choose a tight top to form a sense of hierarchy, which will make you look slimmer.
A simple white T-shirt paired with a short skirt can also be tried by chubby women.
Even plump girls can wear fashionable clothes.
As long as they can master the rules of dressing, the slightly fat girls will also be the focus of everyone's attention.
After changing the way I dress, I also need to exercise more in daily life to get rid of the label of "chubby girl" as soon as possible.
The 18th World Beverage Innovation Awards (World Beverage Innovation Awards) is a prize jointly hosted by FoodBev Media and the Nuremberg International Beer, Brewing and Beverage Industry Exhibition (Brau Beviale) in Germany.
It attracted 279 entries from 25 countries in 22 different categories.
On October 15, the list of finalists was announced, and the final list of winners will be announced online on November 11 (British Summer Time).
We saw that Yuanqi Forest’s LP28 sugar-free yogurt was nominated for the best milk beverage award, Yili’s “GOGO Wuhan” marketing was nominated for the best marketing campaign, and Pepsi and the People’s Daily’s new media cooperation packaging was also nominated for the best packaging design/label award.
Laura Nettle, senior marketing director at FoodBev Media, said: "We are pleased to celebrate the 18th year of the World Beverage Innovation Awards together with Brau Beviale.
From new flavours, new concepts and new functionalities to brands, packaging and manufacturing, we are seeing trends in the beverage industry as it continues to innovate in a more sustainable way.
The World Beverage Innovation Awards recognized the most ambitious new products and new developments in the global beverage industry this year.
Here is the full list of finalists in each category.
The technology developed by the Ardagh Group can turn 100 per cent recycled glass into new bottles.
The boxed water inside the box is 100 per cent recyclable, reducing packaging by 66 per cent and carbon emissions by 97 per cent.
LatCub is 100% biodegradable, uses less paper, and doesn't use environmentally harmful glues or tape.
Technology developed by the Ardagh Group allows 100 per cent recycled glass to be remelted into new bottles.
The final winners will be announced on 11 November (UK time) on FoodBev Media's YouTube channel, and FBIF will continue to report to you. Stay tuned!
Why did it take so long?
I'm dying of hunger
From the estimated 7:30 to now
Don't answer it if you can't get through
I can go out and buy my own food, I don't need to wait here #PRS_ORG#
Xinhua News Agency + | The Beijing Youth Ice Hockey League fuels the enthusiasm of the Winter Olympics - Xinhua News Agency
On December 11, Beijing Dream Team player Pang Yaotian (center) shot during the game.
On the same day, the 2021-2022 Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Club League continued to compete at various ice rinks in Beijing.
This league is divided into regular season and post-season. The age of the participating athletes ranges from U6 to U18, and the group setting is divided into competitive group and selection group, which attracted nearly 3,600 players from 256 representative teams in the city to participate.
After more than ten years of development, the Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Club League has become a platform for Beijing's young ice hockey enthusiasts to hone their skills and make friends. It also provides Beijing's youth ice hockey teams and youth teams with excellent players.
The league has played a role in promoting the development of Beijing youth ice hockey, fueled the enthusiasm for ice hockey at the Winter Olympics, and laid a foundation for the development of Beijing ice hockey in the post-Olympic period.
Girl uses her body as a target to raise money for her sister: " I think it's just a flesh wound " - Xinhua Net
In Wulin Square in Hangzhou, a girl stood in front of a large wooden board. The words "human target, 10 yuan per arrow" were written on the wooden board.
Yesterday morning, a photo of a “Hangzhou girl willing to be the ‘target’ to raise funds for her sister” went viral on social media.
The photo shows a girl standing in front of a piece of wood that is slightly taller than a person. The words "human meat target, 10 yuan per arrow" are written on the wooden board, indicating that passers-by can pay and use a bow and arrow to shoot.
This behavior aroused heated discussions among netizens.
Last night, the propaganda officer of the Hangzhou Municipal Public Security Bureau Xiacheng Branch confirmed to the Beijing News reporter that the police had confirmed that the girl had made such an extreme move in order to raise funds for her sister, but this kind of behavior was not worthy of encouragement. After the warning, the girl left the local police station yesterday.
Girl's street 'dart board' fundraising warned against
The image circulating on the Internet shows a long-haired girl standing in front of a large wooden board in the shape of “个”, with the words “Human target, 10 yuan per arrow” written in black ink on the wooden board, and her bank account number and WeChat and Alipay accounts written on another wooden board in front of her.
The picture caused controversy when it was posted online.
Some netizens believe that this is a “begging for attention” behavior, and many netizens expressed their sympathy.
“We found the situation around 10 a.m. on the 23rd when we patrolled to the square. At that time, there were already a lot of onlookers. ”
The police officer from Tianshui Police Station near the scene told the local media that there were two girls selling things, both around 20 years old, dressed in a youthful and beautiful style.
Among them, the girl who played the "human target" was crying and begging passers-by to play this game; another girl was shouting on the side, saying that her friend's sister had leukemia and urgently needed surgical expenses, and asked everyone to help.
"We have contacted the local police in Guizhou and learned that the girl was raising money for her sister's leukemia treatment. "
Last night, a publicity official from the Xincheng Branch of Hangzhou Public Security Bureau told the New Beijing News reporter that the girl’s name was Jijiali, and she was raising money for her sister, Jijian.
However, as the treatment still costs more than 300,000 yuan, he could not think of a good way to raise funds, so he did this.
He said that throughout the whole process, one of the two girls served as a target, and the other was responsible for helping, but did not participate in it. Throughout the whole process, no one was found to shoot an arrow, but some people watched and took photos and posted them on Weibo.
Later, the police, after identification by the public security department, determined that the bow and arrow used did not fall within the scope of control.
The official said, "We do not encourage this kind of eye-catching fundraising."
After being warned by the police station, she has left the police station.
Heat dissipation effect: good Thinness and lightness: convenient Appearance material: satisfied Acer has always been very cost-effective.
The new machine is very good.
Stable performance, no problem with heat dissipation from the four air outlets, worth recommending
The Acer Predator Helios 300 gaming laptop is pretty good, with good workmanship and materials, and a trustworthy brand!
The price of the Acer Shadow Knight Dragon is not high.
In my personal opinion, Acer’s Shadow Knight Dragon is really good. Game effect: The game effect is comfortable, and it can play most of the games. My eating chicken is full of high-** frame rate stability, which is very smooth, and the League of Legends is not to be mentioned. CSgo is also easy to handle, and most of the three-A games can be played.
Heat dissipation effect: the heat dissipation effect is good, the fan is powerful, it is quite quiet when working, and the game effect is not small when the fan is fully opened.
Appearance material: The appearance is quite cool and trendy, and the laptop is very stylish. Display effect: The screen is very clear, and 1080p is enough for playing games.
It's really good to buy a laptop. It's mainly used for design, and it's very cost-effective. It's lighter than I imagined, and it's also better-looking than I imagined. The red on the butt is a very good-looking wine color. It is not so vulgar, and the overall is much higher than the expected value. It's worth buying, and it's very suitable for girls.
I began to contact Macro Knight two years ago. After two years, the cost-performance ratio is relatively high, and the quality is excellent!
I also recommended this product to my friends around me!
I have already purchased three machines in this series!
The appearance is beautiful and good-looking, and the configuration is also very good.
I bought it for my nephew. I wanted to wait for the 418 bank activities, but he needed it urgently, so I bought it in advance, so I didn't catch up with the bank's big activities, which is a little regretful.
However, it is quite cost-effective, and the logistics is also quite fast. I will come back to comment after using it for a period of time.
This is a brand new, high-value-for-money gaming laptop. The design style is very good, and it has already installed Windows 11 and Office 2019.
Display effect: I bought it for my kid to use for 3D rendering. The software has already been installed, and my kid said it can be used without any problem. This computer can be used for 3D design work.
He said it was very good when I bought it for my son.
The computer is good, especially the customer service attitude is very good. If you don't understand, just ask. It is recommended to buy.
Not bad, the graphics of the game are really fragrant
What's hot in 2021?
There is no doubt that it is the Tokyo Olympic Games.
Do you think only Olympic athletes can win awards?
A few days ago, there was an article called "Look! Project Managers Can Win Gold at the Olympic Games" that was very popular. It mentioned that in many projects, project managers can definitely take the lead, and no one can beat them: carrying bricks, going on business trips, and staying up late are the daily routine of project managers, and putting out fires, taking the blame, and apologizing are not a problem.
This article, which seems like a joke, actually reflects the daily bitterness of project managers. It represents the inability to cope with the current project management work.
Meanwhile, people engaged in project management work have also gradually chosen to take some actions to get themselves out of the predicament at work.
From the number of people signing up for the PMP (the international certification for project management professionals) every year, it can be seen that more and more project management practitioners are learning to enhance their project management capabilities.
According to the "20 Years Development Report of Project Management in China (1999-2019)", as of September 2019, the total number of applicants for PMP® was nearly 600,000, the number of people who passed the PMP® certification was about 420,000, and the number of effective certificate holders was about 300,000, accounting for 31.2% of the global PMP® certificate holders.
Over the past 10 years, the number of PMP certificate holders has increased year by year, which shows that more and more project managers realize that it is no longer appropriate to rely on the "old experience" to do things, and the ever-changing work environment makes us realize that we must learn to stand on the shoulders of scientific giants to explore the way forward.
However, does passing the PMP guarantee a smooth project management career?
Many project management beginners said that they can systematically master the knowledge points of the ten major areas and five process groups of project management through learning related courses such as PMP/IPMP, but when they really do project management work, they are still confused.
Many project managers often feedback the following problems: project management cognition is not in place, relying solely on personal experience, empty project management theory, but do not know how to put it into practice; lack of systematic project management process system support, unable to implement in work, project estimation is not accurate, control sensitivity is poor, and the project is delayed again and again; the division of labor is unclear, and the "old oil" in the team does not know how to deal with it; cross-departmental cooperation and communication is not smooth, and the project is difficult to promote...
Therefore, focusing on product innovation and R&D management for more than ten years, it has helped many excellent enterprises to train a large number of product managers, project managers and other R&D key talents, and won the honorary titles such as "China Enterprise R&D Management Talent Training Demonstration Base". Zhongtian Huaxia Consulting brought the online course of "R&D Project Manager Special Training Camp".
The online course of "R&D Project Manager Special Training Camp" is a kind of online fragmented learning, which combines many real cases, tools and methods of R&D enterprises to help you master the necessary knowledge and standard actions of project managers, and walk on the path of your own project management.
This is also an opportunity for companies to use lower cost and less investment to promote the training process of project managers, and bring effective operation results to enterprises.
Words are not enough, you can first see how other students evaluate this course: This course is not only taught by the Zhongtian Huaxia expert team (the former Huawei R&D management team), but also combines international advanced project management methodology and many well-known enterprises' real business scenarios to carry out in-depth professional explanations of the course content.
It will also provide scientific and practical management tools and methods, as well as rich template forms to help students apply the learning content to specific work after class.
Only one order of siu mai?
Why does the hand have 6 fingers?
Before Double 12, Jinshi advocated rational consumption to consumers - Economic Observer Network - A professional financial news website
This year’s “Double 11” shopping festival nationwide online payment business transaction volume reached 1.77 trillion yuan, which is a new high compared with previous years.
The various kinds of full-cut red envelopes and the eye-catching live-streaming shopping once again made consumers exclaim that they have benefited a lot. This consumption craze on the one hand makes people sigh that the national consumption power is getting stronger and stronger, and on the other hand, they cannot help but calm down and think about the impact of consumerism on society and the contemporary mainstream consumer group.
On the eve of "Double 12", Jietong Consumer Finance Co., Ltd. (hereinafter referred to as "Jietong") issued the call for rational consumption, reminding the vast number of users, especially young people, to establish a good sense of consumption and consumption habits, and refuse blind consumption and over-consumption.
According to the results of the "Survey and Analysis Report on Consumer Financial Literacy" released by the People's Bank of China this year, the national consumer financial literacy index is 66.81, which is 2.04 higher than that in 2019.
Overall, the performance of Chinese residents in financial consumption is good, but there are large differences in financial behavior and skills, and it is necessary to further improve the level of basic financial knowledge.
The financial literacy level of the elderly and young people is relatively low, and "old and young" will continue to be the focus of financial education. The "Report on the Debt Situation of Chinese Young People" released by Nielsen and the "2019-2020 Chinese Youth Consumption Report" released by CCTV Finance show that young people have huge consumption potential, and credit consumption has become an important way to upgrade consumption. 86.6% of young people are using credit products, and nearly half of them have no debt accumulation. Although young people as a whole show a rational consumption trend, which is very different from the label of "overspending" attached to them by the outside world, some young people do have excessive consumption and follow-up consumption behavior, which leads to excessive financial pressure and debt risk, and even leads to the increase of social problems. Financial enterprises should have the courage to assume social responsibility and provide positive guidance.
As a licensed consumer financial institution, CITIC is committed to providing quality and caring services to help people build their own happy life, advocate consumers to establish a good and correct consumption concept, and actively respond to regulatory calls to enhance the rational consumption awareness of consumers, especially young groups.
In recent years, CITIC has been carrying out all-round and diversified financial knowledge popularization activities for young people, including college students, and through cooperation with top universities in China, it has launched innovation practice competitions and other forms to subtly guide the consumption demands of young people, help them establish a rational consumption concept, and reasonably plan their consumption demands, and help them accumulate life wealth.
On the eve of the Double 12, ZTE reminded all consumer friends to establish a reasonable consumption awareness and correct money view, resist blind consumption and over-consumption, avoid the pitfalls of consumer loans, and avoid affecting personal credit as well as future economic life.
Consumers must plan in advance when they spend, and repay on time within their means.
If it is overdue, the overdue record will be recorded in the personal credit report, which may have a negative impact on your economic life in the future, such as buying a car and buying a house.
At the same time, when enjoying financial products and services, people should also choose regular institutions and channels, and pay attention to checking whether the relevant institutions have business qualifications.
In the future, CITIC will continue to rely on its mature and reliable consumer finance system and constantly updated financial products to provide consumers with more demand-oriented and diversified services, continuously help consumers improve their financial knowledge level, help consumers cultivate the concept of rational consumption and appropriate borrowing, and be a trustworthy consumer finance partner for consumers.
I'm not going
I'm on a delivery run.
In this one hour, no one has contacted me. This is a scam on the Internet.
Did you think this was my first time ordering delivery?
After the investigation, you will say the same thing! I checked the address several times before placing the order.
OK, thank you! How many days?
Vietnam Net - Cooperation Council for the Arab States of the Gulf responds to common challenges
The stops on Saudi Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman's tour include Oman, the United Arab Emirates (UAE), Qatar, Bahrain and Kuwait.
Notably, it is the first visit to Qatar by the crown prince since Saudi Arabia and its Arab allies imposed a boycott on Qatar in mid-2017, leading to a Gulf diplomatic crisis.
In this crisis, Saudi Arabia, the United Arab Emirates, Bahrain and Egypt have cut off diplomatic relations with Qatar and imposed a full embargo on it, accusing Qatar of supporting terrorist organizations and having close relations with Iran.
Diplomatic tensions have had a serious impact on the internal unity of the ASEAN, and have had a negative impact on the economy of countries in the region.
Four Arab countries have blocked all land, sea and air routes to Qatar.
The crisis was only resolved in January 2021 at the Gulf Cooperation Council summit, when the Gulf states signed an agreement toward "unity and stability" mediated by the United States and Kuwait.
Saudi Arabia has reopened its border with Qatar.
Saudi Arabia and Egypt are leading efforts to restore ties with Qatar by appointing new ambassadors to Doha.
The Gulf Arab states' move to resolve their differences and restore ties with Qatar stemmed from the need to work together in the interests of their countries and the stability of the region in the face of common challenges.
During the Saudi crown prince's visit to Oman, the two sides agreed to open the first direct land route between the two Gulf neighbors.
The 725-kilometer-long channel connecting the two countries will provide convenient conditions for the travel of citizens of the two countries and the integration of supply chains.
The Saudi Public Investment Fund (PIF) will invest $5 billion in Oman, and the two countries' enterprises have signed 13 cooperation memoranda of understanding worth $30 billion.
Saudi Arabia's Crown Prince's visit to the Gulf nations comes as Iran and world powers are negotiating to save a nuclear deal with Iran called the Joint Comprehensive Plan of Action (JCPOA), which Gulf Arab states have condemned for not addressing Iran's missile program.
The Gulf States have long seen Iran as a long-term "competitor" and have viewed Iran's nuclear programme as a "threat" to regional security.
The Gulf countries believe that it is flawed not to solve the Iranian missile problem and not to take action to curb Iranian activities in the region.
Saudi Arabia has conducted direct negotiations with Iran against the backdrop of the major powers' nuclear negotiations with Iran failing to meet the needs of various Gulf countries.
Its aim is to contain the escalation of tensions in the region.
This is one of the factors behind the slowdown in economic growth in the Gulf Cooperation Council countries.
The upcoming GCC summit will be the first GCC summit since the end of the dispute between some member states and Qatar.
This is an opportunity for the Gulf Cooperation Council to re-evaluate and contribute to the restoration of the unity of the Gulf Cooperation Council by proposing measures to make its member states fully cooperate to face common challenges, and to contribute to the stability and development of the Gulf countries.
It has not been delivered from 7 o'clock to 9:30, and the deposit must be returned and the order cancelled.
Okay
It is said to be the largest supercar exhaust sound in the Mount Austin area!
The car that our team brought to you this time is the dream of many men!
It is Lamborghini's flagship supercar, the Murcielago's replacement - the Aventador LP700-4!
The asking price is nearly two million ringgits, and the annual road tax is several thousand ringgits. It has four-wheel drive. Why is it called LP700?
With 700 horsepower, can you imagine how fast that is?
Never mind, I don't know. The data says it only takes 2.9 seconds to accelerate from 0-100km/h, which is about the same time it takes for my myvi to reach 30km/h.
The low body, the arrogant scissor doors, the huge air intakes all over the body, and the 6.5 v12 engine that can be seen through the glass, perfectly interpret the style of Lamborghini.
There's no need to say too much about the car, just Google it. Here are some explanations that Google may not give you!
Too much attention. Wherever you go, everyone is looking at you. It’s very uncomfortable! (Actually, it’s kind of cool.)
RM1 for every 1km (the car owner doesn't care at all)
Get used to getting in and out, otherwise it'll be a bit embarrassing (because you won't be able to crawl out and get stuck halfway)
The engine is so loud that when you get out of the car, your ears will ring immediately. (But it's very enjoyable.)
It's too big to park in a normal parking space, and I'm always worried that the car next to me will open the door and hit it!
A bit lonely, because there was no opponent on the road (I said it myself, it has nothing to do with the car owner, haha)
Don't get it wrong, the supercar in the video is not for sale, sorry!
If you are interested in making a video of your car, please contact us!
For more car news you didn't know, visit The Car Guide / People's Car Guide
The accident is worth tens of millions of dollars!
The Bugatti Chiron and the Porsche 911 are believed to be known to car enthusiasts. The Chiron is one of the world's most expensive supercars, and the Porsche 911 is also a million-level car!
The day before, a million-dollar 911 and a million-dollar hypercar Chiron were crashed in just a few minutes!
Judging from the results, you were right!
Let the university spirit resonate with the spirit of the times-Xinhua Net
The so-called university spirit refers to a series of educational ideas and value pursuit that a university has accumulated and formed in the process of development, which is the soul of a university.
From ancient times to the present, the spirit of the university has been crucial to the development of politics, economics, culture, science and technology, and society, and even to the progress of a nation.
Since the birth of the world's first modern university, universities have shouldered a unique mission different from other social organizations. For Chinese universities, which rose in the autumn of national crisis, its spirit has been deeply affected by traditional culture and the changes of the times. It advocates the value idea of "cultivating morality and serving the world, and governing the country by morality" and the patriotic responsibility of "promoting education and strengthening the country".
Currently, the trend of informatization and internationalization of higher education is becoming more and more obvious. The global education competition, technology competition and talent competition are intensifying. As an important "supply side" of higher education, its structural reform is facing unprecedented opportunities and challenges.
In particular, the proposal of the "Overall Plan for the Coordinated Promotion of the Construction of World-class Universities and First-class Disciplines" has not only shown China's confidence and determination in moving from a big country in higher education to a strong country in higher education, but also put forward higher and updated requirements for the development of universities.
How can we make efforts to become one of the world's top universities in a short period of time, accelerate the construction of several world-class universities and a number of world-class disciplines on the basis of a certain gap, and achieve "overtaking on a curve"?
In addition to firm confidence in goals, paths, and capabilities, universities should make full use of three advantages: the first is the latecomer advantage. Through continuous introduction of overseas outstanding academic talents, we can learn from the advanced experience of world-class universities and achieve significant improvement in academic level and quality of education; the second is the cultural advantage. We can inherit the wisdom content of Chinese civilization in five thousand years of accumulation, promote the development of excellent traditional culture, and use it to gather strength, shape brands, and improve images; the third is the institutional advantage. We can make full use of the institutional superiority of socialist countries, strengthen goal-driven, pool consensus and strength, optimize resource allocation, and provide a sustainable and solid guarantee for the school to accelerate the catch-up with the world's advanced level.
It is particularly important to realize that the construction of world-class universities is not a one-size-fits-all approach, and all schools must show their individuality and characteristics while playing to their advantages.
The characteristics of running a school must have a common Chinese feature, but it must also reflect the unique target positioning, educational tradition, and resource endowment of each school.
As for Zhejiang University, we pay attention to three aspects in our education: First, we focus on the characteristics of innovation and entrepreneurship talent training, and build an integrated education environment integrating science and education, university and enterprise, and form a complete chain of entrepreneurship education ecosystem. Second, we focus on the characteristics of cross-disciplinary aggregation, promote the optimization and adjustment of the discipline system, create a cross-disciplinary institutional environment, and actively cultivate cross-disciplinary emerging disciplines and landmark cross-disciplinary achievements. Third, we focus on the characteristics of educational system and social services, carry out in-depth international exchanges and cooperation, and accelerate the formation of pan-Zhejiang University industry-university-research cooperation system.
In this process, it is especially important to always adhere to the university spirit, and let the university spirit resonate with the spirit of the times.
For Zhejiang University, the school motto of "seeking truth and innovation", the common values of "diligence, morality, discernment, and sincerity" and "embracing the Yangtze River, seeking truth from facts, serving the people first, and building our country" constitute the latest expression system of the spirit of Zhejiang University.
This is an important guarantee for the school to adhere to the correct direction of education, constantly accumulate cultural height and gather spiritual power. It is rich in connotation and far-reaching in significance.
Among them, "Hai Na River" emphasizes the spirit of openness and inclusiveness, and embodies the spirit of "using the talents of the world". It is manifested as absorbing the high-quality concept of education and education from world-renowned universities; "Qizhen Hude" emphasizes the spirit of seeking truth and goodness, that is, universities should pursue truth while receiving the cultivation of virtue and the encouragement of personality; "Kaowen Qianmin" reflects the spirit of reform and innovation, which not only contains the pursuit of new knowledge and the innovation of scientific research, but also reflects the reform and development, and the overthrow of the old and the new; "Tree My Country" emphasizes the spirit of love for the country and dedication, which is that universities should always be with the national destiny.
This series of spiritual concepts and value pursuits is the soul of Zhejiang University's 120 years of education.
"Those who are smart can hear in silence, and those who are wise can see in formlessness."
Chinese universities should further base themselves on the overall situation of socialist cause with Chinese characteristics, deeply understand the era position and historical mission of higher education, and speed up the construction of world-class universities.
At the same time, we must adhere to humanistic concern and independence and freedom, let the university spirit and the spirit of the times, the spirit of the nation to inspire each other, so as to provide inexhaustible motivation for the realization of national prosperity and national revival, and realize the common ideal of mankind.
Ordered a set menu and got 2 things wrong
The order
Want to pay riders a service fee
How to pay now
Iranian President: If sanctions on Iran are lifted, nuclear talks are expected to reach an agreement - Xinhua News Agency
Tehran, December 11 (Xinhua) - Iranian President Raisi said in Tehran, the capital of Iran, on the 11th that if the United States lifted the sanctions against Iran, a "good agreement" could be reached in the negotiations for a comprehensive agreement on Iran's nuclear issue.
According to a message released by the website of the President of Iran, Raeisi said at a meeting with ambassadors of Iran in neighboring countries that day that Iran has proved its negotiating sincerity by submitting proposals to other parties to the JCPOA.
If the US makes up its mind, "the path to an agreement will be open".
In April this year, the parties to the Iranian nuclear agreement began talks in Vienna, the capital of Austria, to discuss the resumption of compliance by the United States and Iran.
The new round of talks began on November 29 in Vienna, was temporarily suspended on December 3 and continued on the 9th.
Haven't got my takeaway yet
Please contact the rider
Xi Jinping Sends a Letter of Congratulations to the 2021 Greater Bay Area Science Forum - Xinhua Net
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 11 - Chinese President Xi Jinping sent a congratulatory letter to the 2021 Greater Bay Area Science Forum on December 11.
Xi Jinping pointed out that the world is now experiencing a century of changes unseen in a century, and global technological innovation has entered an intensive and active period. A new round of technological revolution and industrial transformation has had a profound impact on the global economic structure.
The Guangdong-Hong Kong-Macao Greater Bay Area will take building an international science and technology innovation center as its strategic positioning, strive to build a global science and technology innovation highland, and promote the development of emerging industries.
China is willing to work with scientists from all over the world and international scientific and technological organizations to enhance international scientific and technological exchanges and cooperation, strengthen research on major scientific issues, promote the solution of common scientific and technological problems, deepen cooperation on key scientific projects, and jointly promote the development of the world's scientific undertakings and better benefit mankind.
The 2021 Greater Bay Area Science Forum was opened on the same day in Guangzhou, Guangdong Province, with the theme of "exploring the future and sharing science", hosted by the People's Government of Guangdong Province.
Yes, the order is accepted.
But the restaurant called and said because the rider didn't deliver the bones, the restaurant needed to cut up the meat and throw away the bones
Do you understand my question?
It's not an order delay
Or you can call me directly
Are you following up?
The longest suspension period for undergraduates in Guangxi to start a business is up to 5 years - Xinhua News Network
Xinhua News Agency, Nanning, May 19 (Reporter Zhang Ying) A reporter recently learned from the Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region Education Department that in the future, all universities in Guangxi will implement a flexible academic system, relax the time limit for university students to take a leave of absence, and extend the time limit for on-campus students to take a leave of absence to start a business by 2 to 5 years on the basis of the original academic system. The time of taking a leave of absence to start a business can be regarded as the time of practical education.
In order to promote the enhancement of the entrepreneurial and innovative ability of college students, Guangxi’s education, human resources, and other departments have worked together to build an entrepreneurial platform, build more off-campus practical teaching bases for college students, university science and technology parks, college student entrepreneurship parks, and entrepreneurial incubation bases, and provide external guarantee for college student entrepreneurship.
According to the requirements, by 2020, the area of the innovation and entrepreneurship practice base in each university should reach more than 3,000 square meters for undergraduate schools and more than 2,000 square meters for vocational schools.
The government encourages colleges and universities to set up innovation and entrepreneurship credits, and give priority support to students who change their major after performing well in innovation and entrepreneurship practice.
Every two years, university teachers must work in the industry for at least two months, so as to improve their awareness and ability of innovation and entrepreneurship education.
The Guangxi Education Department has required all universities in Guangxi to carry out the Innovation and Entrepreneurship Training Program for College Students in-depth, so that each college student can participate in an innovation and entrepreneurship training program during his or her studies.
Universities should actively organize students to participate in various levels of innovation and entrepreneurship competitions, and provide financial support.
NEWS GOV-MO: University of Macau awards honorary doctorates to seven distinguished individuals
The University of Macau held the “2021 Conferment Ceremony of Honorary Degrees and Higher Degrees” today (11th), conferring honorary doctorates on Liu Zunyi, Chen Kaixian, Nakamura Shiuji, Li Lanjuan, Li Xiaoliang, Zhu Lili, and Jiang Zhaohui in recognition of their outstanding achievements and major contributions to the development of society and education.
At the conferment ceremony, the Chief Executive and Chairman of the University’s Council, Secretary for Social Affairs and Culture, Au-yeung Yiu-chung, accompanied by the Chairman of the University’s Board of Governors, Lam Kin-cheung, and the President of the University, Song Yonghua, awarded the Honorary Doctorate.
Professor Liu Zunyi was awarded the Honorary Doctorate of Education, Professor Chen Kaixian was awarded the Honorary Doctorate of Science, Professor Nakamura Shuji was awarded the Honorary Doctorate of Science, Professor Li Lanjuan was awarded the Honorary Doctorate of Science, Professor Li Xiaoliang was awarded the Honorary Doctorate of Business Administration, Professor Zhu Lilan was awarded the Honorary Doctorate of Science, and Mrs. Jiang Chaohui was awarded the Honorary Doctorate of Science.
In his speech, Ouyang Yu first expressed his warm congratulations and high respect to the seven outstanding people who were awarded honorary doctoral degrees. They have made extraordinary achievements in different fields and made outstanding contributions to the development of the country and the progress of the world. At the same time, Ouyang Yu expressed his most sincere blessings to the graduates and their parents, and also expressed his sincere respect to the dedicated and academic staff team of the university.
Professor Sun Yifang, a lecturer at the Australian Humanities College, said that Professor Liu Zunyi is a world-renowned economist, known for his excellent academic achievements and forward-looking educational philosophy.
In addition to his achievements in economic development, economic growth and the East Asian economy, he is also a far-sighted educational leader.
In short, he made outstanding contributions in many fields.
When Sun Yifeng read the praises of Nakamuro Shuji, he said that Professor Nakamuro Shuji was the pioneer of sustainable energy technology.
He was one of three winners of the 2014 Nobel Prize in Physics for the invention of the blue light-emitting diode (LED).
Professor Nakamura's invention has not only revolutionized the lighting industry, but also led to the widespread application of white light-emitting diodes in daily life and industrial production, making a huge contribution to human well-being.
Sun Yifeng read the praise for Li Lanjuan and said that Professor Li Lanjuan, as the pioneer of Chinese artificial liver, created a unique and effective Li artificial liver system, made major breakthroughs in the treatment of fulminant hepatitis and liver failure, and significantly reduced the mortality rate of liver failure.
In the fight against the COVID-19, she and her team's "Four Anti-Two Balance" scheme and the three major technologies of artificial liver, micro-ecology and stem cells have significantly improved the rate of severe treatment.
Sun Yifeng, when reading the praises of Li Xiaoliang, said that Professor Li Xiaoliang laid the foundation for innovative research in operations management, shaped the way of thinking of supply chain theory and practice, and completely changed the business model in the world.
Li Xiaoliang is known for popularizing the concept of the whip effect in operational management and exploring measures to deal with this phenomenon.
At present, the long whip effect is becoming increasingly prominent under the epidemic and tense economic situation, causing severe damage to the supply chain.
Li Xiaoliang's far-sighted research is like sending charcoal in a timely manner. It helps the industry to deal with the difficulties and brings great social value.
When reading Zhu Lili's praise, Sun Yifeng said that in her research work, she found a breakthrough and innovative dyeing technology for sample preparation, which enjoys a high reputation among domestic and foreign scientific and technological peers.
She was awarded important honorary titles, such as a member of the International Eurasian Academy of Sciences, for her extraordinary achievements in science and technology. Her brilliant achievements have won her a well-deserved high position in the world of science and technology.
When Chen Xin, the Acting President of the University of Macau Chinese Medicine Research Institute, read Chen Kaixian's praises, he said that Professor Chen Kaixian had been engaged in drug research and development for more than 40 years, and his outstanding scientific achievements and important contributions to the country, Macao, the University of Macau and the State Key Laboratory have given him a lofty international status and reputation.
His positive role in promoting the development of Chinese medicine in Macao and the Greater Bay Area fully embodies his sense of mission for the country's medical and health development strategy.
The President of the School of Science and Technology of the University of Australia, Xu Chengzhong, when reading the citation of Ms. Jiang Zhaohui, said that Ms. Jiang Zhaohui participated in the research and development of more than 15 major inventions and patents related to storage virtualization, navigation, file system, and power management. All of them are practical, widely used, and improve the convenience of human life.
As an outstanding inventor, Ms. Jiang is often able to simplify high-end science and technology and popularize it to the general public.
Finally, Chen Kaixian read the thank-you speech as the representative of the honorary doctor.
He was pleased to see that the medical industry in Macao and the Greater Bay Area has established a good example: from the establishment of the first national key laboratory of Chinese medicine quality research at the University of Macau to the vigorous development of traditional Chinese medicine in the Greater Bay Area, the University of Macau has played a huge role in integrating the excellent talents in the field of traditional Chinese medicine in the Greater Bay Area.
In addition, he believes that the management team of the Australian National University has a far-sighted vision and not only provides students with a research-rich environment, but also sends many people with a sense of responsibility to society.
He was honored to exchange and cooperate with ANU and sincerely congratulated ANU for its achievements in recent years.
Did he have the right address?
I haven't seen it yet
That rider just went the wrong way so I didn't get it
However, I did receive #PRS_ORG#
The app was unable to contact the rider at that time.
My family thought I didn't
But it has been more than an hour
When the NFT was quickly out of the circle, a new concept emerged in the encryption community.
In 2021, a blockchain game called Axie Infinity has had a huge impact in Southeast Asia, and some residents who have lost their jobs due to the epidemic have begun to make a stable income in this game.
Axie Infinity is a pet-raising game based on blockchain technology, which combines multiple gameplay including NFTs. It is currently the highest trading volume NFT project, and has exceeded 3 billion US dollars.
According to TokenTerminal data, the daily income of Axie Infinity is more than 8.2 million U.S. dollars, which is close to that of “Honor of Kings”.
On August 6, 2021, the official website of Axie Infinity announced that its daily active users had exceeded 1 million.
The popularity of Axie Infinity has passed a new "playtoearn" model to more people. With the help of blockchain and smart contracts, players are no longer a single role. In addition to being able to get fun and economic benefits from the game, they can also participate in the governance of the game ecosystem.
This subjectivity is not given by the game maker, but is guaranteed by blockchain technology.
After seeing a news about my friend's stock price, my biggest feeling is the choice of enterprises on the track, that is, the choice of investment target industry. First, choose an industry with large growth space, with at least 100 billion market size; second, choose an industry with good growth in the future. Consider that the industry growth will reach the best state after 3-5 years; finally, choose an industry with policy support.
The width of the track refers to the market size, the length of the track refers to the development stage of the industry, and whether the track is flat or rough refers to the competition pattern of the industry.
Here's to the right track!
The first thing in the new year is to summarize 2021 and adjust the tactical layout in 2022.
Tactics are "do the things right", that is, to do things right.
And the strategy is to “do the right thing”, that is, to do the right thing.
The strategy is to find the direction, and the tactic is to implement it. There is room for strategic thinking above most tactical thinking.
For example, in addition to thinking about how to increase the number of customers (tactical thinking), we can think about whether to continue to deepen in the current field or extend horizontally (strategic thinking); in addition to thinking about improving the customer retention rate (tactical thinking), we can think about how to improve the retention rate of core customers and high-value customers (strategic thinking); in addition to thinking about improving the participation rate of activities (tactical thinking), we can consider how to set the right activity KPIs to achieve the right activity objectives, such as improving the participation rate of target customers, activating high-value dormant customers, and precise new customer acquisition; in addition to thinking about improving DAU (tactical thinking), we can consider whether the current growth is healthy and sustainable.
After 12 years of birth, Bitcoin welcomed several milestone events in 2021.
On September 7th, the Central American small country of El Salvador designated Bitcoin as legal tender, marking the first time that Bitcoin has become the legal tender of a country or region.
On October 12, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) approved for the first time in eight years the launch of a Bitcoin ETF by ProShares and listed it on the New York Stock Exchange, marking the landing of the first compliant Bitcoin futures ETF in the U.S. capital market and the further expansion of the investment exposure of cryptocurrencies.
From the perspective of blockchain technology development, Bitcoin is not the protagonist.
On November 14, 2021, Bitcoin underwent a soft fork upgrade called Taproot, which improved the anonymity of transactions on the Bitcoin network and reduced the data burden of transactions by changing the data structure of the blocks themselves.
KFC, without the KFC sauce
If you were to just eat a McNugget by itself, it would be hard to eat.
Does your $32 promo code need to be spent a certain amount before it can be used
If it is less than 15 minutes, can it be canceled?
I'm entering the code, why does it change to confirm order
Okay
Then I'm not going to get a discount?
Hello
Ordered food and it didn't arrive
The riders have already been sent to
I want you to be on time, not to want your coupon!!
Have you encountered any problems with the initial registration of first-class construction costs and continuing education credits?
Late registrants must provide evidence of at least 30 hours of continuing education within the last year. Re-registrants must provide evidence of at least 120 hours of continuing education within the last four years. Re-registrants must provide evidence of at least 30 hours of continuing education for each completed year.
Continuing education fee standard for construction cost engineers
The cost engineers who participate in online continuing education must pay the learning fee to each management agency when they sign up. In general, the standard is as follows: the fee for 30 hours of required courses is RMB 300 per person per year (including the unified textbook for continuing education);
The 30-hour elective course costs 300 yuan per person per year.
The fee for the 30-hour compulsory course and 30-hour elective course is RMB 600/person/year (including the unified teaching materials for continuing education).
(1) participate in the continuing education learning of the registered cost engineer network organized by the China Association of Cost Engineering or provincial and departmental management agencies, and calculate the study hours according to the time recorded in the online learning courseware;
(2) Participate in the centralized face-to-face training and various types of training classes, seminars, etc. organized by the China Price Association or provincial and departmental management agencies, and 4 academic hours can be recognized for each half day;
(Three) Participating in continuing education courses for construction cost engineers and construction cost estimators of the Ministry of Construction, each half-day can be recognized as 10 learning hours;
(Four) participate in the research of the medium- and long-term cooperation and the provincial projects, the compilation of industry standards, and the writing of teaching materials, 30 credits per year for each item;
(Six) participate in the compilation of textbooks for the national qualification examination for cost engineers, as well as question setting, question review, and paper marking, which can be recognized for 30 academic hours per year;
(Seven) Engineering cost-related professional papers and works published with personal signatures and in public (by official publication number).
12 academic hours will be recognized for every 10,000 words published;
Papers published in national periodicals are recognized as 8 study hours per 1,000 words, papers published in provincial periodicals are recognized as 5 study hours per 1,000 words, and papers published in municipal periodicals are recognized as 3 study hours per 1,000 words;
(9) Participation in public training (excluding general management and skill training of enterprises) organized by engineering cost consulting enterprises approved or authorized by the Ministry of Commerce and Price, provincial and departmental management agencies, and provincial construction cost associations can be recognized as 4 academic hours per half day, with a maximum of 30 academic hours per year.
Continuing Education Learning Process for Construction Cost Engineers
After the registration institution receives the fee, the student's identity is immediately opened, and the cost engineer can enter the online education class with his or her username and password.
Students learn through on-demand courseware, questions and answers, and online discussions.
If you forget your password, and when you log in, the username and password are not correct, and you cannot log in for learning, please contact the registration agency to which you belong. The registration agency can assist in modifying the student's password (but cannot modify the username), and use its modified password to log in again.
Scan the QR code to download the Tieba app
Watch the high-definition live broadcast and video!
Please arrange delivery.
My order hasn't arrived
The delivery man left without receiving the payment
Please notify the delivery person immediately, we're still waiting
The restaurant had already given the food to the rider 30 minutes before
Full-visual wedding photography base (Hebei store) does not have a branch for the time being
The wedding dress was avant-garde, the make-up artist was first-class, the shooting technology and angle were professional, and the shooting effect was very good.
A very reliable seller, and very good customer service.
The makeup was very delicate, and the team service was also very good. This trip was very happy. It was a very professional team, and the seller's service attitude was very good. I will introduce it to my friends. I am very satisfied.
Thank you to my photographer and makeup artist for making my wedding photos one-of-a-kind.
Thanks to all the staff who took wedding photos today, looking forward to the release of the film.
Taking wedding photos is almost a physical activity, especially for the photographer, who runs and jumps around.
The make-up artist was very thoughtful and helped me design a makeup style that was suitable for my face shape. The photographer was humorous and fun during the shoot, and worthy of praise.
Thank you to my photographer and make-up artist for making me look this beautiful in my lifetime.
They praised the girl, saying that her eyes are beautiful, her appearance is decent, and at a glance, she is a good wife and mother, and she will be diligent and frugal at home in the future.
The bridegroom can be said to have earned a lifetime of happiness, with peace and beauty.
The wedding photo quality is really good, just like what's said on the Internet, my husband and I look very handsome and beautiful, and we are very satisfied.
The seller’s service attitude is also very enthusiastic.
This time, not only did they enjoy the beautiful scenery, but they also took beautiful wedding photos and met their photographer friend.
The wedding photo is so beautiful. The photographer and makeup artist are great. You are really professional.
I would like to thank Ms. Mu for her patient accompaniment and careful guidance. I like the photos taken.
When I saw the wedding photo, I didn't recognize myself for a moment.
As long as the photographer chooses well, you can also have wedding photos that are comparable to that of a celebrity.
It is more important that both the photographer and make-up artist have a good sense of aesthetics. Luckily, I met them.
After seeing my wedding photos, I found out that I was also a "photoshopped" person.
U.S. Asian-American groups file discrimination complaints against 3 Ivy League schools including Yale - Xinhua News
WASHINGTON, May 23 (Xinhua) -- More than 130 Asian-American groups submitted a complaint to the U.S. Department of Education and the Department of Justice on Tuesday, protesting that three Ivy League schools -- Yale University, Brown University and Dartmouth College -- discriminated against Asian-American applicants.
The Asian-American Education Alliance, which filed the complaint, held a press conference in Washington on the same day.
Zhao Yukun, chairman of the group, said at the press conference that in the past 10 years, the number of Asian applicants who meet the admission requirements of American top universities has doubled, but the proportion of Asians in these three American top universities has basically remained at the same level.
Many studies have shown that these universities "systematically and continuously discriminate against Asian applicants" in the so-called "comprehensive consideration" admissions process.
Zhao Yukun introduced that a 2014 study by Sanders and other scholars showed that among the three universities, Asians had the lowest admission rate relative to the number of applicants in all ethnic groups.
Data from the U.S. Department of Education also shows that among all Ivy League schools, Brown University and Dartmouth College have the lowest admission rates for Asian students, and Yale University and Brown University have implemented a de facto racial quota for Asian applicants for more than 20 years.
Zhao Yukun told a Xinhua News Agency reporter that they hoped that the U.S. Department of Education and Department of Justice would conduct investigations and take measures to prevent these universities from continuing to discriminate against Asians in enrollment after the appeal was submitted.
They also hope that the complained universities will take this issue seriously and change their admission policies for Asian students.
At present, the three universities that have been complained have not made a response.
The Asian American Coalition for Education was established in 2015, when it filed a complaint against Harvard University for discriminatory admissions, but the U.S. Department of Education did not accept the complaint on procedural grounds.
In addition to Asian-American groups, those taking part in the appeal include Indian-American, Korean-American, Japanese-American, and Pakistani-American education groups.
Cutlery is required
Just canceled an order
Why is it still being implemented
Can you check if it has been cancelled?
But I already ordered at 5:09 a.m.
That's the order hot line, and they don't know what you're talking about
Is there a phone number to contact them directly?
In September 2020, Mr. Lu learned from a real estate agent about a factory located in Zhangting Town, Yuyao, Zhejiang Province. After several site visits, Mr. Lu decided to purchase the factory.
In December of the same year, Mr. Lu negotiated with Mr. Lin, the family member of the house owner, on the details of the purchase of the factory building, and paid a deposit of 200,000 yuan through bank transfer on the same day.
Lin signed as the recipient on the "Factory Purchase Deposit Receipt", which states, "If the buyer does not want to buy this factory, the deposit will be returned to the seller. If the seller does not want to sell this factory, the deposit will be doubled and returned to the seller. The two parties agreed to sign the factory purchase contract within a week."
However, after that, the two sides failed to reach an agreement on the main contract clauses such as the scope of the factory sale, payment method, etc., and the house sale contract could not be signed.
Considering that the two parties failed to reach a consensus on the contract content, a few days later, Mr. Lin returned the 200,000-yuan deposit to Mr. Lu.
After a lot of effort, Mr. Lu finally found a house he liked, paid the deposit, and was ready to pay for the house. All that was left was to sign the contract. However, the seller did not sell it, which made Mr. Lu feel helpless and angry.
To this end, Mr. Lu sued Mr. Lin to the People's Court of Yuyao City.
After hearing the case, the court ruled that the two parties eventually failed to sign a formal contract, and could not be blamed solely on the defendant. It should be reasonably assumed that the negotiation failed. Therefore, this case should not apply the deposit penalty, and the defendant should not have to bear the double return deposit breach of contract responsibility.
After the first trial, the plaintiff appealed.
Recently, the second instance court upheld the original judgment.
【Reminder from a lawyer】 In the course of a transaction, it is necessary to exercise necessary prudence.
When signing the contract, as the buyer, it is necessary to fulfill the necessary duty of care, such as verifying the information of the property owner and whether the property is occupied, and clearly stating the specific time and place of delivery in the contract to avoid disputes between the two parties when performing the contract.
(Deutsche Welle Chinese website) After the end of the "Democracy Summit" on Friday, the spokesperson of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs of China issued a statement on Saturday (December 11), saying that the United States held the "Leaders' Summit of Democracy" to "draw an ideological line, use and weaponize democracy, use the name of democracy for anti-democratic purposes, incite division and confrontation, and divert domestic contradictions".
The Chinese government believes that "for a long time, the United States has imposed its own political system and value concepts on others, promoted "democratic reform", abused unilateral sanctions, fomented "color revolutions", and caused disastrous consequences.
'Democracy' has long been America's 'weapon of mass destruction' for interfering in other countries.
The summit is an action by Biden to fulfill his campaign promise.
The two-day meeting was held via video and was attended by the leaders of 111 countries around the world, including the leaders of Taiwan, but China and Russia were not invited.
On the eve of the summit, China and Russia criticized the United States for its problems with its own democracy and claimed that the United States was not qualified to host such a summit.
There are also dissenting voices in the international community and in the United States. For example, the leaders of some countries with authoritarian tendencies, such as the leaders of the Philippines, Poland and Brazil, have been invited to participate in the summit. Some people suspect that the real intention of the Biden administration is to organize this summit for geo-political purposes rather than for democracy.
The newly-appointed German Chancellor Scholz also attended the video democratic summit
China's Foreign Ministry said in a statement on Saturday, "Today's American-style democracy is in a state of disease, with problems such as money politics, identity politics, party opposition, political polarization, social rifts, racial conflicts, and the rich-poor divide becoming more and more intense," America's democracy is a "rich people's game" built on the basis of capital.
U.S. President Biden said in his speech, "As leaders of the government, we have a responsibility to listen to our citizens, strengthen the fence of democracy, promote reforms, achieve transparent accountability governance, and resist the power of authoritarianism and those who want to seek naked power before the public interest. "
He stressed that democracy is not taken for granted, "We must constantly update it in every generation. In my view, this is the defining challenge of our time. "
Biden also said, "At a time when global democracy and human rights are facing continuous and worrying challenges, we need warriors to defend democracy. "
The U.S. has committed to a year of action after the summit, including a $424.4 million initiative to strengthen democracy around the world and support independent media.
The United States hopes that countries will make concrete public commitments to improve their democratic system before the in-person democracy summit planned to be held at the end of 2022.
Biden said, "Let all countries implement our commitments and report the progress we have made next year."
Okay, I'm just worried that he sent it to the wrong address
Richang Restaurant (Wudaokou Store)
[Peppermint] Environment: Middle-of-the-road [Service bell] Service: The food was served very quickly. My must-order dish is the “old-fashioned maltose cake”. The maltose cake was too fragrant, too soft, and too delicious 😋 If you like desserts, you must try the “Dongjiang squid paste stuffed bean curd pot”. The soup was very delicious and the bean curd was very tender. The squid...
The taste is great, the meat is good, and the service is warm.
It’s been a long time since I’ve been to Jichang, and the fruit salad is still so delicious and full of real ingredients. This is the first time I’ve ordered the char siu bun, and it’s the southern style of soft flour that I love!
The claypot rice was just right, the portion was very generous, the signature aluminium foil chicken wings were as good as ever, and the example soup was not bad either, and the Chinese cabbage was also...
The taste is good, the service is enthusiastic, and the meat is good.
The old store of Ji Chang was also a net celebrity a long time ago. It has a small building in Dongdan and a wooden floor.
One always has to wait a long time to eat the clay pot rice, and the clay pots of the clay pot rice are all cracked...
I have not been to Ji Chang for a few years. The rise of various small shops and Cantonese cuisine have dispersed the customers.
It is rare to have a seat when you arrive at the store. The quality of the dishes is beyond doubt, and it is as good as ever.
The taste is great, the meat is good, and the staple food is great.
Richen take-out.
[Rice] Meal: The food this time was a little disappointing.
Three Cups of Chicken: The side dishes are a bit too much, and the chicken is a bit less.
The main taste is a bit off. The bottom taste is not salty enough, so it highlights the sweetness. You can imagine the sweetness with various spices...
What is the way to drink Red Label whisky?
People have different hobbies. Some people like to collect things, some people like food, and some people like to drink. Red Label Whisky is one of the most popular Scotch whiskies in the world, and Red Label Whisky has won the gold medal in the International Wine and Spirits Competition.
Each bottle of Johnnie Walker has a unique taste, but if you don't know how to taste it, it would be a waste of its fragrance.
Then, how to drink the red label whisky?
Here's a simple introduction for you.
Red Label whisky drinking method:
Johnny Walker Red Label is a blend of about 35 Scottish whiskies, which has a rich aroma and the characteristics of traditional Scottish whisky. The rich aroma has a sweet and smoky flavor.
The entrance is strong and fresh, slightly with the flavor of herbs and strong smoked malt.
This wine can be drunk straight over ice, or mixed with your favourite drink.
Red label whisky has entered the domestic market. In order to adapt to the taste of the Chinese people, red label whisky + Coca-Cola or Sprite or other carbonated beverages has become a long-lasting fashion.
These sweet drinks, in addition to neutralizing the sourness and giving people visual pleasure, can be added to drinks to dilute the wine flavor and change the taste.
Red Label whisky + a slice of lemon + a lump of sugar (or sugar) is the most authentic and traditional way to drink it.
The genuine Hongfangwei flavor is a little sour, adding sugar can neutralize the sourness, and lemon will bring a fresh fragrance to the wine. Of course, the sweetness and sourness can be adjusted according to personal taste preferences.
The above three are the best ways to drink red label whisky. Everyone can try it as a reference. I hope that my introduction can help everyone.
Education thinking: How can the university entrance exam meet the needs of "top students" and "poor students" - Xinhua News Agency
Three students from Lanzhou Jiaotong University wrote a letter to the school leaders, reflecting their confusion about university examinations, and proposed to increase the difficulty of the examinations, change the examination questions, and let the examinations truly reflect the actual level of the students.
Indeed, university exams have been a "hot topic" for a long time.
In the university campus, students come from all over the world, and their abilities are different, and their learning levels are different, and their learning situations are very different.
It is inevitable that there will be different feelings when it comes to assessing a group with such diverse characteristics.
Of course, if the test questions are all of the same type and have a high repetition rate, and the questions are too easy, it will certainly cause a completely different feeling.
A student who does not work hard may be able to pass the exam by cramming just before the exam. If he wants to try other methods, he may be able to achieve twice the result with half the effort.
As a result, there is the "dumb student" who can pass the exam even if he doesn't put in the effort and even get high scores; and the "smart student" who never misses a class, does all the homework, takes good notes, and doesn't score much higher on the exam.
In this regard, the problems reflected by the students of Lanzhou Jiaotong University in the university examinations are not groundless, and it is believed that this situation does not only exist in Lanzhou Jiaotong University.
From this perspective, we should applaud the three students who wrote letters.
In fact, anyone who has been to university will know that it is not uncommon for people to cram for exams and try to get exam questions from teachers in various ways, trying to limit the scope of the exams and get “special attention” before the exams. In addition, it is not uncommon for people to carry cheat sheets during exams or ask teachers for help after the exams.
In my opinion, as a kind of teaching quality evaluation guidance, to measure whether a university examination is passed or not is more about teachers' overall grasp of teaching and learning, and on this basis, scientific question setting.
Entering the university undergraduate stage, the major begins to be subdivided, and many professional courses are mainly based on basic knowledge.
Undoubtedly, whether or not one has a full understanding of the basic knowledge points of a subject is what the university entrance examination will examine.
And the undergraduate knowledge is basically the basic theory and common sense of disciplines. In terms of knowledge points, there is not much change, and it is basically fixed.
As one teacher said, "20 years ago you were taught the basics of university maths, and now you're still learning it, and it's still important. "
However, the knowledge points remain basically the same, which does not mean that the examination questions are monotonous and repetitive.
In many universities, exams are generally composed of a question-setting group, and then organized by a senior teacher in the subject to form a test paper. The exam grading is also participated by all teachers in charge of the subject, which can to a certain extent overcome the situation of repeated questions.
However, in order to draw up a set of questions that are in line with the actual situation of teaching and learning, the difficulty of questions should be distributed in a normal way according to the overall situation of students’ learning, and the teaching situation should be comprehensively mastered, and the students’ learning situation should be fully analyzed, so as to make the examination questions have a dynamic grasp of difficulty and question type, so as to highlight the examination of basic knowledge, take into account the examination of ability, and innovate the design of questions at the same time.
Examinations are the yardstick of university education. Students will have corresponding study plans according to the type of examinations, which will affect the effectiveness of university education in the long run.
The Lanzhou Jiaotong University attaches great importance to the suggestion letter of students, and has deployed a rectification scheme in the whole school.
It is required that each teaching unit organize teachers to carry out discussions and self-examination of the final examination of courses, formulate examination question setting and related systems, and at the same time strengthen the supervision and inspection of examination question setting and review, refine the evaluation of scores, and strengthen the comprehensive assessment of all aspects of course teaching.
To solve the problems of single types of questions and repeated questions from the mechanism is an issue that needs to be faced by the university examination. Of course, relevant systems need to be issued, but the key is in daily efforts. Teachers need to have a comprehensive grasp of the teaching situation. Not only do they need to understand the teaching content, but they also need to understand the learning situation of the students. Only when both ends are understood will the teaching and learning be better connected, and a positive interaction will be formed. The exam will also be more in line with the actual situation, so that the "smart students" and "stupid students" can get what they want.
If I can't change the location of the store, can it be changed to delivery?
Then I don't have to give you any more money, do I?
Your colleague's order has already been delivered.
They can't pull it off.
What about GPS?
Mrs. Kim’s Bridal Photography (South Street Store) does not currently have a branch
Before the photo shoot, we changed the time twice because we could not arrange the time well. The advisor, Lanlan, was very patient and helped us arrange the time.
It was shot on a sunny weekend later on.
The staff of Mrs. Kim, whether it is a consultant, a makeup artist, or a photographer, are all excellent.
It was the first time in my life that I did a formal makeup, wow, I can't believe that one day I will become so beautiful, haha.
Xiao Jie and another girl (I'm sorry, I can't remember her name) are very patient and natural when doing makeup.
The outdoor scenes were shot in Jiangwan City. We were lucky that the weather was good that day, and we didn’t feel very cold. When we were taking photos, the makeup artist would pay attention to our clothes and headwear from time to time, and immediately help us arrange them if they were slightly out of place.
The photographer was also very funny and we had a lot of fun throughout the day.
When choosing photos, because I had seen many cases online, I did not want to let the guests delete too many photos. However, when we were choosing photos, we really did not want to add photos. We just selected the 24 photos in the package and did not add a single one (I heard that my cousin, who took wedding photos around the same time as me, added more than 10,000 photos to the 7,000-yuan package, and I was stunned at the time. I was also worried that I would choose too many photos).
The photos were retouched today, and Lan Lan sent them to me. I looked at two of them and felt that they were not very good, and they immediately helped me retouch them again.
I flipped through my sister's previous photos and compared them. I feel that our photos are really satisfying. They are simple and fresh, which is the style I want.
I sincerely recommend everyone to take wedding photos at Mrs. Jin's in Xuanhan!
Price of the package: 3,999 yuan
Mrs. Jin is grateful to have you sincerely wish you happiness and a bright future!
How much does this cost?
What conditions must be met for the $32 to be used?
That's good, I don't need a refund
Your jockey says he can't find it
I can't find it
But I didn't understand what he was saying in English
Our editor has brought you which Omega mechanical watch is good?
How good is the Omega mechanical clock?
1、Swiss OmegaOMEGA disc flying series couple's watch, automatic mechanical men's watch, quartz women's watch
Reason for recommendation: Swiss tradition, time art is in the wrist, Omega is dignified and elegant, plain and simple, not ostentatious but very charming. It can be worn for both commuting and formal occasions.
Couples' style, expressing the sweetness of love between the two people, always together, exquisite pointer, heart-stirring.
No quotes available
2. Swiss OMEGA (OMEGA) watch disc fly series steel strap automatic mechanical men's couple watch quartz lady's watch 424.10.0.20.02.002/27.60.55.001
Reason for recommendation: Swiss-made, must be exquisite, Omega watch, a thin and elegant gold watch, couple watch, which can not only show the noble identity, but also show the sweet love.
The design of the pointer scale makes the time scale clearer. The dial adopts the popular blue dial, and the overall design is simple and bright.
The OMEGA brand, the strap material is a steel strap, the dial color is blue, the movement type is mechanical (automatic), the waterproof function is 30 meters, the display type is a pointer, nationwide warranty, the strap interface type is a flat interface, the bottom material is fine steel, the dial size is 39.5mm for men's watch and 27.4mm for women's watch, the strap interface size is 20mm, the buckle type is a butterfly buckle, the lens material is artificial sapphire crystal glass, there are 3 people who have evaluated it, and it has received a 100% praise rate.
3, Swiss Omega OMEGA Butterfly Series Couple Watches Men's Automatic Mechanical Women's Quartz 424.10.37.20.01.001/24.60.01.001
Reason for recommendation: Swiss-made, quality benchmark, the movement of this Omega watch is very accurate, couple design, simple and elegant appearance, the passage of time flows from the edge of the pointer, always continuing at a steady pace, suitable for business people to wear, to release the charm of the wrist.
4. Swiss Omega (OMEGA) watch, disc fly series, automatic mechanical watch, men's watch, fashion lady's quartz watch, couple watch, a pair of watches
Omega couple's watch, a pair of watches, gold
Reason for recommendation: The original imported from Switzerland, its quality is naturally extraordinary. The Omega is dignified and elegant, plain and simple, not ostentatious but very attractive. It can be worn for commuting and formal occasions.
Fashionable and elegant, it is full of aesthetics and shows the elegant temperament of ladies. The jumping of the pointer makes me fall in love with you at first sight.
This watch comes with a steel strap, a mechanical movement (automatic), a folding clasp, a water resistance of 30 meters, a dial size of 39.5 for men and 27.4 for women, a pointer display, a nationwide warranty, a flat interface for the strap, a stainless steel case back, a white dial color, the Omega brand, a 18mm strap interface size, an artificial sapphire crystal glass for the watch glass, and currently 20+ people have evaluated it, and it has received 100% positive reviews.
Should I return the curry base to you?
I only got half of it
I haven't seen six of them delivered.
The company is working overtime and has not eaten at noon. I want to order food delivery, but I don’t know that the order will be cancelled
Your name is Zheng Mian. This is your second week in Japan.
You're walking down the street and you feel like someone is following you, so you start walking faster and faster until you're running.
The man behind you caught up: "Miss! Please wait!" (The whole conversation is in Japanese.) You stopped in front of the convenience store.
“Miss, I am a director. I think you are beautiful. Would you be interested in participating in a reality show?”
You're confused, and you're afraid it's a scam.
He hands you his business card, and you discover that he is, in fact, the director of one of Japan's largest entertainment companies.
"Miss, if you have time, we can talk in the company. The remuneration will definitely not be less."
You went with him to the company in a muddle. He said he saw you on the street at a glance and really hoped you could come.
You thought you had nothing to lose, and you could make some money, so you signed the contract.
It's a large-scale dating reality show, divided into two parts.
In the early stages, it will allow celebrities and ordinary people to get along in real life, and cultivate tacit understanding.
After that, they will enter the game to pass the levels together.
It's going to start recording properly next week, you don't know who your partner's going to be, you don't know what's going to happen?
Will the system be able to see the new order?
What will happen to that rider?
I don't think I can accept an order that hasn't been delivered in 20 minutes
3,200 newborn babies in Sabah have no birth certificates as anti-counterfeiting paper is out of stock
(Sandakan, October 11) The Sabah National Registration Department said that due to the lack of special anti-counterfeiting paper, it has not been able to issue birth certificates to newborn babies since the beginning of October, and a total of 3,200 people have been affected so far.
However, the director of the agency, Keruaminus, assured that all the information of the babies who have already applied for the birth certificate has been recorded in the system and will be re-issued when the counterfeit paper arrives next week.
He explained at a press conference, in response to a media report that the Sarawak Report was printed on paper for as long as 10 months.
He said the problem has been around for the past two months, and Sarawak is facing the same problem.
"One of the reasons is that the Chinese manufacturer of special anti-counterfeiting paper has been affected by the epidemic, which has led to a delay in its delivery to our country. "
He explained that the security paper used by the Sarawak Report is different from that used in other areas, so it cannot be borrowed from other states.
Khairul Amni said the latest batch of security paper had arrived in Kuala Lumpur on June 6 and was handed over to the printing company on June 8 for part of the printing work.
"The department will send people to Kuala Lumpur to pick up the goods next Thursday, return to Sabah for the final stage of printing, and it is estimated that it will be handed over to the applicant within two working days (December 20). "
"We will notify the applicants to go to the local police station to get the birth certificate. "
He added that Sabah has issued a total of 24,801 birth certificates so far this year.
From 7 o'clock until now
Is it almost here?
I'm talking about food
I'm waiting across from #PRS_ORG#
Ok, thank you, as the restaurant said it was ready
Commentator of People's Daily: "the 14th five-year plan" has made a good start -- on the study and implementation of the spirit of the Central Economic Work Conference -- Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 11 - People’s Daily, December 12, editorial: “the 14th Five-Year Plan” achieved a good start - on learning and implementing the spirit of the Central Economic Work Conference
The Central Economic Work Conference held from December 8 to 10 highly praised the achievements of China's economic and social development in the past year.
General Secretary Xi Jinping made an important speech at the meeting. He made a profound summary of the economic work in 2021, made a deep analysis of the current economic situation, and made major arrangements for the economic work in 2022, which pointed out the direction for us to do a good job in next year's economic work, welcomed the successful convening of the 20th National Congress of the Communist Party of China, and provided fundamental principles.
We solemnly celebrated the 100th anniversary of the founding of the Communist Party of China, formally announced the full construction of a moderately prosperous society and the realization of the first centenary goal, and started the comprehensive construction of a socialist modern country and marched towards the second centenary goal.
We held the 6th Plenary Session of the 19th CPC Central Committee, summarized the major achievements and historical experiences of the Party's century-long struggle, and passed the third historical resolution in the history of the Party, the "Resolution of the CPC Central Committee on the Major Achievements and Historical Experience of the Party's Century of Struggle", which is a political manifesto for the Communist Party of China in the new era to remember its original mission, adhere to and develop socialism with Chinese characteristics, and is an action guide for learning from history, creating the future, and realizing the great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation.
In the past year, the world has experienced unprecedented major changes and the global COVID-19 pandemic. The external environment has become more complicated and severe, and the COVID-19 epidemic prevention and control and economic and social development tasks in China are extremely difficult.
The Party Central Committee with Comrade Xi Jinping as the core adheres to the overall coordination of the two major situations at home and abroad, adheres to the general policy of seeking progress while maintaining stability, remains calm in the face of a century of changes and a century of epidemics, coordinates epidemic prevention and control and economic and social development, accelerates the construction of a new development pattern, strengthens the cross-cycle regulation of macro policies, and strives to promote the sustainable and healthy development of the economy, and strives to deepen reform, opening up, and innovation, and work hard to complete the arduous tasks of reform and development, and new major achievements have been made in all undertakings of the party and the country.
The "14th Five-Year Plan" has achieved a good start, and an important aspect of this is that the construction of a new development pattern has taken new steps, and high-quality development has achieved new results.
Our economic development and epidemic prevention and control have maintained a leading position in the world, and the characteristics of strong development resilience, great potential and sufficient power continue to be manifested; the national strategic scientific and technological forces have accelerated their growth, major innovation achievements have emerged one after another, and the scientific and technological innovation capabilities have continued to improve, and the breakthrough of key core technologies has been achieved; the resilience of the industrial chain has been enhanced, and the quality and quantity of foreign trade has been increased, and the structure has continued to be optimized, and the new momentum represented by new industries, new business formats and new models has grown and become stronger; reform and opening-up has moved forward in depth, and efforts have been made to unblock the bottlenecks restricting supply and demand adaptation and the flow of factors, and create new advantages in cooperation and competition through high-level opening-up to the outside world; the livelihood guarantee has been strong and effective, the employment scale has continued to expand, the growth of residents' income has been basically synchronized with economic growth, and the total grain output has been kept above 1.3 trillion catties for seven consecutive years, achieving the “18 consecutive harvests”; the construction of ecological civilization has continued to move forward, and the work
These achievements are the results of the strong leadership of the Party Central Committee with Comrade Xi Jinping at its core, the scientific guidance of Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for a New Era, and the concerted efforts and hard work of the whole party and all ethnic groups across the country.
Practice has once again proved that the Party's establishment of Comrade Xi Jinping as the core of the Party Central Committee and the core of the whole Party, and the establishment of the guiding status of Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for a New Era, are of decisive significance to the development of the Party and the country in the new era, and to the advancement of the historical process of the great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation.
With General Secretary Xi Jinping as the core of the Party Central Committee and the core of the entire party, with the scientific guidance of Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for a New Era, with the unity of the whole party and all ethnic groups in the country, and with the tenacious struggle, we will definitely be able to overcome all kinds of difficulties and hardships, and create a new era of glory and a new historical feat in the new journey of building a socialist modern country in all respects.
Next year, the 20th National Congress of the Communist Party of China will be held, which is a major event in the political life of the Party and the country.
To carry forward the great spirit of building the party, to adhere to the general tone of steady progress, to comprehensively, accurately and fully implement the new development concept, to accelerate the construction of a new development pattern, to comprehensively deepen reform and opening up, to adhere to innovation-driven development, to promote high-quality development, to adhere to supply-side structural reform as the main line, to coordinate epidemic prevention and control and economic and social development, to coordinate development and security, to continue to do well the "six stabilities" and "six guarantees" work, to continue to improve people's livelihood, to focus on stabilizing the macro economy, to keep the economy running within a reasonable range, to maintain social stability, and we will definitely maintain a stable and healthy economic environment, a peaceful and stable social environment, and a clean and upright political environment, and meet the 20th National Congress of the Communist Party of China with outstanding achievements.
Let's unite more closely around the CPC Central Committee with Comrade Xi Jinping as the core, strengthen the "Four Consciousnesses", strengthen the "Four Self-Confidences", and achieve the "Two Safeguards". We will continuously improve our political judgment, political understanding and political execution, and implement the decisions and deployments of the Party Central Committee with practical actions, and continuously promote the cause of socialism with Chinese characteristics in the new era.
Then I'll use the points to place a new order, thank you
Where is the pick-up address?
I can't see the address
Download the Suning.com APP
Pay attention to the public account of Suning pushers
Self-purchase to save money and sharing to make money
Download the Suning Financial APP
Pay attention to the service number of Suning.com
It is very convenient, just like opening it on a computer, and it solved the problem of my computer's insufficient hard disk space.
The newly arrived solid-state mobile hard disk cannot be read by the solid-state mobile hard disk computer, the solid-state mobile hard disk computer does not recognize it, and the U disk computer can read it.
The machine is very light in weight and has a grand and beautiful appearance.
I used it for an afternoon today. The heat dissipation is very good. It is basically impossible to feel hot. The running speed is very fast. It kills 99% of users at start-up.
The battery is also very strong, with 9 hours of standby and 4 hours of use. Overall, I feel very happy to be able to buy a machine of this quality at this price. Other functions will be added later.
Looks good.
In terms of performance, it needs to be evaluated after a period of time.
The machine is fast, bigger than expected, and the rendering effect is excellent. I like it, and I will follow up after using it for a period of time.
Not bad, not bad. The serial number of the machine can be found on the Hong Kong** website, and the quality should be OK.
**It doesn't feel big, it's heavy, and it can't be held in one hand. In fact, it's not that big. It's only a little bigger than a 15.6-inch laptop. It runs very stably and doesn't feel stuck. I love the sound of the fan's heat dissipation. It has a sense of feeling, and it doesn't spin like a gaming laptop.
The goods are not bad, much cheaper than the official flagship store, and also sent a backpack. I think it's pretty good.
The store service is also good, reminding me to update the BIOS, and immediately issued the **.
Worth it!
Heat dissipation effect: The heat dissipation is very good, and there is basically no heat. Thinness: It is convenient to carry. Appearance material: The traditional design of Thinkpad is satisfactory.
The seller has a good reputation. They have checked the appearance and all the interfaces of the whole machine carefully. There are no traces of refurbishment or use. It is indeed a brand-new American machine with the same configuration as the page.
I forgot to send a backpack, and immediately helped me send a backpack. Although it is not the original factory backpack, in terms of service follow-up, it is enough to prove that it is a conscientious seller.
If you have friends who need to buy a laptop, you can buy it again.
Appearance materials: The appearance is atmospheric. The display effect: the screen resolution is good, clear, thin and light: it has a good texture, after all, the heavier the thing feels better.
Heat dissipation effect: I will evaluate it later.
The keyboard typing is quite good. It also comes with a mouse and a converter. The configuration is very cost-effective compared to the domestic version. Overall, it's cheap and beautiful. As for the performance of the machine, it will be evaluated after using it for a period of time.
This screen is really comfortable!
It is very smooth to use, and I will review it after using it for a period of time!
Education News: Beijing Compresses the Proportion of 2016 Junior High School Admission Special Students - Xinhua News Agency
From the 21st to the 22nd, the examination work of Beijing middle school entrance special students was unified organized and implemented by each district education bureau.
This year, all districts in Beijing have compressed the enrollment ratio of special students, and the competition for special students has become more intense.
Take Dongcheng District as an example. This year, the enrollment proportion of junior high school students in Dongcheng District is not more than 5% of the enrollment plan of the whole district. The enrollment plan is 380 people, and the enrollment proportion is not more than 10% of the enrollment plan of the school.
All students who have sports, art, and scientific talents and register online are eligible to participate in the special enrollment examination.
In order to facilitate students to participate in the examination nearby, Dongcheng District will continue the examination arrangements of last year, and set up 1-2 examination sites in each district, with a total of 13 examination sites.
The examination points will be divided according to the examination area, and the time will be divided into hours. On the examination day, the students will enter the examination points according to the time and take the examination in different examination rooms in different examination areas.
On May 23, the Education and Examination Center of the district posted the list of students who passed the examination on the Internet, and students can query the results of the examination on the Internet.
Can it be delivered in 10 to 15 minutes?
Did not receive food
The key is that I didn't eat tonight
If you can't send it, you can say it earlier
President of Bosnia and Herzegovina Olympic Committee: Believes China Has the Ability to Hold a Good Winter Olympics in Special Times - Xinhua Net
Xinhua News Agency, Sarajevo, December 11 - Kvesic, the chairman of the Olympic Committee of Bosnia and Herzegovina, said recently that the Bosnian side is very much looking forward to the Beijing Winter Olympics and believes that China has the ability to hold the Winter Olympics in special times.
Recently, Chinese Ambassador to Bosnia and Herzegovina, Ji Ping, met with the President of the Olympic Committee of Bosnia and Herzegovina, Kvezic, at the Olympic Center in Sarajevo.
During the meeting, Kvesic positively evaluated the China-Bosnia and Herzegovina relationship and said that he visited China at the time of the Beijing Summer Olympic Games in 2008. He was deeply impressed by the excellent organizational work of the Chinese side and believed that China has the ability to hold the Winter Olympic Games in a special period; the Bosnian side is very much looking forward to the Beijing Winter Olympic Games and the Bosnian Olympic Committee is actively organizing participation; the Bosnian side hopes to use this opportunity to carry out more extensive exchanges and cooperation with the Chinese side in the field of sports.
Zhiping said that there is a special “Olympic bond” between China and Poland.
The 1984 Sarajevo Winter Olympic Games were successfully held here, and two months later, the 2022 Beijing Winter Olympic Games will also open, presenting a simple, safe, and wonderful event to the world.
It is expected that the two countries will deepen exchanges and cooperation in the preparation of winter sports events and athletes' training, and the Chinese Embassy in Bosnia and Herzegovina is willing to continue to play the role of a bridge, taking the Beijing Winter Olympics as an opportunity to promote the deepening of people-to-people exchanges between the two countries, so that the people of the two countries can "move towards the future" together, and wish the athletes of Bosnia and Herzegovina to achieve good results in Beijing.
Before the meeting, the Bosnia and Herzegovina Olympic Committee held the "10th Annual Best Athlete" awards ceremony. Ji Ping was invited as a special guest to award the best young athlete in Bosnia and Herzegovina.
The promotional video of the Beijing Winter Olympics was played in a loop at the event.
So disappointing
Will there be a refund?
Not good enough! The shipping fee is also 20 yuan
There's no way! Can you ask that restaurant for me?
Thank you for following along, of course some of the jockeys have done very well too.
Chocolate Fever [French] by Dominique Enno, translated by Miao Xiaoxia, Shanghai Science and Technology Publishing House
Original books support 7-day no-reason return and exchange.
Grandma's New Year's Eve says learn, play, and sing the twenty-four solar terms and see the distant mountains in the clear winter. Grandpa is a stupid kid. My grandma lives in a weird town. Dumplings and glutinous rice balls, a piece of chocolate, 2022.
[Nora Books] The original version of "Crying Chocolate" and "The Thief's Little Palm Fairy Tale Pinyin Edition" by Zhang Qiusheng, the original version of grades one to three, the original version of the selected collection of classic story books, children's reading materials, and extracurricular books for primary school students
[Jia Ying Financial Book] 2022 big reading, small forest, 100 classes, 1,000 people, 2nd grade, grandma's New Year's Eve, a piece of chocolate, 24 solar terms, grandpa is a stupid kid, my grandma lives in a strange town, dumplings and soup
[Nora Book] Original version of Charlie and the Great Glass Elevator by Roald Dahl, a collection of works by Roald Dahl, a sequel to Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, translated by Ren Rongsong, children's literature for 7-9-12 years old, 3-4-5-6
There are a total of 13 books, the amazing father of the fox, Charlie's chocolate factory, the collection of Roald Dahl's works, children's reading stories, 9-12 years old, non-phonetic version of extracurricular books for the second, fourth and fifth grades of primary school, and the circle of Matilda.
The Horrible Science series has 72 books in total, and there are 12 books in the classic mathematics series. The new knowledge of classic science, the mystery of nature, the shocking electricity, the secret of chocolate, the deadly mathematics, and the popular science reading books for grades 3, 4, 5 and 6.
Some books are priced higher than the original price. Please be careful when you place an order.
Chocolate in the office: Seven tips for work and happiness (German) Written by Weisner - Translated by Chen Bao, published by Yunnan Science and Technology Publishing House [Original book, full amount reduction.
[Fast invoice, coupon orders, quality after-sales, support 7-day no-reason return and exchange]
The six original volumes of "Nora Books" were said by Zuo Qing to have 100 classes and 1,000 people, second-grade extracurricular books, a piece of chocolate, a grandfather who is a stupid kid, saying that he will learn, play and sing 24 solar terms, clear winter and distant mountain dumplings, and moon cake picture book My grandmother
[Nora Books] Original, little monster Ulala, 8 volumes of enlightenment picture books, exploring the chocolate factory, transforming transportation tools, luggage transportation big adventure, picture storybooks for 3-4-5-6 years old
[Nora Books] Original, you don't know coffee+wine+bread+chocolate+tea, baking, cooking, tasting, making, appreciation, food control, food culture, books are interesting and interesting fashion lifestyle small encyclopedia
won the White Bread Children's Book Award and is suitable for reading in grades three, four, five and six of primary school. It is a story book, a book for reading in the winter and summer vacations, and a book for reading outside of class.
【NORA Books】Original [3 Volumes] French Blue Ribbon Sweet Delicacies, Chocolate Dessert Class, Creative Works of World Dessert Masters, 100 Recipes for Beginners
[Nora Books] Three originals, the complete collection of Roald Dahl's works, Charlie and the Chocolate Factory + Matilda + The Story of a Good Boy's Childhood 6-12-year-old reading children's literature original children's literature
Hi, I've been waiting for this order for a very long time
It's been delayed over and over again.
Thank you
Could you help me cancel and re-order each order?
I only get credit when he orders?
Did you miss this order?
What time can it be sent?
That's not going to happen
The code includes four $20 discounts.
#NAME# said he helped me re-order
I re-ordered and they charged me again
But I placed my order at 1:30 a.m.
48 hours of negative nucleic acid tests, setting up a "buffer zone" The State Council's joint prevention and control mechanism issued a document to strengthen the prevention and control of the epidemic at port cities - Xinhua Network
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 11 (Reporters Dong Rufeng and Gu Tiancheng) The State Council’s joint prevention and control mechanism recently issued a notice on strengthening the prevention and control of the new coronavirus epidemic in port cities, requiring people who have recently left land border port cities (excluding those with ports connected to Hong Kong and Macao) to hold a 48-hour nucleic acid test negative certificate, and people arriving in land border port cities to undergo at least one nucleic acid test after arrival.
According to the notice, the time range for the above requirements is from the date when each province, autonomous region and municipality determine and announce the scope of port cities to March 15, 2022.
In addition, the notice also proposes that port cities with conditions can study the establishment of an epidemic prevention and control buffer zone within their jurisdiction.
A relevant official from the National Health and Family Planning Commission's Disease Prevention and Control Bureau introduced that for some port cities, cross-border trade is the main economic pillar of the area, and the border residents visit each other frequently.
Implementing differentiated management policies for different regions, changing from one line of prevention and control of spillover to two lines of prevention and control, is expected to achieve the effect of moving the checkpoints forward, compress the risk of epidemic spillover, and achieve the maximum effect of epidemic prevention and control with the minimum social impact and the lowest social cost.
Recently, China has seen a number of local cluster outbreaks, all of which were imported from overseas through port cities.
The above notice pointed out that this exposed some problems such as the lack of timeliness of epidemic monitoring and warning in some places, the non-implementation of closed-loop management for high-risk personnel, the formality of regular nucleic acid testing, the lack of disinfection at each link of cold chain items, the non-standard management of concentrated isolation places, and the lack of scientific and precise epidemic prevention and control.
The notice requires that efforts be made in nine aspects such as improving the epidemic prevention and control mechanism of port cities, perfecting the epidemic monitoring and warning system, and implementing border control measures, so as to accelerate the filling of the short board and weak links in the prevention and control of port cities, and do a good job in prevention and control without slackness and in a scientific and precise manner, and weave a dense and firm line of defense against external input.
The notice emphasized that port cities should study and deploy epidemic prevention and control and people's livelihood protection work at the same time, publish and make the hotline for people's livelihood protection available, regularly check for signs and hidden dangers in the supply of basic living materials and prices, and promptly solve and actively respond to prominent problems reflected by the masses.
According to the notice, the port cities referred to include the counties (cities, districts, banners) where the open land, water, and air ports are located, as well as the cities (prefectures, provinces, leagues) and municipalities where the ports are located. The specific scope will be determined and promptly announced by each province (autonomous region, municipality directly under the central government) according to the needs of epidemic prevention and control.
Color: as the picture color (the color difference in the picture is unavoidable, the closest color of the real object will be explained, the outdoor light will make the color of the clothes brighter, please consult in advance before buying)
This item is vintage. First-time vintage buyers, please search "vintage" or "old clothes" on Baidu.
A one-off.
Vintage items are bound to have small flaws, so if you decide to buy vintage products, you should be mentally prepared for this. If you are a perfectionist, please think carefully before taking pictures. I will explain the more obvious flaws. This is the characteristic of vintage products. In my opinion, good things don't care about that little bit of impact!
The vintage products in the store do not accept returns or exchanges.
The so-called vintage, vintage, design will have a retro sense of age, that is, nostalgia. The reason why I like vintage is that I like its sense of time and its texture!
So don't say the clothes are old-fashioned, just say you're not suitable!
It is advisable for those with no risk-taking ability to buy with caution, as online shopping is risky, and purchases should be made with care.
If the item is not suitable for the buyer or they do not like it, they can ask the shopkeeper to put it back on the shelf. Once it is sold, it cannot be returned or exchanged. Please do not bid if you cannot meet the requirements. Thank you for your cooperation!
It was sold in some circles on June 11, 2021.
If you like the number, please place an order. No refunds or exchanges for antique items.
Purchasing Notes
All items sold by us are non-returnable and non-exchangeable
Please spend a few minutes to read the purchase notes
Our items are all photographed in kind. Some products may have a little color difference due to problems such as the display and light. If you do not accept any color difference, please read this clearly. Consider carefully before buying, and color difference will not be used as the reason for negative reviews and return and exchange.
We do not accept the reasons of not being the same as imagined, the style and style do not match as the reason for the return, exchange and negative comments.
The size is measured by the real object, and the error must exist. However, we believe that the error is very small. If you receive the size that does not fit, it cannot be returned or exchanged, so you must consider it carefully in advance.
If you have any questions, please contact me immediately, and I will do my best to solve them. If there is a malicious bad review, I will complain to the end.
We will check every item carefully before it is sent out, and the quality will not be a problem.
After receiving the clothes, please confirm the receipt and give a comment within 48 hours. Please understand our hard work.
YouTube video uncovers the truth about the US military's 20 years of bloodthirsty killing - Xinhua News Agency
(Video Source: YouTube)
On December 11, the micro-documentary titled "Killing Machines" on the YouTube platform attracted widespread attention.
The film tells the story of the United States launching the Afghanistan war in the name of "counter-terrorism" and forcibly exporting American-style democracy through war. The 20-year war of attrition, bloodthirsty, indiscriminate killing and committing all kinds of crimes against humanity.
They abused drones to attack hospitals, schools and other civilian facilities, twisted human nature, and established a murder group.
In the past 20 years, the U.S. military has killed tens of thousands of innocent Afghan civilians.
The US military set up a "black prison" to torture and humiliate "suspects".
One atrocity after another has stoked more hatred among the Afghan people.
As the video says, the U.S. "anti-terrorism" war is "the more you fight, the more you fear".
The war has not brought peace, democracy and prosperity to the Afghan people, but only a devastated country and countless killings and destructions.
Click on the video and let's expose the truth of the bloodthirsty massacre in the name of "anti-terrorism" in the United States, and expose the hypocrisy of American democracy!
I happened to see an article like this, from a business perspective and from the perspective of the preservation period, it talks about why this customer wants a logistics company in the free trade zone to do the canning. Although canning is a deep processing, it is not within the scope of business of the free trade zone logistics company. The following text may explain why the customer wants to do this?
I have visited many milk powder factories and come into contact with many milk powder production lines.
In fact, the powdered milk in bags and cans are exactly the same, and there is no difference between them.
Then everyone will certainly ask: why is the shelf life of bagged products one year, while that of canned products is two years or longer?
Or ask: Why is there such a big price difference between listening and bagging?
In fact, from this point of view, many consumers, or mothers, believe that this is because the raw materials are different, so the quality will be much better.
In fact, the raw material is the same, but everyone thinks that the more expensive it is, the better it is.
There are also consumers who ate it with this attitude and said that the taste or flavor is different after eating it!
Now, I would like to talk to you first about the reason why it is expensive to listen to. Where is it expensive?
Why is there such a big price difference when their raw materials are the same?
Because most of the manufacturers consider that if the bagged price is too high, it will be difficult for consumers to accept, which means that the profit of manufacturers is very low, or there is no profit. How can the manufacturers survive?
Therefore, they had a large increase in the price of hearing aids to guarantee their profit space.
Therefore, most manufacturers mainly promote hearing aids, rather than bags.
There are also so many manufacturers that want to spend tens of millions or even hundreds of millions on advertising every year. Where does this cost come from?
You can imagine.
With the development of society, the cost of market promotion, such as the cost of promotional staff in shopping malls, the cost of display in shopping malls, the cost of gifts for products, the cost of advertising, etc., are constantly increasing.
Therefore, various manufacturers are constantly adding new products, and they are hearing aids, and their prices are also constantly rising. In fact, this is a new product that comes out with the increase in market costs.
The main purpose is to get higher profits, in fact, the cost of their raw materials will not exceed 3 to 4 yuan.
There are also some brands, in order to promote their products, no matter what the means, hook up with doctors in the hospital, and ask them to assist in the promotion of the products, and make a profit of 30 yuan to 80 yuan from it.
The relevant Chinese laws absolutely do not allow such operation methods. In fact, this practice is harming consumers.
It is suggested that people buy bagged milk powder and put it into cans at home, which can save money, increase the preservation and sealing of the milk powder, and have no effect on children.
In addition, everyone should not think that the shelf life of bags of rice is longer than that of bags of rice. If the shelf life of bags of rice and bags of rice is the same after opening, it is just that the bags of rice are not easy to save after opening and are prone to dampness and deterioration.
The delivery was late, the food was cold, and then it was dry and hard after it was cold. It was completely inedible.
And the soup spilled out
Cancel now, anything he's #PRS_ORG# resubmitted will be cold by now
I didn't get it!
#NAME# said you didn't have anyone to go get it
We called over there
If you don't give me my money back, I'll call the police.
Multiple times using #PRS_ORG, today was the worst experience
Completely unacceptable
Yes, I can.
But we also have to remind the restaurants and the couriers.
To avoid it from happening again
I want to know the exact delivery time
That time is constantly delayed
I don't know when that's going to happen
If I cancel the order, can I get my money back?
How do I pay a rider a service fee?
One rider was confirmed to have died more than an hour ago.
They don't want to wait any longer
Don't scare people at the starting line - Xinhua News Agency
At book fairs, you can often feel the popularity of success education books.
Many of today's self-help books promote the "best principle" - that is, first assume or imply that you can "do it," and then tell you what you need to "do."
That is to say, it is to skip over the most important and most fundamental link of "how to do it".
This is why all of these books have one thing in common - they are either all or nothing; they are either 100 or 0; they either take you to the top of the mountain or they don't take you anywhere at all.
This "best practice" is so "right" that anyone who sees it will admit it, but 99% of people will be intimidated before the starting line.
Because this theory advocates a path of "You have to make up your mind, start over, and make a 180-degree change," which is the fatal weakness of many people.
For those who are conservative, follow the old rules and refuse to change, if you shout "you have to change" in his ear, it is undoubtedly self-deception and beating a dead horse.
Most people will be at a loss in the face of the word "transformation" and will not move forward or make a decision; or they will make a decision based on a momentary impulse and bravely take the first step, but it is often short-lived, and it is difficult to last for a long time.
Mr. Ma Sanli's famous cross-talk "From Tomorrow On" is a classic that best embodies this "universal humanity".
The biggest problem with the "best principle" is that the threshold is too high, and it often exceeds the limits of ordinary people, making it impossible for the vast majority of people to reach.
Perhaps, the "next best principle" is a way for more ordinary people to take the path to relative success.
The core of the "second-best principle" is "lowering the threshold" -- it encourages a theory of "small wins", that if you can't do 100, you can do 1; because 1 is always greater than 0; if you can't climb Mount Tai, you can climb the little sand dunes in front of your door; because that is always better than standing in place.
All in all, doing something is better than doing nothing.
With the threshold greatly reduced, it is more possible for ordinary people to persist, and as long as they persist, the probability of success will also increase.
However, the road to success following the "next best principle" is just a little longer.
In short, "the best principle" though it sounds like it's for everyone's success, in the end it can actually motivate only a few, and "the next best principle" can effectively motivate more people and benefit more people as much as possible.
Do I need to re-order now?
No one answered the phone.
Never-ending delays
Haven't received it yet
When will it be delivered?
How can I get in touch?
Please cancel the order
I can't wait anymore, thank you
He was two deliveries short, but one order was complete
How do I contact the rider?
The first jockey I spoke to earlier said there would be another rider sent out
The resource of Qinghai Lake naked carp increased by 0.71 thousand tons this year - Xinhua Net
Xining, Dec. 11, 2018 (Xinhua) -- According to a reporter from the Qinghai Provincial Department of Agriculture and Rural Affairs, the latest monitoring results show that the resource of naked carp in Qinghai Lake increased by 0.71 thousand tons this year, reaching 10.85 thousand tons. Compared with the initial protection period in 2002, it has increased by more than 40 times.
The naked carp of Qinghai Lake, also known as "Huan fish", is a unique and precious fish species in Qinghai Lake. It plays a crucial role in maintaining the safety and biodiversity of the "water-fish-bird" ecological chain in the Qinghai Lake basin.
In the 1960s and 1970s, due to the influence of many factors such as large-scale human hunting and the deterioration of the breeding environment of the naked carp, the number of naked carp in Qinghai Lake decreased sharply. In 2002, the reserves of naked carp in Qinghai Lake were only 2592 tons.
In 2004, the Qinghai Lake naked carp was listed as an endangered species in the Red List of Chinese Species.
Since 2003, Qinghai Province has implemented the closed-lake fishery and prohibited any units, collectives and individuals from catching naked carp in Qinghai Lake and its main rivers and tributaries, and prohibited the sale of naked carp and its products.
At the same time, through artificial propagation and release, as well as cleaning up the main rivers that flow into Qinghai Lake, as well as the design of a scientific and reasonable "fishway", the protection efforts have been continuously strengthened, and the resource reserves of the naked carp in Qinghai Lake have increased year by year.
Deputy Director-General Yang Lin of the Qinghai Provincial Department of Agriculture and Rural Affairs introduced that, as of now, nearly 180 million naked carp in Qinghai Lake have implemented artificial breeding and release, and the contribution rate to the restoration of naked carp resources in Qinghai Lake has exceeded 23%.
Qinghai Sanjiangyuan Region is an important ecological barrier and water conservation area in China and even in Asia, and Qinghai Lake is a natural barrier and ecological functional zone to control the eastward expansion of the desert in the west.
In order to protect the ecological environment of the Three-Rivers Source Region and Qinghai Lake, protect aquatic wild animals, and maintain the biodiversity of the Qinghai-Tibet Plateau, Qinghai successively issued the fishing ban notices of the Yangtze River, the Yellow River, and Qinghai Lake this year, and built a comprehensive fishing ban management system of "one river, one river, and one lake".
I spent more than $180 on food using my #PRS_ORG# RED credit card.
But the order did not deduct $20.
Original software for free trial, computer and mobile phone use, and no paper version
2022 Notes on "Advanced English-Chinese Translation Theory and Practice" (2nd edition) by Ye Jun and explanation of real examination questions for postgraduate entrance examination/Master's degree entrance examination syllabus, tutorial materials, review materials, and entrance examination
2022 Notes and homework exercises (including typical questions) of "Modern Television Journalism" by Ye Zi/Master's entrance examination syllabus teaching materials review materials entrance examination questions
Original mobile photography for beginners: it's easier than you think to take beautiful pictures, and here are some tips for taking pictures, photography composition and use of light techniques, mobile photography tutorials, and app software for post-processing photography
High-quality books, genuine guarantee, quality service, timely delivery, worry-free after-sales.
Red Hat Linux System Administration Handbook (with CD)
Animal novel king Shen Shixi's collection of books: Tiger kid and golden leaf [If you need group purchase, please contact customer service]
The book information is collected and uploaded by the software. If there is any error in the information, the real object received shall prevail. If you have any objection, please do not shoot!
If you have any questions, please contact the online customer service!
The restaurant only gave me one bag, and I had to put it in the bag when it was cold.
I just wanted to ask, is the takeaway put in a bag?
We only see one bag
Just wanted to know if it was lost or if someone took it, thanks
It's been an hour, and it hasn't arrived yet
I just read an essay about a fake example. It was too long.
For those men who don't know, here's a little education.
Most girls will experience their first period on a random day between the ages of 13 and 15, and will stop menstruating in their late 40s or early 50s.
After that, under the premise of good health, it will be more regular to come once a month.
But it is not regular enough to make accurate predictions, with a margin of error of about a week, so it is necessary to prepare in advance, and sometimes bad luck will lead to a crash (suddenly a few days in advance).
The length of time, the amount of blood, and the intensity of the cramps vary from person to person. Some people have it for three days, some people have it for a week; some people have light periods, some people have heavy periods; some people don't feel anything, some people need an ambulance to take them to the hospital, and the intensity of the cramps can change over time; what wasn't painful before doesn't mean it will never be painful again.
Menstruation is uncontrolled, bleeding 24 hours a day from start to finish. All you can do is use sanitary napkins or sanitary pads to suck up the blood to prevent it from flowing onto clothes or chairs.
Dysmenorrhea is mainly caused by the secretion of prostaglandins. If you take ibuprofen as soon as the period starts, you can effectively relieve the pain that month, but it is useless to take it after the dysmenorrhea starts.
Before a period, due to increased blood flow to the uterus and excessive release of prostaglandins, it is easy to have diarrhea.
If you are around your cycle and have a sudden bout of diarrhea, you will likely get your period within two days.
It is best to change sanitary pads every two or three hours, otherwise it is easy to breed bacteria. Excluding sleeping time, the worst case is to change 6 times a day, 7 days a month, that is, 42 pieces, and if you add the number of pieces prepared in advance, there may be 50 pieces, which is not a piece a month.
(Change the sanitary pads every 5 to 6 hours at most, up to 8 hours)
During menstruation, the hormones can make you more irritable, and during the ovulation period, because of the changes in hormones in the body, the mood will be unstable, which is very unfortunate, and the body will get in the way.
But the official crime rate data shows that women's ability to control their emotions is very high, and they will not use emotional issues as an excuse.
The flow is not just blood, it includes the shed lining of the uterus.
The endometrium is at its thinnest just after a period and then gradually thickens, which can be thought of as the uterus building a house (endometrium thickens) in preparation for a visitor. If the visitor doesn't arrive, it all gets torn down (menstruation) and a new house is built next month, and so on.
Menstruation is very inconvenient. For decades, you will bleed for a few days every month for 24 hours, and you will also have abdominal and lower back pain. Who is willing?
However, a person is born because his mother has menstruation. Menstruation is for preparing a 10-month-old house when you first come to this world. Everyone should thank his mother for the regular and healthy menstruation.
A lot of things about women were suppressed in the past. The society brainwashed women that they were dirty, shameful, and everyone thought that was the case, but times have changed.
If anyone feels that menstruation is disgusting, or feels that the preparation of the female body for the creation of life is disgusting, they should not say it in public. Girls should stand up and stop thinking that way. Men who have never experienced it, will never experience it, and do not know much about it, should not be so ungrateful and ignorant. How can they have the courage to face their mothers? How can they have the courage to want their children?
Finally, sisters, try sanitary napkins. They're really useful.
Today is the winter solstice, and it's a bit disappointing to send it wrong
They have to order separately for the children to eat.
I hope that in the midst of all the hustle and bustle of the stores, they will check the products.
Is a foot bath causing a tingling sensation due to an electric leak?
A suitable foot bath can play a good role in foot health care. Today, the editor of Gome will answer this question. I hope it will be helpful to friends.
As people's health awareness increases, foot bath tubs are becoming more and more popular among consumers, and a large number of products with different grades have emerged in the market, ranging from more than 100 yuan to more than 1,000 yuan. This gives consumers a lot of choices.
On the surface of relevant data, compared with traditional home appliances, the sales of health care home appliances such as foot bath are hot, but foot bath does not have a dedicated industry standard, so there are certain safety risks.
"Soaking your feet in electrically charged water is just too dangerous!"
Mr. Li told the reporter that recently, he bought a foot bath for his father as a birthday gift. However, when his father was soaking his feet, he felt the soles of his feet were numb.
At first, Mr. Li thought it was caused by the vibration function of the foot bath. Unexpectedly, after turning off the vibration function, his father still felt numb on the soles of his feet.
When Mr. Li used the electric pen to test, the electric pen actually lit up, and Mr. Li was surprised to find that the water in the foot bath was actually electrified.
Later, he contacted the merchant, and the merchant's attitude was not bad. Although the foot bath tub was returned, Mr. Li still felt unhappy.
Because he discovered that this already popular foot bath has no clear and detailed industry regulations in terms of the maximum temperature setting, who it is suitable for, and what materials ensure safety.
However, in general, a foot bath will not have an electrical problem, but it is not ruled out that some products are not strictly controlled when they leave the factory.
Therefore, when buying, choose a separate foot bath tub.
The separation of water and electricity is risk-free.
At the same time, you can take an electric pen at will.
The 13th Provincial Tea Expo opened - Visual News - Hunan Daily Network - Huasheng Online
Hunan Daily reported on December 10 (full-media reporter Zhang Shangwu, Hu Panpan, correspondent Liu Xiaoling, photography Li Jian) The 13th Hunan Tea Industry Expo and New Hu Red Tea Promotion was held at the Hunan International Convention and Exhibition Center this morning to showcase the tea industry, innovate tea technology, promote tea culture, and speed up the pursuit of the trillion-dollar tea industry target.
Hou Shouli, Vice Chairman of the Board of Directors of the All-China Federation of Supply and Marketing Cooperatives, and Ye Hong, Vice Chairman of the Provincial People's Congress Standing Committee, attended the opening ceremony.
Professor Liu Zhonghua, an academician of the Chinese Academy of Engineering, gave a grand introduction at the opening ceremony. He said that the origin of the lake red tea is new, and the red tea has risen to inject new impetus into the “five-color Hunan tea”.
In recent years, the provincial committee and provincial government have given strong support to the tea industry development, promoted the construction of the 100 billion yuan Hunan tea industry, and formed the development pattern of "three Xiang, four waters and five-colored tea".
The tea industry within the province has increased its innovation, with green tea, black tea, red tea and other major tea varieties taking turns to make efforts. The main tea-producing areas promote the integration of tea and tourism, and drive the increase in income of a large number of tea farmers.
The feng shui is changing, and red tea is making a comeback.
Experts in the tea industry in the province said that after picking green tea, red tea and black tea, tea farmers will have income all year round, and the value of tea gardens will rise straight up.
At the opening ceremony, the provincial leaders awarded the fourth batch of enterprises with the right to use the "Hunan Red Tea" trademark, and Xinchang was delighted to hold the "Hunan Red Tea Source".
At the Xinchuan Red Tea Exhibition Hall, Fujian tea merchants spotted a high-mountain tea called "Bingli Spring" and placed an order on the spot.
The secretary-general of the Provincial Tea Association, Wang Jun, said happily that the current epidemic and other factors have more or less affected the tea market, but from the scene of the tea fair, there are a lot of bright spots.
Xinhua Red Tea, a sip of red, has injected the connotation of tea culture. The popularity is high and the transaction is hot. The Hunan tea industry welcomes a new spring.
What if the food isn't hot? Can it be canceled?
I don't want it, it can't be delivered because there is no place to park below
Metaphysics is the study of questions that cannot be answered through rational reasoning and logic.
Metaphysics is the fundamental law of philosophy, which aims to explain the basic nature of existence and the world.
The Chinese translation "metaphysics" is derived from the words "形而上者谓之道，形而下者谓之器" in 《易经•系辞上传》, which was translated by the Japanese Inoue Tetsujiro (in the Meiji era) from metaphysic.
Branches of metaphysics include ontology, natural theology, and related issues.
Ontology is "the study of which words represent real existing entities, and which words only represent an idea."
Metaphysical naturalism is the denial of the existence of God.
Its underlying theory is that all phenomena can be explained by natural reasons, proposed by philosophers supporting science and evolutionism.
Methodological naturalism, on the other hand, refers to a method of research that is silent on the existence of God.
Spirit philosophy is a branch of philosophy that studies the essence of consciousness and their relationship with the body (especially the brain).
Dualism and monism are the two main schools of thought that discuss the relationship between the mind and the body.
Epistemology is a branch of philosophy that deals with the nature, origin, and scope of knowledge.
Ethics is the systematic study and inquiry into human moral life; here, morality is defined as all the rules of behavior recognized by a group of people or a culture.
Mainly divided into meta-ethics (abstractly study the nature of ethical theory or criticism), normative ethics (judge various different ethical views, and give moral criteria for right or wrong behavior.
It studies what style of moral behavior people should follow (normative ethics), applied ethics (the academic study of applying ethical theory to real-life situations, including bioethics, political ethics, etc.), descriptive ethics (collecting information about how people actually live and generalizing from what is observed).
It does not start from a preconceived theory of morality, but investigates the actual choices made, and observed, by real moral agents, and all the moral factors that went into that choice, and discusses the ethical views held by social groups.
The history of ethics includes Greek and Roman ethics, and medieval Christian ethics.
The first part is humanistic ethics, represented by Valla and Montaigne.
The second part is the ethical thought of religious reform, represented by Calvin.
The third part is political ethics, represented by Machiavelli and others, modern ethics (17-18th century, British empirical ethics, representatives: Hume and others, 17-18th century, European rationalist ethics, representatives: Spinoza and others, 18th century, French Enlightenment ethics, representatives: Voltaire and others, 18-19th century, German Academy ethics, representatives: Kant and Hegel and others, 18-19th century, British Utilitarian ethics, representatives: Bentham and Sidgwick and others, 19th century, British evolutionary ethics, representatives: Spencer and Darwin and others, late 19th century, German neo-Kantian ethics, representatives: Li Kaier and others, late 19th century, neo-Hegelian ethics, representatives: Thomas Hill Green and others), transitional ethics (non-rationalist ethics, representatives: Kierkegaard, Schopenhauer and Nietzsche and others).
Logic is the study of "principles and standards of valid inference and proof."
Logic usually includes three parts: inductive reasoning, abductive reasoning and deductive reasoning, which can be divided into formal logic and informal logic.
Aesthetics is a discipline that focuses on the study of the nature and meaning of beauty.
#NUMBER# yuan has been received, which is the delivered food
Yangxingche, whose real name is Jiangbo, was born in the year of the sheep and the month of the sheep. He was walking on the grass. It was suitable for him. It was called Yangxingche. People called him "Uncle Yang".
He has been called a "suspense genius" in the industry for publishing works such as "Strange Tales of Thailand", "Strange Tales of India", "Strange Tales of Japan" and "Strange Tales of South Korea". He calls himself "good at telling nonsense in a serious manner".
"Under the Light", also known as "Strange News from China", the "suspenseful genius" Yang Xingte uses his new work "Under the Light" to take you deep into the bone marrow of Chinese folk customs. What kind of beautiful and moving love and hatred songs are behind those legends that have been passed down to this day?
"Wayfarers" Nan Xiaolou and Yue Wuhua once again set out on a journey to investigate death, and their identities will soon be revealed.
The "suspense genius" Yang Xing has turned his hair white, and has donated millions of copies of best-selling books!
The original "China Travelogue", the new work after "Exotic Code", the same author, the same protagonist, and the continuation of the unfinished story of "Thailand Travelogue" and "India Travelogue"!
They took away one item, and you have to pay for a McChicken sauce.
You call the restaurant and ask them to send it up
I just don't want to go downstairs to buy things, so I spend so much money on delivery
Ding Zilin: To a friend.
I would like to express my sincere thanks to all of you for the humanitarian assistance you have given us over the past 30 years since the death of our loved ones, especially the assistance that has never been interrupted since I made an appeal for humanitarian assistance to friends at home and abroad in my own name in early 1994.
Nowadays, most of the parents of the deceased have passed away, and the orphans have grown up and have families and jobs.
It was your acts of kindness that helped us through the most difficult of times.
At present, the new crown epidemic is raging in the world, and most of the donors have reached retirement age.
Therefore, I sincerely request that you stop the humanitarian donations to the Tiananmen Mothers group, and this humanitarian relief activity should have ended a long time ago.
I will always remember your love, and I believe that your deeds will be recorded in history.
For various reasons, I can only express my will in this way, please understand!
I wish you all the best.
Tao Ye said: Please allow me to use this opportunity to make a simple introduction to the 32-year history of the International Federation of Chinese Students and Scholars (IFCSS) and the Minnesota China Democracy Foundation (MCDF) engaged in humanitarian assistance.
In the course of humanitarian assistance, the American Association of Universities and the Minnesota China Democracy Foundation are parallel organizations, and their project implementers often overlap.
(Apple Daily photo: Tiananmen Mothers website is taken care of by Tao Ye.) pic.twitter.com/UxID9ZGjzm
Aid funds often fail to reach the hands of June 4th victims.
In 1994, at the suggestion of Mr. Ding, the "Tiananmen Mothers" established a special group to coordinate and manage the reception and distribution of relief funds.
In 1998, the MCDF established the "June 4th Orphan Education Fund", which was implemented for 11 years. In 2009, after all the June 4th orphans had graduated from university, the MCDF established the "June 4th Orphan Elderly Special Hardship Aid Fund" and has continued to implement it to this day.
These projects were mainly funded by campus and social donations in 1989, individual generous donations and supported by the Democratic Foundation of Brother University.
Since 2018, it has also received support from the Institute of Penal Reform.
Until last year, after 31 years, the June 4th victims finally received a part of the donations raised in the name of June 4th in Hong Kong.
At the same time, Human Rights in China was independently carrying out its humanitarian relief projects.
We understand that Mr. Ding stopped the June 4th donation for the consideration of the donors. We are indeed some retired old people, and our income is not as abundant as it was before retirement. Therefore, we would like to express our gratitude to Mr. Ding's “Letter to Friends”.
We will respect the decision of the asylum-seekers, and terminate the project within two years, and resume it immediately as needed.
At the same time, I would like to express my thanks and respect to those brave colleagues who have been generous and risked their lives to deliver humanitarian assistance over the years.
Brand: mesobiosystem
Origin: Mainland China
Color classification: Droplet chip1, Droplet chip2, Droplet chip3, Droplet chip4, Droplet chip5, Droplet chip6, Droplet chip7, Droplet chip8, Double layer droplet
Thank you for choosing our products. Before using our chips, please take 5 minutes to read the following carefully:
Please check the goods are complete after opening the package.
If there is any missing, please contact customer service in time.
The cover plate of the microfluidic chip is made of PC material. Please do not introduce solvents that will chemically react with PC.
Do not use a syringe to inject directly into the chip, otherwise it is easy to leak.
Before shipment, all microfluidic chips with ordinary substrates are tested with pure water under the injection pressure of 500mbar (100um channel depth) or 300mbar (50um channel depth).
All glass-based chips are tested with pure water at 800mbar (100um channel) injection pressure prior to shipment. Please avoid contact with sharp objects when using glass-based chips to prevent damage to the substrate.
Please consider the viscosity of the solution during use and do not exceed this range, otherwise it will cause leakage.
For the ordinary base microfluidic microchip, when the injection pump uses pure water as the sample, we suggest that the flow rate should be set below 150ul/min, and the oil phase flow rate should be set below 50ul/min.
Please consider the viscosity of your actual sample liquid and increase your flow rate parameter value from slow to fast.
After the experiment, please clean the internal channel of the universal chip in time, otherwise it is easy to cause blockage.
Microfluidic chips are consumables and cannot be used repeatedly for a long time.
If the chip is damaged due to long-term use or improper operation, it will not be returned or exchanged.
If you need a microfluidic chip that can withstand greater pressure or flow rate, please contact our customer service for customization.
The normal shipping cycle of the chip is within 1 week. If there is stock, it can be shipped within 24 hours after placing an order. Please consult the customer service before placing an order.
If you have any questions about how to connect our chip to the sample system, you can refer to the following link: https://zhuanlan.zhihu.com/p/60474873, or search the WeChat official account "MesoBioT" to get more help.
You can also visit our website (http://www.mesobiosys.com) and download brochures to see all of our products.
For more information about our products, please contact our online customer service.
I'm on the other side of #PRS_ORG.
Hello
Excuse me, the order time is getting longer and longer.
How long will it take to get there?
Originally, it was said that it would arrive at 16:10-16:30.
I'll wait until 7:30 to see if it's delivered.
Where does Holy Street lead to?
Which street in Hong Kong leads to St. George's Street?
So what's the order situation like now?
I inputted it in December.
Therefore, this month, you can enjoy $20 off four times with the #PRS_ORG# RED credit card.
I didn't get an order, can you help me check if the rider is still on the way?
Can you help me contact the rider to ask if he is still on the way?
I didn't receive an order, there was no food on the check, no one contacted me about the cancellation
When there are deliveries, the management office downstairs will always call, and they will let people in first after asking, but the management office has never contacted me.
Design, everywhere (Recommended by the Reading Guide Catalogue for Middle and Primary School Students)
Cambridge Double-language graded reading novels: Fatal Memory (level 2, Cambridge KET level, more than 800 words)
The original edition of Cambridge was introduced, an international award-winning work, which has been popular all over the world for 20 years, and has been read synchronously by teenagers all over the world. The national middle and primary school library catalogue, national key high school teachers' compilation, scan the QR code to listen to the English sound and American sound theater effect recording
[New] A black book about color, a hardcover picture book for children aged 3 to 6, Bologna was selected for the new reading base directory, preschool children's reading materials, and the original version of the relay publishing house.
New and genuine, can be issued a receipt, and group purchases are discounted.
[China Business Overseas Direct Order] Descriptive Catalogue of the Writings of Sir Walter
The design of [Xiaoli Translation Elementary and Middle School Reading Series] is ubiquitous (selected for the "Middle and High School Reading Guidance Directory")
A black book on colors 3 to 6-year-old children’s picture book
【Can be invoiced】Original version of The Witness of the Century: The Great Interpreter, Danica Celesevich, a literary biography, a biography of a literary biography, a simultaneous interpreter, a language translator, and a reference book for teachers and students.
Original version in stock Century witness Great translator Danica Seleskovic Biography literature Biography literature Simultaneous interpretation Language translators and students reference book Research publishing house
【Original book】【Xiaoyilin Primary and Secondary School Reading Series】 Design, everywhere (included in the "Catalogue of Reading Guidance for Middle and Primary School Students")【Can be invoiced】
#PRS_ORG# testified that no one went to get it, #PRS_ORG# accused me of being self-serving
I'll say it again, I made a delivery
After they finish, you have no one to deliver, and then you blame me for taking it
I'm going to call the police if you don't cancel right now
Time Specimen Photography has no branches for the time being
Members' comments
[Effect] Photo effect: took two sets of clothes, overall it's not bad. I prefer the set of pictures.
[Service] Service details: Because I was pregnant, I felt a little uncomfortable during the makeup process. The makeup artist and staff were very considerate. They let me rest for a while. They also kept pouring hot water for me to drink.
Package price: RMB 1,000
Thank you for the rabbit's comments. I originally said that the ancient style is not suitable for the ancient style, but I didn't expect the finished product to be too beautiful.
Thank you, Dandan, for your recognition. Your satisfaction will give us enough energy to move forward. We will continue to work hard!
This photography studio is amazing, highly recommend to all of you!
It was faultless from reception, make-up, costume, lighting, photography to post-production.
The makeup artists are especially careful, and will match the makeup according to your style. The makeup products used are all top-line brands.
Professor Tian Liang doesn't need to say anything, his photography is quite professional.
The whole studio is very artistic, and there are two little cats to play with.
We work in Beijing, and the better studios in Beijing need to be booked six months in advance. A colleague of mine had some photos taken in Beijing, and after seeing them, I thought they were just so-so.
I especially looked for this studio, a place with soul and attitude.
We are not very good at managing our facial expressions, and I think this is also the shortcoming of most people. The photographer, Brother Liang, will take photos and record the natural and wonderful moments.
Makeup artist, photographer, post-production designer, a great team.
When it came out, we, as well as everyone around us, couldn’t stop talking about it.
I'd already recommended it to a friend, and she was just as thrilled when she saw the negatives.
I hope that such a studio will not be buried, and that more people will discover it and make their own style, instead of all the same.
Thank you very much for the five-star reviews of Zhanying and Jingling. Both of them are very creative newcomers. We are a creative studio. As long as customers like us, we will do our best to complete them. Thank you for meeting and meeting
The sweet and caring assistant, the lively and cheerful photographer teacher, everyone in the team was super nice. It was a wonderful shooting experience. It was an unforgettable experience, and the results were much better than I expected. Everyone worked hard, and I am very grateful to all of you. 😘😘
Thanks to Xiao Yu’s comment. It is also a fate for us to know each other. From Hohhot to Qinhuangdao, our trust is thousands of miles away. I am very happy to know you. If there is a chance, we will come to Qinhuangdao again.
How do I pay?
The redelivered meal has been delivered
No riders interested
Now I'm getting phone calls from restaurant staff
A programming novice who wants to share his personal experience.
If you are planning to enter this industry, you can choose to go to a place for training, but if you don't have this idea, it's better to study by yourself. After all, the cost of training is very high, and it takes six months to learn.
But if you intend to get into this industry, training is indeed a very good choice, especially for those people who are very weak in self-control. Training is a very good choice.
If you have a strong self-control, you can choose to learn by yourself, but it will be more tiring.
Of course, it is very important to choose a good training institution.
First of all, we should look at the strength of the teachers of this institution. If the strength of the teachers is not strong enough, this training institution is meaningless. Of course, the strength of the teachers of some newly established training institutions is not particularly strong.
Secondly, before choosing, ask about this training institution. It is best to ask about the students who came out of this institution. After all, only the students of this institution know what kind of institution it is, and whether the course taught is good or bad.
Hello, in fact, I don't know how to answer your question, because I haven't introduced your own situation, and learning this thing has a lot to do with your own situation.
For example, the profession, age, language you want to learn, and even in which city, all of these will be related to your study or the industry you want to engage in.
If you are a student who has not yet graduated, or a graduate of computer science, I personally recommend self-learning if you have enough time. This is the most efficient and cost-effective. Now many offline and online training institutions are actually very good, but the cost of learning is high, and the time invested is relatively long, which basically requires concentrated training for 3-6 months.
However, if it is the situation I said, self-study is very convenient. There are many free learning resources on the Internet now, or you can go to bilibili to get a lot of training resources. If you don't know how to find resources, you can also contact me through the introduction to get free resources or detailed consultation.
In addition, there are some more classic books that can be combined with videos for comprehensive learning.
If you are not a computer professional, but you can afford to pay a certain amount of learning money and time, it is recommended that you go to a training institution to learn, so that you do not need to study hard, and the teacher's explanation is very detailed. If you have any questions, someone will answer them specifically. In addition, it is also helpful in terms of learning planning or supervision.
In addition, many training institutions will sign employment agreements now. There are referral positions. After learning, they will recommend going to the company. This can save a lot of things in the later job search.
Here are some of my views, and I have not introduced them in detail because I do not know your situation. If you have other questions, you can contact me at any time for exchange and communication.
I said before 1 o'clock, and I saw it on the app
What does that mean?
I didn't finish, what are you doing?
I accept all kinds of (installation, cleaning, repair), wall-mounted water heaters, water purifiers, washing machines, air conditioners, toilets, stoves, range hoods, lighting, glass cleaning, professional beautification, housekeeping services
Thank you to those who have silently given me a thumbs up. I work hard for my life. Life is tiring, but I have to go on.
Life will not disappoint every hard-working person. If you like it, please follow me. Thank you to those who silently gave me likes.
Life is like this. Others only look at the results, and you have to bear the process alone. When facing life, we can only be strong and continue. There is no other choice. We can look back at the road, but we can’t go back.
Cleaning is work and responsibility. Life is beautiful because of service, and service is wonderful because of the heart.
Although cleaning is the dirtiest job, we will clean every corner of the customer’s house with the most serious attitude, and see the customer’s smile and thumbs up. At that moment, all the hard work is worth it, and the efforts will be rewarded!
My day job
—— Your request, my service.
Serve with heart, clean with heart, and keep the beauty.
The details you care about, Fenggui Home Care helps you to do "clean" what I can do, and serve the family with love.
Keep the Wan family clean, build a monument to the family, provide service to the end, and keep it clean at home.
Indoor and outdoor cleaning, this is my daily work.
Although the crystal lamp is gorgeous, it will lose its luster if it is not cleaned for a long time. Only after cleaning can it shine. Life is the same.
Only by working hard can we succeed, and only by being meticulous can we create delicate things. We are serious about beauty.
Give me a chance, and I will make you satisfied. Quality speaks for itself, because professionalism deserves to be trusted. Your recognition is my greatest encouragement!
These days, it's hard to do anything!
But I always believe that as long as I am serious and persistent enough, I will be better than others, at least better than those who just sit there and complain!"
A day is planned in the morning, and all good things start in the early morning. I hope that you will set out with happiness, luck, health, and your wishes. Start a new day, and keep a good mood all day. Good morning.
When we were young, happiness was a thing, and having it made us happy; when we grew up, happiness was a goal, and achieving it made us happy; when we matured, we realized that happiness was a state of mind, and understanding it made us happy.
Be the most real and kindest person you can be, follow your heart, and have no regrets in this life; life is one road, walk your own road; life has two treasures: a good body and a good mood, shine and live to old age!
At every stage of life, there will be different difficulties.
More often than not, it's not a lack of ability that holds us back, but a lack of courage to face the challenge.
Since it cannot be avoided, it is better to face it squarely.
The more you fear, the more likely you are to be defeated by the difficulties; the more you face the difficulties, the more likely the problems will be solved.
Chinese and Saudi art curators co-host Saudi's first contemporary art biennial - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Riyadh, December 12 (Reporters Wang Haizhou and Hu Guan) The first contemporary art biennial in Saudi Arabia, the Diriyah Contemporary Art Biennial, was officially opened to the public on December 11 in the Diriyah JAX art district in the northwest of Riyadh, the capital of Saudi Arabia, with 64 artists from Saudi Arabia, China, and other places participating in the exhibition.
This biennale is co-organized by the Diriyah Biennale Foundation in Saudi Arabia and the UCCA Ullens Center for Contemporary Art in China, and the director of the UCCA Ullens Center for Contemporary Art, Tian Feiyue, serves as the artistic director.
According to the curatorial team, the theme of this biennale is “Crossing the River by Feeling the Stones”, which is a metaphor for the reform strategies adopted during the period of social and economic transformation, and it also reflects the current situation of Saudi society and cultural development.
This biennale covers an area of nearly 12,000 square meters. The exhibition hall spans six interconnected buildings and is presented in six units: "Crossing the River by Touching the Stones," "Tradition as Experiment," "Marginal Thinking," "Towards the Public," "A Beautiful New World," and "On the Spirit of Art."
Among them, the works of 27 Saudi artists accounted for more than 40% of the total number of works in the exhibition, including painting, installation art and performance art. The works of the 12 Chinese artists were also well-received. Some of the artists used recycled materials in an innovative way for creation. For example, Xu Bing used discarded materials to reconstruct a classic landscape painting in "The Story Behind the Series: Endless Mountains and Rivers" (2014).
Buckley, CEO of the Diriyah Biennale Foundation, said that he hopes that this biennale will establish international dialogues, allowing global audiences to learn about Saudi Arabia's booming cultural industry and creative community, and strengthen interactive exchanges.
Tian Feiyue said: "The goal of the biennial is twofold. On the one hand, it can enable Saudi contemporary art to participate in the global dialogue, and on the other hand, it can allow Saudi audiences to integrate into the contemporary art world. "
It is understood that a series of lectures will also be held during the opening week of the biennial. Artists, curators and opinion leaders in the creative industry will discuss topics such as cross-cultural exchange and the development of contemporary art.
I ordered the Axe Chop
The restaurant told me riders can't deliver bones
I just wanted to ask what the reason was.
Bones are fine, ask the restaurant to pack them up separately for delivery
However, the system is not very convenient, and they all use another one.
I'm at #ADDRESS#, the branch in the Meatpacking District.
I'm a long way from there
Practical Business English Conversation 100+
With just 10 minutes a day, even a total beginner can speak with ease!
It covers all common business topics, includes all common business English expressions, and explains all business English communication skills!
Free download of speaking simulation exercises, foreign teacher reading audio, and all-purpose business knowledge, to help you easily improve your business English speaking ability!
Practical Business English Dialogue 100, by Wang Huili, Zhan Lili, and Wang Yucui, is the original book directly supplied by China Astronautic Publishing House and can issue a regular electronic invoice. If you have any problems, please contact the online customer service at any time!
English for 5 minutes before bedtime Those century-old classics Yang Chunli, Cheng Youcui, Song Bing Translated by 9787512415812 Beijing University of Aeronautics and Astronautics Press
Original books, electronic invoices, and after-sales service. If you have any questions, you can consult the online customer service.
The Women Who Wear Hand-Made Shoes, by Adriana Trigiani, translated by Dong Yan'nan and Chen Huijie, 9787513306645, New Star Press [Direct Delivery]
Original books, supplied directly by the publisher, with a regular electronic invoice. If you have any questions, please contact our online customer service at any time!
100% beautiful and confident
There are many discounts in the store. When you reach the amount, you will get a discount. Welcome to buy!
[Wenxuan original version] 100 practical business English conversational scenarios
The four warehouses of Xinhua Book House (Jiangsu, Chengdu, Hubei, and Tianjin) can deliver books to 75% of cities on the next day!
Let's Talk Autism: 55 Questions You've Always Wanted to Ask About Autism and Asperger's (Paperback)
Beautiful English Letters that are Breathtaking (Letters Collection) (Edition 800 Extended Knowledge 1,000 Authoritative English Essays 2,000 Classic Quotations 3 [Genuine Book] [Genuine Book]
Yunnan: Coordinated and standardized management of rural public welfare positions - Xinhua Net
Kunming, December 12, Xinhua News Agency (Reporter Lin Bifeng): In order to continue to do a good job in employment assistance for the poverty-stricken population and consolidate and expand the achievements of poverty alleviation, Yunnan Province has recently issued relevant policies to promote the management of rural public welfare positions in rural revitalization, which will help to comprehensively promote rural revitalization.
A relevant person in charge of the Yunnan Provincial Department of Human Resources and Social Security introduced that at present, Yunnan has developed 448,300 rural public welfare jobs, which are used to settle the employment of the rural difficult groups such as the labor force of poverty alleviation and play an important role in helping the poverty-stricken people to achieve employment and income growth, consolidating the achievements of poverty alleviation and strengthening rural public services.
This new regulation was jointly issued by seven departments, including the Yunnan Human Resources and Social Security, Rural Revitalization, and Finance. It mainly unifies and standardizes the object range, fund management, position development, position management, and other aspects of the grassroots recruitment of rural public welfare positions.
In terms of position development setting, the new regulations specify that positions should be set according to the principles of “setting positions according to needs, setting people according to positions, dynamic management, and total control”, “who develops, who uses, who is responsible”, and “one person, one position, voluntary openness, and unified management”.
The recruitment process must be carried out in accordance with the following steps: announcement, application, examination, announcement, appointment, pre-employment training and arrangement for on-the-job training.
In addition, the new rules also specify the specific responsibilities of the main development departments of rural public welfare posts, the subsidy standards and subsidy methods of rural public welfare posts, and stipulate that each rural public welfare post development department should purchase accidental injury commercial insurance for the rural public welfare post staff; and require the relevant departments to supervise the payment of rural public welfare post subsidies on a regular basis.
The address was wrong
Hello
Can I cancel the order?
I reordered
Whether it has been cancelled
Second, although the right wing has had some success in history, it is not long, so it is short because it is brilliant with a little sunshine and sweaty with a little hot water. If it has a little success, it will hope for more; if it suffers a setback, it will cling to it.
But in reality, the right has played a positive role in the process of social progress.
From ending the Cultural Revolution to defining the standard of truth, developing the economy, improving science and technology, and promoting the institutionalization of politics and human rights protection, the positive significance of the right-wing should not be denied.
Three, as far as I am concerned, although I do not completely agree with some of Li Weidong’s views, I am very concerned about his views and very respect Li Weidong as a person; because he is serious, he is serious about China, and he also takes China’s social problems seriously.
However, I disagree with his anti-communist theory. I think that anti-necessary revolution, revolution will inevitably lead to social unrest, damage to the people's livelihood, and a muddle of political groups, and then foreign countries will take advantage of the situation.
Fourthly, to change or improve China, we must have a patient and responsible attitude towards the country and the people, and those who seek political opportunities are not rightists, but bastards.
Let's talk about the left.
The left, in fact, is a group of people who have been abandoned by the times and politics.
If the right has a positive meaning for society, the Communist Party will listen to some of the right’s opinions and analyze their ideas when necessary. However, there is no such luck for the left, because the left wants what the Communist Party has thrown away!
Fifth, I have recently seen some friends arguing with counter-revolutionaries and refuting the left-wing, which is quite impressive. I think it is not necessary.
Don't try to reason with the traitors or the left-wing lunatics. They are all the same, and there is no point in trying to reason with them.
Don't try to prove we're right, and don't even think about trying to get counter-revolutionaries and leftists to admit it. What's the point?
I told my friends: when the counter-revolutionaries call you five cents, when the left wingers call you right dogs, it just proves that our middle path is correct!
Many people had ideals when they were young, but they forgot their ideals or pursued their ideals but became obsessed when they grew old.
and the ideal is increasingly out of reach, and even the dragon-slaying youth has become a dragon.
I think left and right usually refer to restraint and freedom, and China as a whole should be on the left due to its historical cultural innate genes.
Domestic right-wing freedom emphasizes efficiency and development, while left-wing regulation emphasizes fairness and safety.
Now, society as a whole hopes to pay more attention to fairness. At the same time, the struggle between China and the United States is positive, and it is estimated that it will continue for many years.
Even though I don't understand it, I'll just give it a thumbs up.
Nothing to say, Hua Hua is so righteous
In the past two years, the United States’ blockade and encirclement of Huawei’s chips has not only put Huawei in an unprecedented dilemma, but also caused huge losses to “American” enterprises.
The United States suppresses China's chip industry and requires its own enterprises and relevant enterprises in allied countries to impose a blockade on China's chip industry at the same time, which directly leads to the fact that the orders and profits of global chip suppliers are affected, causing the research and development investment and production capacity of chip production enterprises to decrease, thus causing the shortage and disorder of the global chip supply chain.
Today, the "chip shortage" has affected all major industries in the world, such as the suspension of production by car companies and the increase in prices of mobile phones. Almost all industries that use chips are deeply affected.
In order to grasp the "chip" autonomy, more and more technology giants in more and more countries have begun to take the road of "de-Americanization".
In order to firmly grasp global semiconductor control and curb the development of China's semiconductor industry, the United States has recently taken frequent actions, hosting a "chip summit" and inviting 64 giant countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and pulling funds to support domestic technology giants in the United States. For example, in order to regain the leading position in the chip field, the old technology giant of the United States, Intel, invested 20 billion U.S. dollars to build 2 wafer processing plants in the U.S. state of Arizona, and opened chip outsourcing business to the outside world.
When most people think that Intel's move will have a certain impact on TSMC and may take away TSMC's "job".
The reason why it is so sure is that Intel, as an old technology giant in the United States, has been engaged in the semiconductor field for decades, and has a large number of human resources and technical reserves, and must be able to rise rapidly in a short period of time to defeat TSMC.
However, Zhang Zhongmou, the founder of TSMC, did not care about Intel's decision.
At the "2021 Master Think Tank Forum" held in April this year, Zhang Zhonghua made a surprising statement. For Intel's move to build a wafer factory, Zhang Zhonghua said without hesitation: Intel building a chip foundry is quite ironic.
The reason why Zhang Zhonghua is disdainful of Intel's entry into the wafer field is that Zhang Zhonghua still remembers the grudge between TSMC and Intel more than 30 years ago.
In the 1960s and 1970s, Intel was the jewel in the crown of American manufacturing, standing at the top of the world, and the master of the global semiconductor industry.
Until the 1980s, the world's high-end semiconductor chips have always been controlled by a few strong players.
At that time, the semiconductor industry was characterized by the IDM model, and chips were designed, manufactured, and tested by a single factory. Intel was the representative of that era.
However, such a mode makes some small enterprises overwhelmed, and many semiconductor entrepreneurs face the huge cost of production line construction and can only give up.
In the 1980s, under the call of market demand, the chip industry began to appear the phenomenon of division of labor and cooperation. In 1984, Zhang Zhonghua heard that there was a company specializing in chip design. He thought that since there was a company specializing in design, a company specializing in wafer manufacturing could be established.
Not long after, Zhang Zhongmou's vision became a reality, and TSMC was born.
TSMC has focused its main business on a single link of "wafer processing". It does not engage in design, but only provides foundry services for wafer manufacturing.
The newly founded TSMC was just a small fry in front of the giant Intel.
In order to obtain capital support, Zhang Zhonghua had approached Intel for investment, but when Intel heard that TSMC only did the manufacturing link in the chip industry, it obviously had a high self-esteem, looked down on TSMC, and decisively refused to invest in TSMC.
Zhang Zhongmou also recognized that Intel at that time looked down on the wafer process service.
Unexpectedly, the giants in wafer manufacturing services, which were looked down upon in the past, now have to start doing wafer fabrication.
So, Zhang Zhongmou felt that it was ironic for Intel to enter the foundry business.
Today, TSMC's market value has surpassed that of Intel.
In the face of TSMC’s strong offensive, Intel naturally did not dare to stand still.
Now, TSMC is racing towards 3nm chips, while Intel is still stuck at 14nm from seven years ago.
It is not easy to catch up.
I can't wait
It's been 2 hours since I placed the order at 19:06 😅
Today, let's take a look at some of the [strange hot searches].
What is normal public opinion?
Randomly select three hot searches: the second day of the second lunar month, the price hike of Goodfriend, and the Huolala incident. The public opinion expands to form a peak, and then the [index declines] (smooth curve) and finally dissipates. If there is secondary public opinion, there will be another small hump.
They look very similar to the "network public opinion evolution model" displayed on the website of the Cyberspace Administration of China.
What is an abnormal public opinion?
Randomly select six hot searches in the same event to show a "lonely peak", "sawtooth" and "cliff".
The "lone peak" refers to the artificial heating and rapid rush to the top of the hot search list to attract the attention of the public; the "sawtooth" refers to the periodic heating to ensure that the topic stays in the hot search list; the "cliff" refers to the collective evacuation. This hot search has played its "function" and received a new task and rushed to a new battlefield.
In Figure 9, the heat peak of one event is exactly the trough of another event, and the time is accurate to the second. It must be that the unified water army received the task and opened a new round of attack.
The professionalization of black public relations can be seen at a glance: dozens of hot searches were on the list at the same time. Which ones attracted attention, which ones were responsible for popular science, which ones incited war, which ones diverted attention, which ones influenced cognition, which ones misled judgment, which ones incited emotions, which ones wrapped in decision-making, and black production accounts were divided into batches and nodes for fine-grained operations, which almost considered all the elements in the spread of public opinion.
Public relations is a science. No matter what one's position or emotions are, or any other subjective factor, black public relations will have no way to escape from the objective data.
Everyone who passes by will leave a trace, and we will dig them out together.
Data source: Hot search time machine.
The first cases of the Omicron strain were found in countries such as Mauritius-Xinhua Net
Beijing, Dec. 12, 2021, Xinhua News Agency - According to reports from foreign correspondents of Xinhua News Agency, Mauritius, Cyprus and Malawi recently reported the first cases of infection by the Omicron variant of the novel coronavirus.
Mauritius reported its first two cases of the Omicron variant on the 10th of this month.
According to Mauritian Minister of Health Kailesh Jagutpal, one of the infected persons was a tourist who arrived in Mauritius on November 27 from South Africa; the other infected person was a local Mauritian resident who tested positive on November 30 after being in contact with a person who had recently returned from South Africa.
After being isolated and treated in the hospital, the nucleic acid test results of these two infected persons turned negative. They have now returned to their respective places of residence.
On October 10, the Ministry of Health of Cyprus announced that the country had confirmed three cases of infection with the Omicron strain for the first time.
The three people are all students. They came back from abroad at the beginning of this month. Because they were all mild cases, they did not go to the hospital for treatment.
In order to prevent the spread of the Omicron strain, the government of Serbia has continuously increased its prevention and control efforts.
From December 6 to January 10, 2023, passengers aged 12 and above entering the country by plane must pay for a nucleic acid test at the airport after arrival.
On the 10th, the Serbian Ministry of Health also announced that it would start vaccinating children aged 5 to 11 with the Pfizer COVID-19 vaccine.
Malawian Health Minister Khumbize Chiponda said on the 9th that the country has discovered three cases of Omicron strain infection for the first time.
The country's health department conducted genomic sequencing on 12 positive COVID-19 samples collected from November 9 to December 2, and found these three infection cases.
The delivery never arrived
Even the rider's phone number was fake
I've already re-ordered
Will the previous single be refunded?
If not, please cancel the order and refund
I thought that if I ordered earlier, I could eat earlier, but now it's 7 o'clock and I still haven't eaten
I don't understand what you're saying...
Is your Chinese translated? Or do you prefer to use English?
That was sent to
Do you want to call him?
Dear customer!
Thank you for choosing to dine at Zhiyun Restaurant. It is our mission to make you and your family happy and to provide you with more delicious and worry-free dishes and better services. Your satisfaction and praise have always been our motivation to move forward!
Thank you for your five-star praise, I love you!
Thank you for choosing to dine at Chi Yun restaurant. We are very sorry for the inconvenience caused to you!
At the same time, thank you very much for the real experience evaluation. We will take effective measures to improve in a timely manner. We will strictly control the quality and quantity of dishes. Our telephone is 18912251735, and our WeChat is synchronized. We look forward to meeting you here again.
Dear customers, thank you for choosing our restaurant. We apologize for the unpleasant dining experience caused by the dishes. We have communicated with the kitchen and strictly controlled the dishes. We also thank you for your understanding and support. I am Xiao Yun of Zhiyun Restaurant. I look forward to meeting you here again!
Come to the banquet and leave with a good mood!
Dear customers, thank you for your evaluation and support for our "Xiaoyun". When our carefully cooked dishes get your approval, it is the happiest time for us!
Looking forward to seeing you again
Dear little master, first of all, thank you very much for your recognition and evaluation, and we will strive to do better!
Also, thank you very much for your support and likes in your busy schedule, and I wish you a happy meal and a good mood every day!
I don't think it's helpful at all!
They got a belly full of money
The order is a claw.
OK, the phone number is #PHONENUMBER#
Do I need to stay on the line?
I called your staff and explained
Your rider told me the address is too far
Da Mei 360 integrates home furnishing
Address: 12th floor, Happy Home, No. 156, Nanhuan Road
At first, it was introduced by a friend because of trust, so I chose to have a look. My initial budget was 70,000 yuan for a basic renovation.
Once in the store, it was a series of scams.
When I went to the store for the first time, I just showed them my floor plan, and they didn't go to the site to measure the house. They actually gave me a quote saying that my 135-square-meter house could be done for 70,000 yuan. They also showed me their materials, but I didn't know what brand of materials they were.
Their second trick is that once you get to the store, they will drag you into paying the deposit (which once paid, you will never be able to get back, unless you have enough experience to argue with them).
When I was hesitating whether to pay the deposit, they would invite their so-called managers to tell you how much discount you can get if you pay the deposit today.
This is a big pit. I am a living example of being cheated. I paid a deposit of more than ten thousand when I was impulsive.
He quoted me a lot of problems for $70,000 and that didn't include water and electricity, any doors or cupboards or bathrooms, and those three things are the bulk of the base cost.
They also charge more for their service points than other companies.
I lost trust in the company, and they asked me to sign a contract without telling me anything at the beginning.
When I went to get my money back, they acted like they knew what they were doing, like they had a special little team to deal with you.
No matter what, they'll say it's the customer's problem and have nothing to do with it.
There are many details of various excuses. I don't want to say one by one. In short, don't choose them. Because my friend found them to decorate the house and the quality is not good. Later, they will calculate various costs for you.
It's a scam, they are just the original fake dragon head decorations, now changed to big beauty, as if it had gone out of business again and changed to something else.
So, don't choose such a shitty decoration company.
In the future, everyone should pay more attention to Baidu to check these consultations when choosing because the renovation is not a small amount of money.
Please log in or register if you would like to ask the merchant a question.
It is strictly prohibited to publish any form of merchant reviews. Please refer to the Merchant Inclusion Declaration for details.
Meituan's Kunming decoration design channel provides you with the most up-to-date merchant information such as the address, phone number and business hours of the beautiful 360 integrated home decoration. If you want to find a decoration company, just go to Meituan.
So horrible, if it's less than 30 minutes please cancel the order!
Is there no other way? For example, change the address?
OK, then don't cancel this conversation, and if I don't get my money back in 5 to 10 days, I will definitely pursue it.
I asked if we could cancel in less than 15 minutes
The chicken should have been cooked, but we received raw meat and couldn't eat it
Starry Sky Has About丨The Geminid Meteor Shower Will Reach Its Peak on the 14th - Xinhua Net
Xinhua News Agency, Tianjin, December 12 (Reporter Zhou Runjian) An astronomy and science popularization expert said that as the last large-scale meteor shower of the year, the Geminid meteor shower, one of the three major meteor showers in the northern hemisphere, will reach its peak on December 14, and those who like meteor showers can observe it in the second half of the night on that day.
The Gemini meteor shower photographed by Beijing amateur astronomer An Jiu in Qinghai on December 13, 2018.
Most meteor showers are produced by periodic comets, but the Geminids are produced by 3200 Phaethon, an Apollo asteroid.
The Gemini meteor shower is also the second known meteor shower not "parented" by a comet.
Xie Lipeng, a board member of the Tianjin Astronomical Association and an astronomical popularization expert, said that just like New Year blockbusters, the Geminid meteor shower generally appears at the end of the year, and the “screening period” can last from December 4 to 17.
This meteor shower is famous for its large and steady flow, and is called one of the three major meteor showers in the northern hemisphere along with the Quadrantid meteor shower and the Lyrid meteor shower.
One of the distinguishing features of the Gemini meteor shower is that the meteor speed is relatively slow, the colors are rich, and there are many fireballs, which is suitable for beginners in visual observation and astronomical photography.
The Geminid meteor shower photographed by Yang Jing, an amateur astronomer in Tianjin on December 13, 2020.
According to the astronomical forecast, this year's Gemini meteor shower will reach its peak around 3:00 p.m. on December 14, with a ZHR of 150.
The Geminid Meteor Shower Recommendation Chart.
"Last year, the Geminid meteor shower left a deep impression on people, but this year's Geminid meteor shower will be affected by the moonlight, and the spectacle will be slightly discounted.
The 14th is the 11th day of the 11th month of the lunar calendar. The moon phase is a waxing crescent moon. The bright moonlight will interfere with the observation. Fortunately, the moon will disappear in the second half of the night. At this time, the radiant point of the Gemini meteor shower will also be higher.
Those who like meteor showers can observe during the few hours after midnight, when the moon has set, but pay attention to keep warm. "
How can you see as many meteors as possible?
"It is not recommended to observe in cities. You can choose a place with high altitude, little light pollution, and an open view to the northeast in the suburbs or countryside, and then wait patiently until the moon sets and observe with the naked eyes.
It is worth noting that the Gemini meteor shower has a large flow in all directions. When observing, you don't need to stare at the radiant point of the Gemini meteor shower all the time.
If you're a photographer who wants to capture a beautiful "shooting star scene," it's best to use a wide-angle lens with a large aperture, and use high ISO and maximum aperture when shooting.
For stability and durability, a tripod, spare batteries, and a shutter release cable are also essential. "
Xiu Lipeng reminded.
What are the differences in market positioning between laser TVs and traditional TVs?
According to my understanding, the traditional television mentioned by the questioner should refer to a liquid crystal television, and the difference between a laser television and a liquid crystal television in market positioning is mainly as follows:
First, laser TV is more focused on the large-screen market.
Compared with the full-market positioning of LCD TVs, laser TVs are obviously more focused on the large-screen market, or in other words, laser TVs were born for large screens.
Currently, the mainstream LCD TV sizes are mostly in the range of 55 inches to 65 inches, and the sizes of laser TVs are usually above 75 inches, with the largest one exceeding 100 inches, fully meeting users’ demand for large-screen color TVs.
In recent years, the shipments and sales ratio of laser TVs in the global market have been constantly increasing. They account for more than 60% of the total television sales of 80 inches and above.
According to the forecast of Zhongyikang, the sales growth of laser TV market will exceed 140% in 2020, and continue to maintain high-speed growth.
The reason for such good results in the big screen market is mainly attributed to the excellent performance of laser TV in terms of eye protection.
Based on the imaging principle of laser TV, the light emitted by the laser light source does not directly enter the eyeball. Compared with the backlight source of LCD TV, the imaging process is closer to the imaging process of objects in natural conditions, and the stimulation to the eyes is also smaller.
The Xixi Laboratory of the China Electronics Standardization Research Institute and the ophthalmology experts of Beijing Tiantan Hospital conducted a strict comparison test of watching laser TV and LCD TV under the same conditions, and obtained 144 sets of test data.
The data proves that the laser TV does indeed have a strong eye protection function, and even has a certain improvement effect in certain aspects.
At a time when eye health is increasingly valued, laser TVs not only attract more users with their eye protection advantages, but also open a new breakthrough in the color TV market.
Second, the laser TV is more focused on the high-end market.
While the price of LCD TVs continues to fall, the price of currently available laser TVs is mostly above 10,000 yuan. As the size and light source are upgraded, the price gradually rises.
Why are laser TVs so expensive?
It certainly makes sense.
With the continuous development of light source and technology level, laser TV has many advantages that LCD TVs and projectors cannot achieve.
With super-short focus projection technology, the projection distance of the laser TV is relatively shorter than that of traditional projection devices. It can realize a 100-inch large-screen experience within a short distance. The space required is not large, and the host is small and takes up very little space.
In terms of brightness, large-brand laser TVs can reach more than 2000 lumens.
In addition, the heat generated is lower, which causes less damage to the equipment, and the life of the television is also longer.
In addition, many high-end laser TV models are equipped with real 4K ultra-high-definition picture quality, artificial intelligence system, biomimetic screen and many other cutting-edge technologies, which can bring users a more shocking audio-visual experience.
It is not fake demand, but the product of demand segmentation. In terms of picture quality and input-output ratio, laser TV is not suitable for audio-visual players. If you want to consider both large screens and insufficient viewing environment, you can try. Everything has its pros and cons, and you can make your own judgment after weighing them. I am afraid that you will listen to one-sided words.
In short, ultra-wide-angle short-focus projectors - laser televisions - have to use expensive ultra-wide-angle lenses and mirrors in order to get closer to the screen, which is not in accordance with the best optical design.
Using a micro-structured Fresnel screen to shield some environmental light is expensive. The price of an 80-inch screen is almost the same as that of a 65-inch LCD.
And one more thing, I really hate projector manufacturers using diffuse reflection as a selling point, please, the light on the screen that can be seen by the eyes is direct light for the eyes, if you diffuse it to the ceiling, the eyes can't see it either, and if you open the TV, the ceiling will also be illuminated, right?
Moreover, if the projection screen is not a diffuse reflector, it cannot form an image at all.
It is just the hot-spot (light-spot) effect of the high-gain screen that was overlooked. A lot of light is reflected into the eyes at a certain angle, which is really uncomfortable.
The Visual Aesthetics Photography Gallery is a quality store that has not yet opened a branch.
After adding the WeChat appointment date, the little sister arranged the time that can be selected and sent it to me. The information was replied in a timely manner.
I looked at the shooting works in the store before I went there. There were more outdoor wedding dresses, and they were very beautiful. There were also many shooting styles involved.
After arriving that day, I had a simple exchange of ideas with the little sister, and she was very patient to help me try on two sets of style clothes that I struggled with. Finally, we settled on the makeup style. The photographer would put some props before the shooting and guide the movements. He was also very particular about every detail.
But maybe because I didn't communicate my specific ideas for the shoot, it didn't turn out the way I wanted it to, but it should be pretty 🙊🙊
After the shoot, the photographer will help you choose the photos, communicate the post-production style, and it feels pretty careful.
It takes about half a month to heal, and you just have to wait for the effect.
It was the second time that I participated in the photo shoot buffet event. Most of the clothes in the venue could be chosen for shooting.
Finally, I chose a black chiffon skirt to experience a different style.
The whole shooting process takes about 2 hours, including makeup and shooting. The photographer in charge of shooting is a 95-year-old younger brother. It feels a bit green. I hope that he can give more suggestions in the customer shooting action guidance in the future. He is quite talkative, and the shooting process is pleasant.
The visual aesthetics photography museum of Wenchuang selects high-quality stores
Queenie is now on the home page. Come and have a look~
When I arrived, I filled in my name and phone number first, and then selected the clothes. The wedding dress could also be selected. I changed three or four sets of clothes, and they were quite patient. After the selection, it took a long time to make-up. The service attitude was also good. Later, when shooting, they would teach you how to pose. It's just that the feeling of taking pictures is that the face is too big, and the retouching is said to take half a month. After three or four days, it was sent. It feels like there is not much difference from the original picture.
Overall, the environment was pretty good.
There are many options for clothing.
There were about three places for makeup, and inside there was a photo studio.
The service was warm and attentive.
The stylists are very patient.
The photographers will also take the time to teach you the poses.
If the photographer is not satisfied, he or she will also take the initiative to re-shoot.
[Experience] The style may be a little too much, and the original double eyelid was pasted into a triple eyelid.
The tail of my eyebrows was also shaved off, which is a bit embarrassing for people who don't usually draw their eyebrows.
Photos were given after ten days, but I wasn't very satisfied with the P picture effect, and I felt that the double eyelid stickers were still very obvious.
Because I didn't quite know what style I wanted, I tried on two sets, and in the end, I chose the black dress. The little sister said that this set is a more Hepburn retro style.
After choosing the clothes, start doing the hair and make-up. The hair stylist and make-up artist were both very patient, and I was very satisfied with the result.
After the makeup and hair were done, we started taking pictures. The photographer gave me instructions on how to pose the whole time. The process was easy and harmonious.
After shooting, I carefully selected four of my favorite photos for post-processing. The little brother said that it could be completed in 15 minutes. I was very satisfied with the end result.
No reply for 3 days... I can't join the #PRS_ORG# monthly fee plan because your system can't recognize my credit card!
What's odd is that I've been using the same credit card for each payment.
Now, I have to pay for shipping every time.
Can I get an exemption first, and then pay my monthly fee after you finish your investigation?
Is it reliable to buy insurance for a small umbrella?
Xiaoyu Umbrella is an Internet insurance brokerage platform.
From the perspective of setting conditions: According to the instructions of the "Regulations on the Supervision of Insurance Brokerage Institutions (2015 Revision)", in order to become an insurance brokerage company, three keywords must be met: shareholders, initiators must have no major violations in the past three years, the minimum amount is RMB 50 million, and it must be approved by the China Insurance Regulatory Commission.
In fact, these three requirements are very strict, and can be summed up as having strength, having approval from the national authority (the China Banking and Insurance Regulatory Commission, which supervises insurance companies and banks in the country), and having shareholders with good conduct. As a small umbrella insurance for insurance brokerage companies, the policyholder does not need to question whether the small umbrella insurance is regular, after all, there are these three thresholds that not every insurance company can meet.
At this point, it's not bad and it's reliable.
In terms of insurance products: Xiaoyu Umbrella Insurance is an insurance supermarket. Many companies’ star critical illness insurance are sold on this platform, such as the recently launched and Thai Super Mary 5-day critical illness insurance. The claimant and the insurer are both and Thai Life. Xiaoyu Umbrella Insurance is just a third-party intermediary, and there is no need to question its credibility.
In terms of payment mode: Internet platform products, because of the lack of operating costs of business outlets and the cost of employee salaries, Internet products generally have a relatively high cost-effectiveness, and the payment mode is flexible, supporting monthly payment, reducing the payment pressure of the insured, and at the same time, it can maximize the leverage of insurance.
That's pretty good.
That can be considered.
In terms of professionalism of the sales staff, this is particularly important, because insurance is a highly professional industry, many Internet product customers can buy insurance by themselves, which will lead to a lot of misunderstandings. In terms of health disclosure and occupation, non-insurance professionals often add their own subjective consciousness when applying for insurance. They think that they are healthy or meet the requirements. This will easily lead to many claims risks and may be rejected.
I myself have worked as an insurance telemarketer for "Tencent Microinsurance" (just like a small umbrella, it is also an Internet insurance brokerage platform), and I am very responsible to tell you.
Internet insurance is real and reliable, but the people are not reliable. The Internet channel does not have professional practitioners, and there are many sales misleads.
For example: 1 yuan insurance covers 6 million, buy insurance to get a mobile phone, and get 60,000 critical illness insurance for free. These marketing strategies are not wrong, but they are evasive and will not tell the policyholder that the first month is 1 yuan, and the second month will be charged according to normal prices, ranging from dozens to 200. Many customers did not know what they bought after being charged for one or two years.
They thought they could spend $1 and the insurance company would pay $6 million (a pie in the sky).
Free mobile phones are only given to policies with special policy numbers such as 6666, 8888, and so on. If you win, you will not receive a text message and no one will remind you.
(This is another pitfall for the insurer) The free receipt of RMB 60,000 of critical illness insurance is short-term. If you only rely on this, without other commercial insurance, if you really have a critical illness, RMB 60,000 will not be enough to solve the problem, and your future life will start to run naked.
At present, the state is also cracking down on the misinformation of Internet insurance sales.
So, from a comprehensive point of view, there is no problem with the platform, and there is no problem with the product. The problem is the professionalism and professional ethics of the salesperson.
It is recommended that the host consider comprehensively and prudently. In fact, the products of many offline insurance brokerage companies are more extensive. Customers have more opportunities and products to choose from, and the cost-effectiveness of some products is better than that of Internet products.
I have helped 59 Internet customers buy offline products, saving them 2,000 to 3,000 yuan per person per year.
If you have any questions, please feel free to communicate and exchange with me.
Me: Mingya Insurance Broker, with 3 years of enterprise management training experience, has served nearly 1,000 corporate users, cooperated with more than 100 insurance companies, and before applying for insurance, I will start from the customer's needs and customize insurance products for customers. During the application for insurance, I will compare three insurance products for customers and try my best to get the best underwriting results for customers. After the application for insurance, I will sort out the insurance policy for customers, manage the insurance policy, and make customers feel at ease and worry-free.
Grow with each customer for a lifetime.
I hope my answer is helpful to the questioner!
According to the definition of the insurance regulatory department, Internet insurance is an insurance business in which the insured can independently complete all the insurance procedures after clicking the insurance link.
In this process, the policyholder does not need to sign, the insurance advisor does not need to sign, and all steps can be completed by the policyholder independently.
Although there is not much "ceremony" in applying for Internet insurance, and there may not even be a printed paper contract, this does not affect the validity and legal effect of the electronic contract.
This model is a bit like call-centre style mass-production, but there's a fatal problem with buying insurance this way - the follow-up service may not be up to scratch.
Insurance is usually a long-term contract that lasts for dozens of years. When we buy insurance, shouldn't we think carefully about whether the "intermediary" we choose is a "insurance intermediary" that can accompany us for a long time and will provide us with service many years later?
How can I contact the delivery agent?
It's almost 3 o'clock.
Do I get compensation for that?
I said I'm going to door-to-door delivery
But the rider just left it at the door and walked away
and sent it to the wrong person
Your rider has taken my takeaway from #NUMBER#, but still tells me to wait
The rider received my order at 19:25, but still refused to leave
After I buy it, do you want to order anything else?
What to do
Where did your rider go
Do you have to wait?
I'm a delivery guy
Well, if you don't cancel, I'll call the police
But my food would be unsafe and unhygienic
Classic Sword Appreciation Guide Gold Edition Collector's Edition [Genuine Book with Worry-Free After-Sales Service]
【Authentic books, fast delivery, quality guaranteed, and can be invoiced.】
Classic Badge Appreciation Guide + Classic Sword Appreciation Guide + Classic Military Uniform Appreciation Guide Gold-plated Collector's Edition 3 Volumes World Military Book Classic Military Badge Performance Introduction Military Uniforms and Swords
Nine Lectures on Chinese Painting Appraisal and Collection Strategies (authentic book, fast delivery)
【Full amount discount, fast delivery after placing the order, can be invoiced, and genuine books】
Western Swords: Appreciation and Collection [authentic book, fast delivery]
A Guide to Piano Technique [Authentic book, fast delivery]
Industrial Design Handbook of Creative Realization + Industry Guide + Presentation, Luo Jian, Li Yu, Liang Jun, Tsinghua University Press [Original Book, Flash Delivery]
Chinese Antiques Auction Highlights: Porcelain (in English) [Authentic book, fast delivery]
Jiuge Picture Book 【Original Books, Flash Delivery】
The Dream of the Red Chamber Map Song [Original Book, Fast Delivery]
Chinese Painting History [authentic book, fast delivery]
The Book of Flowers and Birds [Original book, fast delivery]
Realism and Chinese Film in the 1980s
China Logo Design 1 [authentic book, fast delivery]
Herbaceous Flower Poetry Book [Original Book, Fast Delivery]
Sword Art Online 02: Aincrad
Song Jianfeng - Miniatures of Personage Painting Masters (Original Book, Fast Delivery)
Good governance and the rule of law – lessons from institutional history and the gains and losses of governance
The 20th anniversary commemorative edition of the “Lectures on History and Culture for Ministry-level Leading Cadres” Wang Chunyu, Zhang Dake, Xiong Zhaozheng, Ge Jianxiong, Deng Xiaonan, and 14 other history masters, cultural celebrities, and well-known scholars gave a public course for Ministry-level leading cadres.
You just need to enter the promotional code to make up for it.
No problem, remember there's no need to arrange a redelivery, I've already bought some elsewhere and don't want to waste it
Thank you for your help
From the past to the present, I have always opposed any form of vilification and verbal abuse, and I cannot accept such personal attacks.
In a civilized society, we can accept everything, but we must eradicate this kind of scoundrel.
If we do not look at parties and factions, the first thing to resist is this kind of uncivilized style.
From the moment you started sending me Facebook friend requests, to the subsequent posting of sarcastic posts, to your attempts to post what you claim to be my home address and my father's name on social media, I have chosen to ignore you.
You have continued to tag me at the rate of six meals a day after that, and continued to discuss with your so-called friends on Facebook some implicit and humiliating remarks about me, such as my appearance, figure, good nourishment, and whether to plant strawberries on the bed or not. I just let it go.
Little did I know that later, I received more than one friend on my Facebook account who uploaded a photo of you and made sexual remarks.
I'm sorry, as a woman, I can no longer remain silent.
After my report to the police, you didn't show any signs of restraint, but instead became more arrogant.
I don't care what your political background is or what your social status is. In our society, we need to respect both men and women.
Yes, you can continue to make those snide, innuendo-laden, humiliating, insulting remarks, you can continue to say you only care and are concerned about me, you can continue to think that it's not harassment, you can even continue to deny that it's not your picture or continue to post all those nasty things.
That's right, I can't and I don't have the power to stop you.
I don’t know you, and I don’t want to know you, and my appearance and figure don’t need your evaluation.
I don't even think there's a girl out there who would want to be humiliated like that in order to get famous.
A friend asked me, "How are you doing?"
I told you, you wouldn't believe it.
I don't think any girl would say she's fine after being bullied like that.
Only those who have no basic moral integrity would choose to hurt any woman in this way, whether in the workplace, in society, in politics or in business.
I believe that justice comes from the heart.
I cut some of the comments for you to judge
No one should be able to impersonate you on your own post
I can only say that you are the enemy of civilization
A wry smile
Vietnam People's Daily Online - Prime Minister of Vietnam Pham Minh Chinh Attends the 3rd Vietnam National Forum on the Development of Digital Technology Enterprises
During the third Vietnam National Digital Technology Enterprise Development Forum, two main meetings were held to discuss the topics of digital technology enterprises and national digital transformation, and digital technology enterprises and economic recovery and development during and after the COVID-19 pandemic.
Minister of Information and Communications Nguyen Manh Hung said that in 2021, despite the continued spread of COVID-19, the number and revenue of Vietnamese digital technology enterprises continued to grow by nearly 10%.
In 2021, the number of typical digital products in Vietnam was cultivated, which focused on solving the major problems faced by Vietnam. Many digital products have gone abroad, and Vietnam's digital technology ranking has been improved.
Minister Ruan Mengxiong called on digital technology enterprises to take on the responsibility of developing a national digital transformation platform, and the task of developing these national digital platforms is to take on the national mission.
At the forum, leaders of departments and state agencies, as well as enterprises, organizations and individuals who are researching, developing, applying and transferring digital technologies shared their ideas and solutions to mobilize and collect resources from the whole society to develop Vietnamese technology enterprises, join hands to promote the country's digital transformation, and economic recovery after the epidemic.
Premier Fan Mingzheng emphasized in his speech at the forum that digital transformation is the only way in the world and an objective demand for development.
Digital transformation has become a global issue, and digital transformation services are for everyone, so it is necessary to mobilize everyone to participate.
The people and enterprises are the core, subject, target and driving force of digital transformation.
Therefore, all policies are for the people and enterprises.
Premier Fan Mingzheng emphasized that the digital transformation should embody the spirit of the Chinese nation, and should be mainly based on internal forces, strategic, long-term and decisive factors, and external forces as important and breakthrough points.
He also believes that digital transformation should drive development in depth and sustainability, participate in the prevention and control of COVID-19, economic recovery and development, respond to changes in the aftermath, overcome the phenomenon of natural resource depletion, and help green transformation and the development of green energy.
The digital transformation needs to participate in the work of establishing a database for the protection and promotion of national cultural values, historical traditions, national customs, etc., and promote the digital transformation of banks, taxation, land management and development, and logistics and other fields.
The biggest goal of digital transformation is to make the people happier and the country more prosperous.
Premier Fan Mingzheng required all levels of government, all levels of institutions and enterprises to increase their leadership and guidance in the development of digital technology, improve their understanding of digital transformation, continue to formulate and improve the system of digital transformation, strengthen national management and promote the development of digital technology enterprises based on the spirit of respect, communication, listening, positive and active.
During the forum, Prime Minister Pham Minh Chinh attended the award ceremony of the 2021 “Made in Vietnam” excellent digital products and the opening ceremony of the “Made in Vietnam” digital products.
I have reported it and attached pictures, but there has been no response.
What's so great about it? It's not great at all.
It was a chicken with saliva, raw meat
I can't eat it
Are you sure it is freshly cooked and not old?
unacceptable
I've already ordered
They said they would deliver it at around 7 o'clock
Why is it being remade?
This is so messed up.
The opening ceremony of the 2021 China International Railway Transportation and Equipment Manufacturing Industry Talent Summit - Rolling News - Hunan Daily Net - Huasheng Online
Hunan Daily reported on December 10 (full-media reporter Zhou Ziheng): On the 9th, the 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Industry Talent Summit opened in Zhuzhou.
Wang Cheng, member of the Standing Committee of the Provincial Party Committee and Minister of the Provincial Party Committee Organization Department, attended the launching ceremony and made a speech.
Wang Cheng pointed out that holding the talent summit is an important measure to implement the spirit of the Central Talent Work Conference and the 12th Party Congress of Hunan Province, and it reflects the sincerity of Hunan in attaching importance to talent, seeking for talent, and making good use of talent.
Hunan has a good tradition of loving and respecting talents, a broad platform to help develop talents, and a good environment to achieve a better life. In recent years, it has deeply implemented the talent-led development strategy and built a full-chain talent work pattern of attracting, nurturing, retaining, and using talents, which has become a fertile land for talent growth and achievement, a hotbed for innovation and entrepreneurship, and a paradise for living and doing business.
At present, Hunan is implementing the "Three Highs and Four New" strategic positioning and mission tasks in an all-round manner. It will further open the door to attract talents and provide more favorable policies, more resources and better conditions for innovation and entrepreneurship of talents, and hope that excellent talents from all walks of life will work together for the high-quality development of Hunan.
The activity set up the Changsha, Zhuzhou and Xiangtan pavilions and the Hunan Free Trade Zone Pavilion. The Provincial Department of Science and Technology, the Provincial Department of Industry and Information Technology, and the Provincial Department of Human Resources and Social Security released the list of key demands for technological innovation in advanced manufacturing-related industries, the list of talent demands in the intelligent manufacturing industry and the list of demands for young talents in the intelligent manufacturing industry in the postdoctoral mobile station.
48 large enterprises, including China CNR, China Railway Rolling Stock Corporation, Yanda Technology, participated in the on-site talent recruitment, and nearly a thousand related professional graduates and social talents participated in the talent project docking.
Hi,
I just placed an order and it says the rider is waiting at the restaurant, but the restaurant says the order is ready and they haven't seen the rider
Can you help to follow up, because I am in a hurry, thank you.
It could be half an hour late for no reason
Do you actually have a solution?
This editor has brought you which one is good in Balichang?
1, [Directly operated by a distillery] Ningcheng Bailihuan Old Cellar 42 degrees 500ML strong aroma high-quality sorghum liquor. The taste is mellow old liquor. A box of four bottles
Reason for recommendation: Selected sorghum as the raw material and brewed with traditional technology. The white wine from the Inner Mongolia Plateau has a more classic taste. It is rich in layers and has a strong and mellow taste. It is brewed with traditional solid-state white wine technology and retains its original flavor without loss, allowing the body to carry a strong and mellow taste.
This product is level 1, with a capacity of 500, stored in a normal temperature, cool, dry and ventilated place, packaged in other ways, with an alcohol strength of 42, a fragrance type of strong aroma, in the province of Inner Mongolia, product weight (kg) 2.9, currently 4 people have evaluated it, and it has received 100% positive reviews.
2. Ningcheng Bailihe Old Cellar, 52-degree barrel-aged grain liquor [10-kilogram package]
Reason for recommendation: After years of storage, it has become thicker and more translucent. It is the wine that the Mongolian nomads love to drink. The strong aroma conforms to the traditional brewing process, and it is the kind of white wine that is suitable for all kinds of banquets or home use.
The capacity of this product is 5000ml, it is packaged in a drum, the product weight (kg) is 8, it is a strong fragrance, the storage method is ventilated, the province is Inner Mongolia, the level is level 1, the alcohol content is 52, and more than 50 people have commented on it, and it has obtained a 95% approval rate.
3, [Directly operated by the distillery] Ningcheng Bailihan old cellar, 42 degrees, 500ML, strong aroma of sorghum liquor, mellow taste of old wine, six bottles in a box
Recommendation reason: This liquor is selected from ecological brewing of sorghum. The fragrance is coordinated, fermented in the cellar, and the wine is aged. The taste of the wine is more fragrant.
The white wine from the Inner Mongolia Plateau has a more classic taste, and the strong aroma slides over the lips and teeth of the guests, making them drink to their heart's content.
Reason for recommendation: The selected sorghum is processed by unique technology, so that you can drink freely at banquets and family gatherings.
High-speed rail actually home
Address: No. 555 Gaotorail North Road View map
Here, home appliances are complete, with many brands and well-known brands.
During the 12.12 event, I went to the "Hanston" water purifier store to look at water purifiers. The store was having an event and the prices were more favorable.
Actually Home has a total of 11 floors, from -2 to 9th floor, -1 and -2 are all parking places, and parking is free during the day!
The surrounding area is not very good. There are very few restaurants and hardware stores, and the food in the restaurants is not very good.
This lift is also speechless. It's just like having a big disease. It goes from minus two to minus one, back and forth, and doesn't stop at my floor. It's also speechless to go down from the safety channel to the first floor. It directly leads to a furniture store, and the furniture store is closed, and you can't get out of the safety channel!
There is still a lot of development to be done at Aju Home.
Address: 555 Gaotorail North First Road, Saibek District. The transportation is convenient, there is a large parking lot, and it is free during the day.
Environment: To be honest, the store is large, with 8 to 9 floors. If you want to buy furniture, household appliances, and various small things at home, you can buy them here. There are many well-known merchants in the store, including Muxi, Opai, Huadai, Boss, Fengchuangjia, Hansun, Yak, Youbang, Silan, Fupinjie, Wanjiale, Dahan, Zhonglian, Meidi, Yadan, and so on. The brands are really too many. I can only remember so many of them. It is a good place to buy products. If you are tired of shopping, you can sit on a sofa to rest.
Recently, I wanted to buy a comfortable sofa. My friend said that there were many sofas to choose from. I looked at Gujia Home and Meike Home. They were OK, but the price was a bit expensive, so I was still hesitating.
The Urumqi Home Furnishings Market Channel of Dianping.com provides you with the latest merchant information such as the address, phone number and business hours of the High-speed Railway Home Depot. If you want to find a decoration company, just go to Dianping.com.
It has already been sent to my guests, #PRS_ORG#
It’s been submitted, it’s been submitted
If it can be delivered within 20 minutes, it won't be cancelled.
Mainstream of Yangtze River realizes full coverage of water green comprehensive service area - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Wuhan, December 11 (Reporter Wang Xian) The Fuling water-based green comprehensive service area in Chongqing was completed and put into operation as scheduled on the 10th. This is the second water-based green comprehensive service area on the upper reaches of the Yangtze River after the Lijiang water-based green comprehensive service area in Sichuan Province was officially put into operation on the 8th.
By now, the water green comprehensive service area has covered the upper, middle and lower reaches of the Yangtze River.
According to Qiu Jianhua, the deputy director of the Yangtze River Navigation Management Bureau of the Ministry of Transport, previously, Hubei, Hunan, Jiangxi, Anhui, Jiangsu and other provinces had built and operated 10 water green comprehensive service areas in the middle and lower reaches of the Yangtze River, which had been recognized by a large number of seamen and played an important role in promoting the high-quality development of Yangtze River navigation.
The full coverage of the water-based green comprehensive service zone is another milestone event in the construction of the Yangtze River green shipping, and the Yangtze River ship pollutant receiving and shipping service capacity are significantly improved.
It is reported that the water green comprehensive service area is an important facility for providing all-round production and life services for a large number of ships and crew members and helping a large number of crew members to solve the "urgent, difficult, worry and hope" problems.
The two green comprehensive service areas on the upper reaches of the Yangtze River, which have been completed and put into operation, integrate life services, production services and government services into one. With the theme of green and environmental protection, and with ship repair and ship emergency rescue services as its features, they will realize “one docking and multiple services” for ships inside the port, which will make the work of the crew members on the Yangtze River more efficient and their life more convenient.
U.S. three aircraft carriers gather in the surrounding area of China The most powerful weapon is rare to visit Guam. 2022-01-17 Multi-dimensional report by the pro-Communist media: The latest news on Sino-U.S. relations: The latest satellite image shows that three U.S. aircraft carriers are gathering in the surrounding area of China; U.S. media also revealed that one of the most powerful weapons in the U.S. naval arsenal is rare to visit Guam, sending an important signal to the U.S. allies and enemies in the Indo-Pacific region.
According to the China think tank "South China Sea Strategic Situation Perception Platform", on January 9, the satellite found the U.S. aircraft carrier "Carl Vinson" (USS Carl Vinson) near the Bab-el-Mandeb Strait.
The Balabac Strait connects the South China Sea and the Sulu Sea, and is a strategic location on the first island chain in the western Pacific.
The platform is expected that the "Carl Vinson" will go to the South China Sea for deployment.
This is the first deployment of F-35C fighters and CMV-22 "Osprey" carrier aircraft on the "Carl Vinson" aircraft carrier.
In addition to the “Carl Vinson” aircraft carrier, there is also the “Abraham Lincoln” aircraft carrier (USS Abraham Lincoln), which departed from the United States on January 3.
The "Lincoln" is also carrying the F-35C carrier-based fighter squadron for the first time. The squadron is under the 314th Marine Fighter Attack Squadron of the U.S. Marine Corps.
In addition to the two aircraft carriers mentioned above, the USS Ronald Reagan is currently stationed in Yokosuka, Japan.
The aircraft carrier battle group also includes the guided missile cruiser USS Lake Champlain and the guided missile destroyer USS Stockdale.
Three U.S. aircraft carriers gather around China, the most powerful weapon in a rare visit to Guam. On January 17, 2022, the "South China Sea Strategic Situation Perception Platform" released the latest satellite images, showing that three U.S. aircraft carriers were gathering around China.
(Weibo @South China Sea Strategic Situation Perception) The U.S. three aircraft carriers gathered in the surrounding areas of China, and the most powerful weapon rarely visited Guam. On January 17, 2022, the U.S. military transport aircraft CMV-22B flight route.
(Weibo @ South China Sea Strategic Situation Probing Initiative) According to CNN on January 17, one of the most powerful weapons in the U.S. Navy’s arsenal made a rare visit to Guam over the weekend.
The Ohio-class nuclear submarine USS Nevada, which carries 20 Trident (Trident) ballistic missiles and dozens of nuclear warheads, entered the U.S. naval base in Guam last Saturday (January 15).
The three U.S. aircraft carriers have gathered around China. This is a rare visit to Guam. It is said that this is a signal sent to the allies and enemies in the increasingly tense situation in the Indian-Pacific region.
This is the first visit to Guam by a US ballistic missile submarine since 2016, and the second public visit to Guam since the 1980s.
Three US aircraft carriers gather around China, and the most powerful weapon has a rare visit to Guam. China has built a large number of military facilities in the South China Sea in recent years.
The photo shows Yongxing Island in the Nansha Islands of China.
(South China Sea Research Forum) The U.S. Navy said in a statement that the visit of the Ohio-class ballistic missile submarine "Nevada" to Guam strengthened cooperation between the U.S. and its allies in the region, demonstrated U.S. capabilities, flexibility, combat readiness, and continued commitment to security and stability in the Indo-Pacific region.
Ballistic missile submarines are often referred to as "boomer" submarines.
The whereabouts of the 14 "Thunderbolt" submarines in the US Navy fleet are usually strictly kept secret.
The secrecy surrounding the ballistic missile submarine made it the "most important survivable weapon in the nuclear triad," a system that also includes land-based intercontinental ballistic missiles and B-2 and B-52 bombers capable of carrying nuclear warheads.
When discussing the recent 26% drop in Meta's stock price, which wiped out $251 billion in market value, Zuckerberg responded with "facing unprecedented competition". What is the reason?
Meta (formerly Facebook) is essentially an advertising company, and its main source of income comes from advertising. Nowadays, advertising companies that make money have their own traffic channels.
Facebook, Instagram, Whatsapp, etc. are all traffic channels of Meta, regardless of their functional positioning.
In addition, Meta is also the largest "advertising alliance", and many apps are connected to Meta's advertising, which is realized through Meta's advertising platform.
But times have changed.
First, due to the adjustment of Apple's privacy policy, it is difficult for Meta to obtain user data information, which has affected the efficiency of advertising.
Apple's current privacy policy is very user-friendly, and it will clearly prompt users whether to allow the App to access their information, and most people's normal reaction is certainly not to allow it.
If Google were to stab again, the impact on Meta's revenue would be even greater.
Second, the China factor in Meta's past revenue growth has also been weakened (the proportion of this factor is uncertain, but it does exist).
Everyone knows that Meta has no business in China, but this understanding is not accurate.
At least 10% of Meta’s revenue comes from China every year, mainly from companies doing business in China.
Meta has a few hundred employees in its Hong Kong office, and a few large agents on the mainland.
Chinese companies want to expand into the overseas market, and Meta is an unavoidable advertising channel. Most of the money spent is given to Meta.
It's interesting that now Bytedance's TT is one of Meta's main competitors, but Meta made a lot of money from Bytedance in the past two years.
Domestic agents are all helping Byte to advertise on Meta, and Meta's performance in Greater China is also very good.
I haven't looked into it recently, but I'm sure it's not better than it used to be.
The stage of Chinese companies burning money overseas has passed.
Third, the expansion of new traffic channels was not smooth.
Facebook is getting older, and the new platforms, including TT, are not in the hands of Meta.
The biggest problem isn't falling income, it's the lack of growth expectations.
The capital market is not only concerned with income, but more importantly, it is concerned with the expectations for the future.
Clearly, Meta's expectations were not met.
In order to tell a new story to the market, Zuckerberg talked about the “metaverse”.
The metaverse is indeed one of the directions for the future, but the implementation cycle of the metaverse is relatively long, and this story is not enough to support Meta's market value in the next two or three years.
Therefore, the next two years should be a difficult time for Meta.
Don't be fooled by Facebook's current glory, and its annual revenue of 100 billion to 200 billion US dollars. In fact, Facebook is in crisis, and it has no good and safe moat compared with other Internet companies and high-tech companies.
Although his several social software has relatively high daily active users now, and they are also mainstream social software, such as Facebook, WhatsApp, and so on, but in the face of TikTok's rapid development, Facebook does not have much confidence, and the subversion is just the blink of an eye.
The concept of the metaverse, which is out of reach, has no hope of success in a short period of time, so Facebook is very dangerous. This is also the fundamental reason why Zuckerberg changed the company's name and kept looking for new tracks. However, I think his choice of track is wrong, and it is a dead end. The above are some of my thoughts for your reference.
Article 17 The state shall implement a registration and practice management system for registered fire engineers.
People who have obtained the first-level and second-level fire engineer qualification certificates can engage in fire engineering practice under the name of a registered fire engineer.
Article 18 The Fire Bureau of the Ministry of Public Security is a registration and approval department for the registration of first-level registered fire engineers.
The public security fire departments of the provinces, autonomous regions and municipalities directly under the central government are the registration approval departments for the registration of second-level registered fire engineers, and are also responsible for the preliminary examination of the registration of first-level registered fire engineers.
Article 19 Persons who obtain the first-level or second-level registered fire engineer qualification certificate and apply for registration should be employed by an approved fire technology service institution or a fire safety key unit, and submit registration application materials to the fire department of the public security organ in the place where the employing unit is located (if the employing unit is an enterprise, submit registration application materials to the public security organ in the place where the enterprise is registered) through the employing unit.
Article 20 The public security fire departments of provinces, autonomous regions and municipalities directly under the Central Government shall, after receiving the registration application materials from the applicant, inform the applicant in writing of all the materials that are incomplete or not in compliance with the legal form on the spot or within 5 working days. If they do not inform the applicant within the time limit, the application shall be deemed to have been accepted from the date of receipt of the application materials.
In case of acceptance or non-acceptance of the registration application, the applicant shall be issued a written certificate with the official seal of the fire department of the public security organ at the same level and the date noted.
Article 21 The public security organs of the provinces, autonomous regions and municipalities directly under the Central Government shall, within 20 working days from the date of receiving the registration application, complete the preliminary examination of the registration application materials for the first-level registration of fire engineers and the registration approval of the second-level registration of fire engineers in accordance with the prescribed conditions and procedures, and report the registration application materials for the first-level registration of fire engineers and the preliminary examination opinion to the Fire Bureau of the Ministry of Public Security for approval.
The Fire Bureau of the Ministry of Public Security shall, within 20 working days from the date of receipt of the application materials and preliminary review opinions submitted by the provincial public security fire departments, make a decision on whether or not to approve.
If the approval decision cannot be made within the specified time limit, the extended time limit and the reason shall be notified to the applicant.
For decisions that are not approved, written reasons should be given, and the applicant should be informed of the right to apply for an administrative reconsideration or file an administrative action in accordance with the law.
Article 22 The registration approval department shall, within 10 working days from the date of the approval decision, issue and deliver the registration certificate at the corresponding level.
Article 23 Each registration certificate is valid for three years.
During its period of validity, the registration certificate is the professional license of the registered fire engineer of the corresponding level. It is kept and used by the registered fire engineer himself/herself.
Article 24 Those who apply for initial registration shall submit an application within one year from the date of obtaining the first-level and second-level registered fire engineer qualification certificate.
A late application for initial registration must meet the continuing education requirements of this Regulation.
The specific measures for registration management, such as initial registration, renewal registration, change registration, deregistration and non-registration, shall be separately stipulated by the Ministry of Public Security.
Article 25 Continuing education is a prerequisite for continuing, re-registering and late initial registration of registered fire engineers.
For each registration period, registered fire engineers at all levels should complete the relevant continuing education in accordance with the requirements.
Article 26 The registration approval department shall promptly announce the registration of fire engineers to the society and establish a credit file for registered fire engineers, and implement credit management on their practice activities.
Article 27 The registration management departments for the registration of qualifications of registered fire engineers at all levels shall strictly implement the relevant provisions of the Administrative License Law of the People's Republic of China.
This is the end of today's exam information sharing. I hope it can help you.
Everyone must work hard to prepare for the exam and strive to pass the fire engineer exam as soon as possible!
Real-time sharing of the latest examination information on finance/accounting/architecture.
I'll cancel - I've been waiting for a long time
You keep delaying
But the whole box of saliva chicken is raw meat and cannot be eaten. Can I get a refund?
None of the pineapples, egg tarts, and steamed buns arrived, and #PRS_ORG# returned #NUMBER# yuan
But is spit-roast chicken refundable?
Because they were born unable to eat
If I want to cancel, can I?
The “Peace Rescue-2021” joint military exercise between China and Vietnam was successfully completed-Xinhua Net
Xinhua News Agency, Hanoi, December 12 (Zhou Na and Teng Weiqing) - On the morning of the 12th, all the Chinese participants in the "Peace Rescue-2021" joint exercise between the Chinese and Vietnamese armed forces safely returned to China's Guangxi, marking the successful completion of the seven-day training mission.
In this exercise, the Chinese and Vietnamese armies, around the theme of humanitarian medical rescue, closely followed the mission of medical and rescue, and according to the standards of actual combat, completed the joint medical and rescue command, joint on-site rescue, large-scale wounded disposal and other subject contents, which effectively improved the medical and rescue capabilities of the two armies.
The exercise results were affirmed by the Chinese and Vietnamese armies.
At the closing ceremony of the exercise, the chairman of the exercise guidance committee of Vietnam and the deputy director of the General Logistics Department of the Vietnam People's Army, Ruan Xiongsheng, said that through this exercise, the Vietnamese doctors learned the knowledge of exercise organization and professional activities from the Chinese doctors, and also saw the medical and support equipment of China.
The results of the exercise proved the professional capabilities of the military medical forces of the two countries in medical assistance and epidemic prevention and control.
Chen Chunming, the head of the Chinese guidance and coordination group and the deputy director of the Health Bureau of the Logistics Support Department of the Central Military Commission, said that this exercise is another innovation and practice based on the successful holding of the joint clinic in 2018, which has a very important milestone significance.
During the exercise, the Chinese People's Liberation Army donated medical protective masks, medical protective clothing, rapid nucleic acid detection instruments and other epidemic prevention materials to the Vietnam People's Army.
